CHAPTER I.
The
unwise license and injurious freedoms
accorded
to youth in our day and country, will
render
it unnecessary to explain how it was that,
with father and mother, a good homestead, and
excellent resources, I was yet suffered at the
early age of eighteen, to set out on a desultory
and almost purposeless expedition, among some
of the wildest regions of the South-West. It
would be as unnecessary and, perhaps, much
more difficult, to show what were my own
motives
in undertaking such a journey. A truant
disposition, a love of adventure, or, possibly, the
stray glances of some forest maiden, may all be
assumed as good and sufficient reasons, to set a
warm heart wandering, and provoke wild
impulses
in the blood of one, by nature impetuous
enough, and, by education, very much the master
of his own will. With a proud heart, hopeful of all
things if thoughtless of any, as noble a steed as
ever shook a sable mane over a sunny prairie, and
enough money, liberally calculated, to permit an
occasional extravagance, whether in excess or
charity, I set out one sunny winter's morning
from
Leaside
, our family place, carrying with me
the tearful blessings of my mother, and as kind a
farewell from my father, as could decently
comport
with the undisguised displeasure with which
he had encountered the first expression of my
wish to go abroad. Well might he disapprove
of a determination which was so utterly without
an object. But our discussion on this point need
not be resumed. Enough, that, if my path was
all before me, I was utterly without a guide.
It was, besides, my purpose to go where there
were few if any paths; regions as wild as they
were pathless; among strange tribes and races;
about whose erring and impulsive natures we
now and then heard such tales of terror, and of
wonder, as carried us back to the most venerable
periods of feudal history, and seemed to promise
us a full return and realization of their strangest
and saddest legends. Of stories such as these,
the boy sees only the wild and picturesque as
pects,such as are beautiful with a startling
beautysuch as impress his imagination rather
than his thoughts, and presenting the truth to his
eyes through the medium of his fancies, divest it
of whatever is coarse, or cold, or cruel, in its
composition. It was thus that I had heard of
these things, and thus that, instead of repelling, as
they would have done, robbed of that charm of
distance which equally beautifies in the moral as
in the natural world, they invited my footsteps,
and seduced me from the more appropriate
domestic
world in which my lot had been cast.
With a light heart, full of expectation, a free
steed that seemed rather to swim along through
space, than tread monotonously over the rugged
ground, the day passed away with an almost
unnoted
flight. My eyes had been charmed in the
observation of trees and groves, picturesque
objects
of sight in hill and dale, wood and water,
and such occasional more worldly matters, as
were provoked by long ranges of whitened
cotton
fields, or yellow corn yet bristling in unbroken
rows. At the close of the day, I had reached a
cabin where I found shelter for the night, and at
early dawn, I again set forth, with the promise
of another day of generous sunshine. This day
was consumed like the last, and with equal
satisfaction
to myself. The buoyant spirit of youth
rises in exultation in any exercise, which seems to
impart equal freedom to soul and body; and there
is something of the same triumphant pulse in the
heart, galloping over the prairies, over the hills, or
through the long cathedral ranges of gigantic pine
forests, which one feels on the deck of a fine ship,
careering over the billows of the broad Atlantic,
with a breeze that sends the foam flying at every
plunge, from the bold prow of the imperial vessel.
The man is wonderfully lifted with the
consciousness
of having at his command, and being able to
command, such a noble animal as the horse, and
rapidity of motion is the source of an intoxication,
of a sublime sort, of the character of which we
can form a good conception from the interest we
take in a race, whether of steeds or steamboats;
the danger of being hurled down by the one or
blown up by the other, being, in both cases,
absolutely
and entirely forgotten. Mine was a
nature
particularly to exult in such exercises, my
temperament being wholly sanguine, and the
indulgence
of my parents having left it to an
unrestrained
exercise, which rendered it feverishly
irritable when not engaged in such performances
as were grateful to my excitable imagination.
After the close of the second day of my journey,
it seemed to me as if both my horse and self could
have begun anew, with a more buoyant spirit
than before,as if the toil itself refreshed us, and
as if no more grateful object lay before us, than
just be permitted to be wander on, and on,the
world forgetting, by the world forgot.
Certainly
,
the true secret of perpetual life, is perpetual
motion. Find the one, and we secure the other.
Alas! the want of
daylight
, is the great
drawback
to our progress and discoveries. We have
just begun to make them when the curtain falls
upon us.
The close of the second day brought me to the
foot of a long range of hills, the lower steps
possibly
of the great Apalachian chain, inclining to
1*
the Mississippi. It also brought me to the very
borders of what was in that day, known as the
region of doubt and shadow. I had reached the
confines of civilizationeven such imperfect
civilization
as belonged to our thinly settled frontiers.
I was now ninety miles from Leaside, and only
separated by a narrow wall of hills from that
strange region of forest mystery and romance,
about which so many surprising stories had been
told me. This also was the Indian country
here the red men still lingered, mixed up with
reckless, renegade whites, who preferred the wild
privileges of savage, to the more wholesome, but
seemingly less attractive pleasures, of civilized
life. As I thought over this taste, I cold not but
shudder to discover that such also, to some
extent
,
was the feeling in my own bosom. But I
was too young to encourage unpleasant
reflections
,
and for these but little time was allowed
me. Just on the edge of this neutral ground
this debateable landneither savage nor social
stood a house that has since had more than one
remarkable history. It was a miserable shell of
logs, roughly hewn, of two stories, to which, in
the rear, was appended a long shed of
frame-work
,
intended to contain some three chambers,
or, upon a press of companypassage way
included
possibly
four. It was a
public
of
notorious
resortstanding almost astride the area,
from which diverged four roads, leading to as
many different quarters of country. It was
consequently
much frequented, and the landlord,
who will probably be well remembered by many
as Jephson Yannaker, was, at the time of which I
speak, doing a thriving business. There were
many witless lads like myself, travelling for their
humors, and many more, not so witless, but more
reckless, travelling in the same regionsat our
expense. I had not much time allowed me to
examine the exterior of this establishment, before
a stout, shock-headed, burly, red-faced, but
kindly
looking personage, whom I soon learned to be
Yannaker himself, advanced from the door-way
to the head of my horse.
Come, 'light, stranger,you're just in time to
shake a leg with the best of them. 'Light! I'll
see to the critter.
His words were explained a moment after, as
the discordant twang of a half-tuned fiddle smote
my ears from the interior. In entering, I had
just time to discover that several horses were
hitched to neighboring trees, and on one side of
the premises, but rather nearer to the house, there
stood a sort of travelling carriage of rude
structure
a
strong, unwieldy vehicle, to which two
able draught horses were still partially attached.
From a few bundles of fodder at their feet, it
seemed to be the design of their driver, who was
busy in the carriage, that they should enjoy their
forage where they stood.
But the sight within made me forget
everything
without. The hall ran nearly the whole
length of the building, and it was comparatively
a large one. A bright fire was blazing in the
chimney, and a matter of thirty persons, or even
more, were strewn around the apartment. Of
these, though less than half, a fair proportion
were women. Near the fire sat the fiddler, the
croakings and creakings of whose crazy
instrument
had assaulted me on my first arrival. He
was still busy in the seemingly hopeless task of
screwing its strings into something like
symphonious
exercise and utterance. He was a plain
country lad, in homespun, with a cap of coonskin
still clinging to his head, which swung
pendulously
over his fiddle, as he now jerked at the
keys, and now jostled with the bow.
But there was nothing in his appearance
calculated
to detain my glance. This now roved
about the assembly, which promised to be as
interesting as it was certainly promiscuous and
picturesque. The men were stout fellows all,
of the true farm-yard breed, famous at the flail,
and with fists, whose seeming efficiency reminded
me more than once of the powers ascribed to
those of Maximin, the Gaul, who could fell a
bullock at a blow. It did not seem as if they
had prepared themselves for the festivities they
were about to enjoy. Their costume was that
of the farm-yard. Plain blue or yellow
home-spun
,
rough shoes, and, though the winter had
fairly set in, many were the bronzed and naked
breasts displayed by the open shirt of coarse
cotton. The frolic, so far as they were
concerned
,
was evidently
extempore
. They had
been suffered no time for the toilet. But this did
not seem greatly to abash them. The
unconventional
world in which they lived, had rendered
them somewhat insensible to that feeling of
mauvaise honte
, which would have been sure,
in such a case, to have distressed the half
civilized
lad to an immeasurable extent. They
showed
no concern at the matter, but dashed forward,
each to his favorite lass, as coolly and confidently
as if fashion had received her dues, and the toilet
all the necessary sacrifices. And there was, in
this very freedom, a sort of savage grace, which
greatly tended to lessen the rudeness of its
general
aspects. Most of the fellows were well
formedrough, but erect and easyand having
that use of their limbs, boldly flexible, which the
life of the hunter and the horseman is very apt
to impart in the case of a well made person.
Where had these lads come from? From a
space of country twenty miles round, through
which the very whispers of a fiddle make
themselves
heard, heaven knows how, and whose
attractions
among such a people are felt, heaven
only knows to what extent. Some of them were
professional hunters; some, idle ramblers like
myself; and some few might have been gathered
in the immediate neighborhood. But, as I could
give no very good reason for my own presence
in such a place, it would be unreasonable to
expect
me to account for theirs.
The girls,but here the case is very different.
When did ever damsel find herself in such a
situation without contriving some of her secret
graces before the toilet? Though she mirrors
her beauties in the stream, she will yet manage
to give them some of those helps of art, a
knowledge
of which she seems to have caught by
instinct. There were some twelve or fourteen
damsels in the room, and a profusion of ribbons
and of these a country girl must have the
gaudiest
.
Fancy, gentle reader, the picture for
yourself
.
See Mary with her bandeau of Hibernian
greenher belt of golden yellowher
necker-chief
that seems to have been dyed in summer
rainbows, and her dress that might have been
made out of their skirts. And there is Susan in
her head dress, and Sally in her blue and scarlet,
and Jenny in her Jim-along-Josey, without
ever dreaming that her style of body garment
would ever become a fashion in the great city,
and be known by such an imposing name. I am
not good at such details, and you must conceive
them for yourself. It is very certain, however,
that, with all their superior pains-taking at the
toilet, the women lacked the graceshowever
inferiorwhich distinguished the deportment of
the men. They sat, stiffly and awkwardly, like
so many waxen figures, each on her stool, as if
troubled with a disquieting apprehension that any
unwise movement would overturn the fair fabric
of her present state, and be equally fatal to
head-dress
,
handkerchief and happiness. There was
one exception to this uniform display of
ostentation
and awkwardness,of whom more
hereafter
.
But the waxen images were made to move.
The fiddle began to speak in tolerable tune, and
the brawny boys sprang across the ocean of
floor that separated them from the green beauties
on the sunny banks, and appropriated them, I
suppose, according to previous arrangement. In
the twinkling of an eye they were upon the
ground, every mother's son of them, and busy in
the mazes of the country dance. Such a shuffling
of feet, such a tearing of music to very tatters, by
that crazy violin, and the inveterate musician,
who scraped away as if catgut could bring about
the noblest catastrophe,would require the
creation
of a special muse to describe, and, until that
event, we leave the affair to the quick conception
and conjecture of the reader.
CHAPTER II.
I know
not why, but the whole proceeding,
with all its whirl and excitement, its odd
merriment
and grotesque display of art, produced in
me a feeling of disquiet, approaching even to
melancholy. Perhaps, this was because it
reminded
me of Leaside, and the fiddling of old
Ben, our venerable butler, when little Mary
Bonham was my partner, and we wandered
down together in the same sweet primitive
movements
that now seemed to be desecrated
wantonly
before my eyes. The whole scene of home
grew up before me as I gazed and mused. The
stately hall, hung with pictures, nicely curtained,
with the massive piano on one side, and the
equally massive book-case on the other; the one
a treasury of the sweetest sounds, the other of
the noblest sense. My father, with his white
hairs, on one side of the fireplace; my mother, with
her stiffly-starched white cap on the other;the
one with his huge Shakspeare on the little table
beside him,closed, with his silver spectacles
peeping out between the leaves;the other with
her knitting apparatus in her lap, the work
dropping
to her feet, as she watched our movements,
while the kitten, lying on its back, was
disentangling
with mischievous painstaking that which had
tasked the ingenuity and industry of the good old
dame, to put together, for the last half dozen
evenings. That passing but sweet glimpse of the
dear old homestead, with all its holy associations,
was the first mental image which crossed my
mind, reproachful of my wanderings. You may
be sure I did not encourage it, but, anxious to
remove it, I hastened round the dancers, to the
opposite side, intending to make my escape at
the doorway, and go out beneath the skies; but
I was interrupted in this progress, and diverted
from this purpose, by finding the narrow way
occupied. I looked down at the person who
thus obstructed my pathway, and almost recoiled
in pleasurable surprise. Before me sat a young
girl of fifteen or thereabouts. She certainly
could not have been more than sixteen. The
first thing that struck me about her was the
exquisite
but dewy brightness of her eye, which
was as dark of hue as the coal may be supposed
to be on the eve of that moment, when, under
the force of heat, it becomes a brilliant. The
face was small, very small, when you turned
suddenly from the blaze of the large expanding
eye to note the accompanying features;but it
was also very beautiful. The skin was singularly
clear and transparent for such black eyes and
hair. The forehead, about which was bound a
narrow braid, was high and broad, and
constituted
fully one half of the face. The hair was
parted, madonna fashion, as if art, after long
experience
,
had become assured that, in the present
case, her best policy was to obey the laws of
simplicity. Her neck, which was only half bared,
seemed very white and beautifully rounded. Her
figure, which was evidently slight, could not be
distinguished, by reason of the huge travelling
cloak in which she was still wrapped. The
whole appearance of this young creature, so
unique, yet so little like the rest in the assembly,
fixed my regard, and would have done so even
had the excessive brilliancy of her eyes and
beauty of her complexion not enchained it. Her
seeming isolation, too, so much like my own, was
another circumstance to commend her to my
sympathies. A scene like the present, in a
frontier
country, I need not say to my readers, is apt
to set at defiance the more restraining laws of
society in the obviously social world; and,
assuming
the exercise of one of the most understood
privileges of the place, I did not hesitate to
accost
the stranger. She was evidently a stranger
like myself, and I jumped at once to the
conclusion
that she was one of the inmates of the
travelling
carriage that I had seen at the door.
You do not dance, I said to her, bending
down beside her, and speaking in those subdued
tones which seem the properest when
addressing
the young, the timid and the artless.
She looked up, then around her, with something
of the expression of a startled fawn, away from
its dam, and trembling at the approach of some
strange monster of the wilderness. There was
an air of anxiety in her glance, which made me
more cautious in my approaches, and at the same
time, more earnest in my interest. As she did
not answer, I put my inquiry in another shape.
Will you not dance with me?
Oh, no! she answered, still looking
anxiously
around her, and particularly at the entrance,
Oh, no! I do not wish to dance. I am a
stranger here,I know nobody.
I too am a stranger here, was my reply
let us therefore know one anotherlet us be
friends.
She allowed her eyes to rise for a moment to
the level of mine, and when they encountered my
glance, a deep crimson overspread her cheek.
Shall we not be friends? I repeated, as I
found she did not design to answer.
What can I do? she answered; and the
question struck me as remarkable for its
simplicity
.
It seemed to indicate a higher standard of
duty, in the matter of friendship, on the part of
this young creature, than was customary among
mankind in general. I contrived, however, to
reply
,
though her question was evidently one not
easy of answer.
What should a friend do, but love his friend,
and think of him, and pray for him, and be glad
to see him, and sorry to lose him.
Ah! but I shall soon be gone.
Gone! where?
To my own homeyou to yours.
And why should we go different ways?
I don't know, she said, in slow, subdued tones,
which so far flattered me, as they seemed to be
regretful ones.
There is no reason why we should not go
together
,
at least for a little while. For my part, I
have set out to travel, and it does not matter
much whither I go. Where do you live?
Miles offvery far. Close by the river
Riverwhat river?
Farfar! You cannot go. No, no! You
cannot go there.
I observed, as she replied, that her glances
sought anxiously the entrance, before which I
now discovered, in the dim light of evening, that
there stood a group of persons, three or four in
number.
You little know how far I am willing to go
for my friendfor those whom I love; was my
reply, and my hand rested, while I spoke,
unconsciously
on my own part, on hers. I felt hers
tremble beneath itwithdrawnand only then
was I conscious of the trespass, which, had I
been in a highly civilized world, had been
committed
by this presumption. I proceeded:
If one's friend is true and worthy, one follows
her to the end of the world, follows nobody else,
thinks of nobody else, cares for nobody else, loves
her over all the world.
Ah! that is friendship; she answered with
a sigh.
I would be your friendI will follow you;
I continued impetuously, encouraged by her
words.
No! no!I have no friend. I live very far,
by the riverthe road is hard to findbad
swampsyou cannot follow me.
Her answer was made with some trepidation,
and an increased anxiety of expression, as her
glance was directed towards the door.
And why should it be hard to find, and why
should the bad roads and the swamps prevent me,
when it does not prevent you? Why can't I
follow
you? I
will
follow you.
No,
you must not!as a friend
you must not.
This was spoken with singular emphasis; then
she paused abruptly, as if disquieted at the degree
of
empressement
which she had given to her
utterance
.
But she had also given peculiar force to
the word
friend
, and
that
pleased me. It
seemed to say that she herself was not displeased
with the appropriation. But there was a
mystery
in the whole matter. Her strange mode of
speechso artless, yet so reservedher evident
anxiety, if not apprehension,and the secrecy
could it spring from ignorancewhich she
resolutely
maintained as the whereabouts of her
abode? I was resolved not to give the matter
up. But, for that moment, this resolution was
made in vain. We were interrupted, and, as I
thought, rather rudely, by some one thrusting
himself in between us. I turned to meet the
intruder
,
in a mood prompt enough to punish the
intrusion, and was confronted by the stern glance
of a man in middle lifeperhaps a little beyond
itsuch seemed the testimony afforded by thick
masses of grisly beard which stood about his
cheeks and chin. His keen, inquiring glance,
fixed upon my own face, rather tended to
increase
the disposition which I felt to resent what
I esteemed his impertinence, but the momentary
reflection that he might be the father of the
damsel
,
moved me to tolerate a bearing which, under
any other circumstances, would have moved me
to do battle, and which, in the opinion of the
country, would not only have justified, but called
for it. While I was meditating what to say,
for he still kept his glance fixed upon methe
girl rose and took his arm. He turned from me
at this instant and led her off to an adjoining
apartment, followed by Yannaker, the host, who
seemed to be busy in no worse office than that
of showing the parties their several chambers.
My game is up for the night! was my
muttered
reflection, and, so thinking, I dashed out of
the hall, and with hot brow and excited spirit,
stood, unknowing where to turn, beneath the cool
and mantling startlight.
CHAPTER III.
The
sounds of that crazy violin, which I now
began again to hear, sounded a worse discord in
my ears than ever, and gave an impulse to my
footsteps which they seemed to need. I dashed
forward, following what seemed the opened
grounds, and soon found myself ascending a little
range of hills. The night was very clear and
very beautiful,of that sombrous sort of beauty
when the light just suffices to enable you to
distinguish
objects, but helps, at the same time, to
magnify their aspects by its own vague medium.
The trees stood up,those stately pines which
maintain, day and night, one unceasing murmur,
which is more dear than song to the imaginative
spiritin frowning and vast magnificence beside
me, like so many gigantic wardens of the land,
marshalling the entrance to some wondrous
palace
.
Under their guidance, as it were, and
through their ranks, I hurried on, musing over the
thousand fancies which, I suppose, would be
natural
enough to any youth under the same
circumstances
newly
enriched by a sense of liberty
a feeling of manlinesswhich the very
privilege
of roving at that hour, and in new scenes,
would be apt to inspire;and, anon, reproached
by the stern internal monitor within, for filial
disobedience
,remembering,
with sinking heart, the
tears of my mother, and the frowning farewell of
my fatherall of which was, in another moment, to
be banished from thought, by the intrusive image
of that strange, sweet maiden, sitting by herself,
wrapped up in her heavy cloak, yet looking out
with such bright, diamond-like, heart-conducting
eyes. I might have wandered thus for hours,
perhaps all night, for what youth with such
feelings
in his heart, and such ferment in his brain, ever
cares for the dull sleep of ordinary mortals,had
I not been roused to other thoughts by a sudden
and startling sound, which reached me from
the range of dark hills opposite. I could only
liken this sound, with which I was unfamiliar,
to the bay or howl of the wolf, or perhaps, a
dozen of them; and though the idea of a
wolf-hunt
struck me the next moment, as being among
the most famous of all ideas, it was some
qualification
,
just then, to any such desire, that I was
horseless, weaponless, without company, and
totally
ignorant of the habits of the animal, and the
country in which I stood. That domestic virtue,
discretion, interposing at this juncture, persuaded
me to retrace my steps to Yannaker's, which I
reached in reasonable time, after once measuring
my length over a stump, that very imprudently
stood in my way on the slope of a little hillock.
The violin was still at work, and though I felt
apprehensive that, until it slept, I should not,I
persuaded old Yannaker out of the circle, where
he himself shook a leg, in order that he should
show me the way to my chambera measure to
which I was induced, by being convinced that
the fair stranger would not again emerge from
hers that night.
I slept soon and soundly, in spite of my
convictions
slept
to dream, precisely as I had
mused, of home, and strange woods and
adventures
,
with ever and anon, that fair young face,
and those dark lustrous eyes, peering downward,
as if from heaven, into my very heart. This image
so completely filled my brain, that it was the first
to encounter me at my waking. I started up
with a bright sun blazing through a half-opened
window upon me. There was a stir below, and,
half vexed with myself for having slept so late, I
jumped out of bed and ran to the open window.
As I feared, the travelling carriage had
disappeared
,
and in it, as I concluded, my fair
incognita
.
I dressed myself with all despatch, and
hurried below. Preparations for breakfast were
in progress, though the room still retained some
of the traces of last night's exertions. Part of an
antique frill lay in one place at my feet, and at a
little distance I detected beneath the breakfast
table a stripe of red stuff, most like red flannel,
in conjecturing the uses of which I was reminded
of the apocryphal story of the Countess of
Salisbury
,
and the now proverbial sentence of the
courteous monarch,`
Honi soit qui mal y pense
.'
The worst evil that I was thinking of, was my
2
mysterious damsel, and the timely entrance of
Yannaker enabled me to make the necessary
inquiries
.
Gone, sirgone as fast as a pair of the best
horses in Massassipp could carry her.
How long, Mr. Yannaker?
Don't mister me,
stranger
,I'm plain Jeph
Yannaker to travellers, and Yannaker to them
that knows me. I'm agin making a handle for a
man's name before you can trust yourself to take
hold of it.
No offence, Jeph YannakerI only speak as
I've been accustomed.
No offence, to be sure,it's your teaching,
stranger, but here in our parts, where people's
scarce, and the sight of one's neighbor does the
heart good, a handle to his name seems to push
him too far out of the reach of a friendly gripe.
It's a stiff, cold sort of business, this mistering
and squiringwill do well enough among mere
gentlemen, and lawyers, and judges, and such sort
of cattle,but out here, where a look upon the
hills and swamps seems to give a man a sort of
freedom, it's a God's blessing that we have few
such people here. Here we're nothing but men,
just as God made us,not to speak of a little
addition, in the shape of jacket and breeches, made
out of blue or yellow homespun.
Those who have had the good fortune to know
Jeph Yannaker will give me credit for having
reported him correctly. His life was an
eventful
one, and, one day, shall have its history,
though it come from no better hand than my
own. But to return. After some little time
taken up in disclaimers and other matters,for it
seemed to me as if the worthy publican was
wilfully
bent on avoiding the topic to which I sought
to confine his attention,I at length gathered
from him, not only that the damsel had taken her
departure, but that she had been gone ever since
midnightthat she never slept in the house at
all, but had only retired, with her uncle, from the
crowdthat, as soon as the moon rose, the latter
had geared his horses, and just when I was
enjoying the sweetest dreams of the treasure so
newly found, she was spirited away by her grisly
protectorwhom I rejoiced to find was not her
fatherbut, in what direction, Yannaker either
could not or would not say. I immediately
declared
my purpose to pursue, and requested that
he would have my horse brought out. He looked
at me with open mouth, and a chuckling haw!
haw! haw!that promised to correspond with
the boundless dimensions of his distended throat.
I became impatient, and with some peevishness
demanded the occasion of so much unreasonable
and unseasonable merriment.
What!go? he asked.
Yes, sir,go! and what is there so very
laughable in such a determination?
He composed his muscles instantly.
Not before breakfast,oh! no!I'm sure of
you till then. Why, breakfast is a good thing,
the best of things on an empty stomach
breakfast
is a warm thing, the warmest of things for a
winter day. Why, stranger, no man's brains do
good service, unless breakfast has warmed his
belly; and, I tell you, even the horse, besides,
knows when his master is well filled and sensible,
and when he is not. Let a good horse alone for
that. Why, lad, the best horse I ever knew or
crossed, would always cut capers when a man
undertook to straddle him who happened to be
hungry; no horse of mine should ever be crossed,
if I know'd it, by a man who hadn't had his
breakfast
.
It so happens, Mr. Yannaker
Plain Yannakerplain Yannaker, he said
interrupting me.
Well, then, plain Yannaker
Ha! ha! ha! That's it. You're rightI
like you the better for it. Say `plain Yannaker,'
if you please, in preference to Mister Yannaker.
I say, then, plain Yannaker, that my horse is
not yours, and neither knows nor cares whether
I have had my breakfast or not.
Wouldn't have such a horse, stranger, as a
gift. By the Lord Harry, I wouldn't. But don't
be wolfish at Jeph Yannaker. Here's your
breakfast, and your horse shall follow it, as soon
after as you pleaseonly, let me tell you you're
clean mistaken. Never was a horse yet that
didn't know whether his master was fed or not
unless he was an idiot beasta clear senseless
animal,and I reckon there may be idiot beasts
as well as idiot men. There now,sit down to
your breakfast,the old woman's poured out the
coffee, and all's ready. I'll see to the critter.
Jeph Yannaker had a way of his own, as most
who knew him know, which there was no
resisting
.
He had the most good humored cast of
countenance, the most benevolent smile, the most
kind solicitude of manner,yet, if tales speak
true, he could cut a purse, and a throat too upon
occasion, as promptly as the Pacha of Yannina.
Of this, however, in another history. Enough,
for the reader, that I, a boy of eighteen, found it
impossible to be angry with such a person, and
he forty-five or fifty. He quieted me in the most
persuasive manner, and, seeing me safely seated
over my eggs and hominy, in equal good humor
with them and with himself, he sallied forth to put
my nag in readiness. My breakfast was soon
discussed, and my horse at the door. My host,
however, did not seem so willing to part with
me. I had dropped the usual
quid
into his hands,
saying good humoredly.
There, plain Yannaker, we are quits for this
time.
He laughed.
You are a clever chap, and I somehow like
you. We takes a liking for a human every now
and then, jest the same as we takes for a fine
horse, or a speaking hound; and I've got a notion
that when you give yourself time you're a raal
good fellow. Aint you?
There's more than you who think so, I
answered with boy sharpness.
Oh! git out, said he, nobody beside
yourself
.
But where away, lad? You're not a guine
running after that gal you seed last night?
I am though, I answered doggedly.
No, don't. Take an old fool's counsel for
once, and save your horse's wind. In the first
place you can't find her.
I'll try for it.
And in the next, if you do, it'll be much worse
than shaking hands with a hungry bear that aint
willing to be friendly at no time.
Indeed! But what know you of her? You
told me you knew nothing.
Well, in one way, that's true enough; and
when you gets to be as old as me, you'll find out
for yourself, that a gal child is about the hardest
critter in the world to know entirely. But I
wasn't speaking of any danger from her, by no
means,but of them that, mout-be, you'll find
along with her.
Ha! that old uncle of hers?
Prehaps,and a rough colt, I tell you, to deal
with, take him at any turn. Bud Halsey is all
bone and gristle, I tell you, from tooth to
toe-nail
.
Is his name Bud Halsey?
Yes, when he comes to Yannaker's,but I
can't answer for it any where else. All I can
say is, that your course lies in any other part of
the world than where he is. I say so, lad, for
your good,for, as I told you, I somehow likes
you.
But what is he, friend Yannaker?
He! He's nothing, as the world goes,but
something, I tell you, when he works his grinders.
Keep clear of him, that's all. It don't become me
to be talking behind the back of a man that pays
his way in good money,and I never axes such
a man how he gets his money. That's no
business
of mine. But, to begin agin, and to end, lad,
at the same timekeep clear of that gal's track;
it can't be that you've got so deep into the mire
at one sight, so there's no reason to go deeper.
Go home, and let Bud Halsey's niece marry some
body else.
Yannaker was evidently no sentimentalist. His
phraseology, which likened love to a bog, and
the lady to a wild beast, or angry cur at least,
seemed to me nothing to the purpose, and
strangely
savage and unpoetical. I answered him in a
way intended to be conclusive, as I flung my leg
over the saddle.
Thank you, friend Yannaker,you no doubt
mean me kindly, but if Bud Halsey were twice
the monster that he seems, I'd take his track.
Well, it's cl'ar, lad, that you've been pretty
much used to having your own way, and such
people are never made wise, but by a little
worry,so go ahead, as quick as you please,
only keep your eyes busy, believe nothing that
you hear, be scared at nothing that you see, and
be ready to treat a man with two legs as if he
was an animal with four;for, if you go after
Bud Halsey, there's no telling whether man or
beast will sprawl first. If you must have the
ways of a man, be sure you have the heart of
one. There's no telling how many dangers a
stout heart will carry a fellow through.
Something piqued with the tone of this
discourse
,
I struck spurs into my steed, and sent him
through the gateway, as I replied:
Thank you, thank you, friend YannakerI
have no fears, so do you have none. I trust your
eggs won't give out before I return. I shall be
back by Christmas for my egg-nog.
Go ahead! was all of his response which
reached my ears,but I could hear him mutter
something more, as, shading his eyes with his
hands, he watched my progress along the road.
CHAPTER IV.
My
reader, if he still has in his veins any of
the hot blood of his early manhood, will easily
understand how the exhortations and warnings
of the landlord, so significant and forcible as they
were, should have awakened in me the spirit of
curiosity, and prompted into activity my natural
passion for adventure. My damsel became, in
my eyes, the heroine of romance, to be rescued
from the bearded giantto be won with feats of
arms, and the most reckless audacity. I began,
the moment I was fairly out of sight of
Yannaker's
,
to examine the neat silver mounted pistols,
the property of a dear departed brother
which had long been my favorite possession, and
which I now carried in the pockets of my
overcoat
.
It will amuse, rather than alarm, the
reader, to describe these mortal weapons. They
were of the smallest calibre, capable of carrying
only a buckshot, and useless for any purpose
unless
with their muzzles fixed upon the very bosom
of an enemy. But I had little experience which
could test their value. Like other boys, I had
been taught by a tender mother that lead and
powder were horridly dangerous things, and that
pistols were pistols. As I gazed on the pretty
playthings which I carried, and saw that the
priming was dry and grainy, I was inspired with
2*
as much confidence in their efficiency as ever
had that famous knightI forget his namewho
wielded
Excalibar
in that spell-endowed
weapon
.
A dirk-knife, of more respectable dimensions
which I wore in my bosom, completed my
equipments
in this respect.
I need not say that I pursued my way almost
at random. I have said that four roads diverged
into different regions of country, from the area
in which the house of Yannaker stood. I had
dashed on that which had presented to the casual
eye the most obvious carriage track, and with all
the ardor and the hope of youth, I followed this
route till sunset, when I found myself in front of
a wigwam, in the door of which stood a haggard
woman, scarce able to move, bearing in her
countenance all the proofs of a severe visitation
of autumnal fever. From her I learned that no
carriage had passed that day, and, indeed, before
I made the inquiry, I had lost all fresh traces
along the road of the vehicle, which I had set
out to follow. Here was a quandary. To
return
then was out of the question. My love and
romance together failed to inspire me with any
desire for riding back over such a road, and on a
night which promised to be equally cold and
starless. To go farther was idle, considering
my objects, and I gathered from the woman of
the house that her dwelling was the only one on
that road within fifteen miles. I was perforce
compelled to remain where I was,a necessity
which, when I saw the cheerlessness of the
interior
,
was felt to be even heavier than the
protracted
journey. But for my faithful horse, I had
taken the back track, and seen `plain Yannaker'
by the next day's dawn.
I must hurry over the next three days. They
were unmarked by any event of importance.
Nothing had occurred having any bearing on my
purpose, nor did I feel or find myself, up to this
time, one step nigher to the fair object who was
still the warmest and most vivid presence in my
imagination. I had, meanwhile, retraced my
course to Yannaker's, heard more of his warnings
with as little heed, tried another of the roads
diverging from his house with as little profit, and
now, in a third direction, was laboring at the
close of day among the swamps of
Choctawhatchie
.
That night, the brown heath and dried
leaves formed my bed, my canopy was the tree
and sky, while a rousing fire at my feet, and in
front of my horse, served to keep at a distance
any beasts of prey which might have been
disposed
to disturb us, I confess I slept little. I
had not so much faith in the effect of fire upon
wolf and tiger. I was in a region where they
still were found, and what with seeing to the
comforts of my horse, gathering brands, and
trying
to keep warm, the morsels of sleep which I
caught were equally small and unsatisfactory.
It was more refreshing to me to get fresh glimpses
of another day.
Once more afoot, and with the dawn. My
brave steed had borne the privations of the night
better than myself. At least he wore a more
cheerful aspect in the morningand this
encouraged
me. I dashed forward with that
neck-or-nothing
philosophy which feels itself prepared for
whatever may turn up, though with a lively hope
that it may take the shape of breakfast. No man
can endure long the want of hunger as well as
sleep. One or other he may stand with
tolerable
fortitude for thirty-six hours, chewing the
cud of his reflection, in the absence of tenderer
meats,but denial of both, for such a period, will
go nigh to unnerve and undo the bravest. Just
then, however, I felt very sure there was no
standing hunger half so long. The idea of a
smoking breakfast, I modestly confess, had put to
slumber, for the time, certain other far more
sublimated
ideas.
I had not to ride farperhaps some eight
milesbefore I found my breakfast. This was
at an Indian cabin, as miserable a mud hovel as
ever engendered vermin, and reduced humanity,
a willing victim, to their ravages. My host was
a half-breed,one of those dark, untamed, surly
savages, such as the Indian, with a white cross,
almost invariably becomes. He placed my food
before me as if it was poison. His looks, indeed,
seemed to defeat its alimentary properties, for I
ate with suspicion, and it did little help to my
digestion. Fortunately, my horse found no such
fault with his corn and fodder, probably because
he looked at them rather than the hands by which
they were furnished. My host eyed me in
silence, took my money with the air of one who
would just as lief take my life, and watched my
departure from his door with the indifference of
one who is assured that it must be taken wherever
I may go. My reflections, owing to sleeping in
the woods, starvation, bad food, and sulky savages,
had become far less audacious, knight-errantlike,
and consolatory than usual. There was but one
remedy for them, and that lay in the spur at my
heels. I touched up the sides of my horse, whom
a hearty breakfast had rendered somewhat dull,
and on we went, dashing through a region that
not only grew more wild, but more watery at
every step. The conviction that a river was at
hand, reminded me that my incognita had said
that she lived beside one, and this memory, with
the increased rapidity of my motion, served to
disperse, in some degree, my disquieting
reflections
.
It was towards midday, when I was suddenly
startled by sounds, like those of a horse, at some
little distance before me. This led me to prick
up my senses a little, and feel in my pockets for
my pistols.
But, just then, I had no need of them. A
moment
more shewed, and dissipated, the occasion
of my alarm. Man and horse came suddenly in
sight, wheeling out from a little Indian trail, a
little ahead, and on the right hand of the path
which I was pursuing. The horse was a
miserable
hack, driven to the top of his speedwhich
was no great matter,by the unrelaxing
application
of whip and spur. The rider was evidently
engaged in a race for life. He was a small
person
,
well wrapped up in clothes, with a brand-new
beaver on his crown, and a smart whip with an
ivory handle in his grasp. His boots and
unmentionables
,
originally of city make and good cloth,
had been in close acquaintance with the tenacious
yellow mire, which was abundant enough at
every turning. His face was sharp and his eyes
vigilant; at an ordinary time, and under ordinary
circumstances, it is probable that their expression
was sufficiently shrewd and sagacious, but just
then, it was pale with fear, and expressive of no
other quality. The man was evidently
half-scared
to death. I drew up and faced him. He
would have dashed aside in consternation,
regarding
me as an enemy; but my voice arrested and
somewhat quieted him. Besides, having
unconsciously
planted my heavier steed directly across
the track, no spurring or whipping that he could
use, could force forward the feeble animal he
rode. He was accordingly, breathless and
looking
back, compelled to stop.
To make a long story short, he had been
robbed
,
most civilly, according to his own account,
some three hours before. His business had been
to collect certain monies, in which object he had
succeeded. The moneya considerable amount
had been promptly paid him by his debtor, from
whom he had taken leave and gone upon his way
rejoicing. But he rejoiced not long. An hour had
not elapsed, ere he was accosted by the rogues,
two in number, and theywomen.
Women! I exclaimed with equal
astonishment
and mirth. The pitiful fellow shrunk
beneath
my glance, and made a stammering
explanation
which half excused him. According to
his belief they were women only in costume.
Like the worthy Welshman, in the case of
Falstaff
he
liked not when a 'omans has a great
peard;
he
spied a great peard under her muffler.
One of the rogues, it seems, had been so indifferent
to propriety of costume, as to make her toilet
without
shaving; and a grisly beard a month old, had
made the pistols which she presented to the breast
of the collector, doubly potent in his eyes. The
pistols were clearly masculine. Having relieved
him of his pleasant burden, they laid a hickory
over his own and horse's back,a mode of
objurgation
which horse and man seemed equally
prepared
to comprehend. He heard but the one
comforting assurance that they gave him at
parting
,
that if he only dared to look back for an
instant
,
like Lot's wife, they'd salt him forever. He
had ridden some fifteen miles since leaving them,
taking care to incur no such penalty. His
farther
information, was of some color for my own
prospects. He gave it as his opinion, that the
whole region, which he had fancied a
quasi
wilderness, was alive with roguesthat the
settlement
was quite a numerous onethat they
occupied
every fastness and place of cover, and
retreat
hammocks
and isletsin the swamps and
river
And every alley green,
Dingle, or bushy dell, of this wild wood,
And every bosky bourn from side to side.
They were a vast community, kept together by
the common object and necessity, roving always
in concert, and sworn against all laws and all
honesty. He did not scruple to declare his
conviction
,
though this he did in a whisper, and with
an eye cast furtively around him, that even his
debtor, who had paid up so promptly, was of the
very same fraternity, who had only paid so
readily
because he well knew that his associates,
would very soon put him again in possession of
the same money.
And who was your debtor? I asked with
some indifference, as a matter of course, and
almost
heedless of the answer.
His name's Bush Halsey.
I felt my cheeks glow again.
Bush
Halsey?are you sure it is not
Bud
Halsey?
Oh, yes! He's got a brother named Bud
Halsey
.
And where's he? Is he here in the swamps?
No, I guess not. I heard of him night afore
last, down to'ther side of the `nation,' but he's
gone below.
Gone below? where?
I can't guess.
And how shall I find this Bush Halsey?
The poor fellow was unwilling or unable to give
me directions. His fright revived when he
recollected
some threats that were thrown out, of
future treatment, if he dared to reveal anything in
relation to the robbery, and my anxiety to get
intelligence
,
and my determination to go forward,
expressed in spite of his counsel to the contrary
now seemed, all on a sudden, to impress him with
the belief that I was one of the gang, and no
better
than I should be. An attempt which I made
to get some further information touching the
Halseys
,
only rendered him more anxious to shake
off an acquaintance who might think proper, at
some sudden moment, to finish those feminine
proceedings which had been begun in the swamps;
and, seeing his disquiet, I wheeled my horse out
of his path, and bidding him God speed, boldly
turned into the dark, narrow avenue out of which
he had emerged.
CHAPTER V.
I was
certainly about to pursue, with sufficient
audacity, a career, which, with sufficient audacity,
I had begun. The romance of the thing was still
uppermost in my mind. The truth is, that youth,
unaccustomed to trials of its own, is not always
persuaded of the realness of danger. There is
always a hazy indistinctness about the wild events
of which it reads or hears, which, touched by the
warm rays of an unrestrained imagination,
becomes
a glory in its sight, and effectually hides
from view the cloud and storm from which it has
arisen. I was moving forward as one in a dream.
Accustomed to a life of security, and to the even
progress of the day, unbroken by anything
unusual
,
and secure from any evils which are not
common every where to life, I could not and did
not yield my belief to the strange stories which I
heard. That they were commended to my fancy,
was natural enough, as they came clothed with
the hues of the picturesque and novel. But that
they were real, actual, living and daily ocurring
thingsthat here, in Americain our matter of
fact, monotonous, prosaic day,there were
bonafide
brigands, such as we read of in Italy,was
a matter not so easy to be brought within the
compass of belief. Thinking from my feelings, I
judged the affair of the fellow with whom I had
just parted, to have been some clever practical
joke of some dare-devils, exaggerated by his
unmanly
terrors, and hereafter to be explained when
the trick had been sufficiently played. Then the
robbery had been committed by women. Only
think of my being bid to stand by my own little
incognita! The fancy made me laugh outright,
and I felt very certain that, in such an event, I
should take to her arms, with the full purpose of
using my own. I did not actually wish to
encounter
her in the character of a footpad, but I
felt that such an event would not be entirely
without
its pleasant accompaniments. A wrestle
with her did not seem an affair to inspire terror;
and, laughing at the conceit, I dashed forward,
muttering from Dick, the apprentice,
Limbs do your office and support me well,
Bear me to her, then fail me if you can.
Filled with such pleasant musings, I had ridden
probably three quarters of an hour, after parting
with the Collector, and in this time I had
overcome
an interval of four milesnot more,for
the road, originally an Indian trail, was broken by
numerous
bottoms
,mucky places, of which the
reader will form a sufficient idea from the
distich
written with coal, upon the blaze of a tree,
which stood fronting a place of similar character.
called
Cane Tructa
, through which I once had to
pass:
Here's hll, and it
To go through
yit
.
The citizen would only need to gaze upon such
a spot and acknowledge the same necessity, to
feel the force and propriety of such an inscription.
The poet was worthy of the subject, and that is
no mean praise. I had gone through some three
or four of these miry gulphs, which the most
reverent nature would be very apt, involuntarily,
to liken to the infernal regions, Acheron and
Styxthough none of them was so bad as
Cane-Tructa
,and
had at length emerged upon a high
and beautiful knoll of green, the sloping edges of
which were fringed with dense barriers of cane,
their feathery tops waving gently, like the plumes
of so many gigantic warriors,and was
advancing
,
in an easy lope, into an area, about two
hundred yards round, on which trees seemed
never to have grown,when my horse suddenly
stopped short, and shyed half round, while his
elevated head and ears attested some occasion of
alarm. I raised my eyes, and discovered
directly
on the path in front, squat upon a log, the butt
end of which was thrust out from the opposite
forest,a man in a grey overcoat, with slouched
hat, and a huge rifle which lay directly across his
thighs. The suddenness of the encounter a little
staggered me; but, remembering my fanciful
philosophies, and the ludicrous plight of the
Collector
,
I soon recovered myself, and determined
promptly to yield myself to any mirthfulness
which the mischievous nature of men, in such
situations, might be disposed to practice. But as
soon as I got nigh enough to notice the
exact
features of the man before me, I arrived at
the conclusion, instinctively, that he was no
amateur
.
He was one of those men, whom we know
at a glance, as persons of downright, serious
business
,who
never laugh,who know nothing in
life but its necessities,and regard all things and
all persons, with that hard-favoured
earnestness
,
which looks directly and only to the most
slavish calls, whether of a hunger that needs, or
an appetite which lusts. He neither moved limb
nor muscle as I approached, yet I could see that
his eyes observed me keenly. The reader will
be pleased to remember that I am of the sanguine
temperamenta temperament which acts
promptly
,
without much reflection, from a spontaneity,
the result, it would seem, of a corresponding and
equal activity of mind and feeling. The truth is,
such persons
think
with as much rapidity as they
move, and if rightly trained to habitually just
thinking, their impulsive movements are very apt
to be quite as correct in their tendencies as if they
were made under the most deliberate exercise of
thought and will. This is said to account for my
conduct on the present occasion. It did not appear
to me that I thought at all of what I should do.
But the resolution and the performance were one.
As I approached the stranger slowly, I threw my
left leg over, so as to sit entirely upon the right,
thus facing him fully as I drew nigh. This is a
favorite mode in the Southern country of sitting
a horse, when the rider meets with a friend, or
with any one in whom he has confidence, or
with whom he is disposed to linger and converse.
It shows that there is no trepidation and no
desire of flight. Sitting thus, I approached
the fellow, and stopped my horse directly
before
him. He looked up at me with a savage
sort of inquiry in his glance, as if to say what
next? I did not suffer him, however, to put the
question in words, but proceeded in the following
manner:
I have but one question, stranger, before I
begin, and that is, `am I safe here from a sheriff?'
Be quick and tell me, for I must ride until I am.
And what makes you afraid of a sheriff?
You're not one, I hope?
Rather guess not.
Very well! Now thendo you ever see one
here?
No! They take root here but never grow.
A deputy came here once, from somewhere
below
;
they planted him, but he never come up.
Good! I need go no farther then; said I,
dropping from my horse, and taking a seat beside
him on the log.
Whar' are you from? he asked.
Tennessee.
What's brought you here?
This! said I, jerking my horse's bridle as I
spoke. The fellow glowered upon me, with looks
that showed he was no joker, as he responded
You mean to say you come on him?
Not exactly, though I did come on him. But
the horse caused my coming here. I made a
swap, giving that nag, which you see is a fine
one, with a fellow at muster, who traded me a
creature that had spavin. We didn't see it at
first, for he was warmed with riding. But going
off from muster I stopped at a friend's house,
where I sat an hour. Meanwhile the horse had
cooled off, and was as stiff in her joints as if
they were made of ridge poles. I had got on a
mile farther, hardly able to get along, when who
should come by but Backus, the fellow I had
swapped with. When I saw my own fine animal
that he was riding, and felt that I could hardly
hobble along with the one I rode, I got down
and stopped him, jerked him from the beast, and
we got to blows. Somehow he got a knife in
him, and I got my horse back. People would
have it 'twas my knife did the mischief, and there
was an inquest, and a warrantand all that sort
of thing,and so I slopedbut look you,you're
sure you're not a sheriff or a deputy?
And if I was?
I grappled him by the throat in an instant, and
drew my dirk, which flourished in his eyes before
he could say Jack Robinson!
Hold off, stranger! he exclaimed, grasping
my arm. I'm no sheriffand no deputy. Dn
the breed,I'm just as much afraid of 'em as
you.
Well you spoke in time! I said, with a half
subdued fierceness of lookit's no time to play
with a man when his neck's in a plough line.
It required no small effort, I assure you, to
compose my muscles and carry on this game
without laughter. But I felt that it was now
necessary
.
If my neck was not absolutely in a
halter, it was very clear to me that my life was
not in a state of absolute security. One glance
at the ruffian at my side, had served to dissipate
all my romantic fancies.
CHAPTER VI.
Thus
far I had carried out my assumed
character
,
with tolerable success. I had certainly
lied with a natural grace and readiness that did
not need a prompter, and I had the satisfaction to
see that my new comrade, in his own mind, took
me to be as great a scoundrel as himself. I
somewhat blushed for myself, as I became
assured
of this, but blushing then was no part of my
policy. I was in for it, and had to go through. I
remembered the counsel of old Yannaker at
partty
and salved the hints of conscience by
reflecting
that I was in the rogues atmosphere. Every
step I took with my companion left this matter
less in doubt. Though by no means a garrulous
fellow,really, a fellow of few words, he
contrived
,
in those few words, to give me insight
into
many and very strange things. Assuming that
the circumstances under which I had sought
refuge
in the swamp, and my own inclination, had
already made me one of the fraternity, he gave
me a brief but comprehensive history, of their
doings and ways of life. What had been told me
by the Collector was fully confirmed. The
region
in which I wandered, was possessed by a
community of rogues. They were numerous and
extensively connected throughout the country,
some of them had absolute wealth; and children,
born in this American Alsatiaso long had it
been a realm of outlawry,were now grown to
manhood. What a history was here. I asked
myself, while my cheek glowed again,was my
beautiful unknown, one of these? Had she drawn
her infant breath among such scenes, such rogues
had such always been her connections,and
in what degree had she escaped the
contaminating
influence of such an atmosphere of crime.
The robbery of the Collector, by persons in
female
garments, now struck meas it did not
when I first heard of itwith a sort of horror.
I could feel the enormousness of the crime,
committed
by women, when I thought of
her
, as one,
3
who might be in training for like practice. But
when I thought of her more particularlywhen
I remembered that nighther shy and timid air
her subdued and gentle accents,and the
tenderness
that spoke out equally in eye and voice,
I was re-assured. I felt happy in the
conviction
that no sort of human training, could pervert
such an exquisite work of heaven.
Enough of this,and let us hurry forward.
We were on our way together into the recesses
of the swamp. This was an admirable
receptacle
a
retreat, in which pursuit of one, familiar
with the region, would be undertaken by a
thousand
men in vain. Pursuing a zigzag and
continually
changing course for several miles, I yet
conjectured that we were not more than one
mile from the spot where we started. A long
dim avenue, led us as through some lonely
corridor
,
into a spacious area, a chamber almost
surrounded
by water, opening only upon one defile,
which might be guarded by a single man. Here
and there were nooks, closets, as it were, of
forest, which one might select for studio or
dressing
room, and be secure from passing
interruption
;and
anon, you had larger fields of
operation
halls
fit for courtly audiencevast parlors,
of green wall and azure ceiling. But the reader
must conceive for himself, what the rapidity of
such a narrative as this, will not suffer me to
describe. Enough, that love could not easily
contrive such a labyrinthine bower, for the
safety
of the beloved one, with all the appliances of
art at his bidding, and all the resources of
imperial
wealth at his command. Woodstock was a
fool to the swamp city of Conelachita!
By little and little I made new discoveries.
Here was art as well as nature. Sometimes
little tents of bush would appear,snug cottages
for a single sleeper. Anon came a more
permanent
if not a more pleasing hovel, made of logs
and clay. Here a horse would be seen fastened
his saddle and bridle hanging to the tree above
him; now a face would peer out from the copse
beyond us, as the trampling of our steeds would
become audible; and now a whistle, or the bark
of a dog, would announce our approach, to
distant
echos, which would be sure always to be on
the watch, to take it up, and repeat the signal to
others yet beyond. All this was so much
romance
,
which made me half forgetful of the risks
I incurred, and of the policy I was to pursue, in
order to escape them.
At length, my conductor came to a halt.
Here, said he, let us hitchwe must take
boat here. I stopped, got down, and followed
his example. We fastened our horses to
swinging
limbs, and set forward. I discovered that we
were on a sort of islet, on the edge of a rivera
dark, deep, but narrow stream, which whirled by
us with the rapidity of a four knot current,
carrying
along with it reeds and branches, and
sticks, the tribute of numerous shores, on the
several creeks above. A neat little
dug-out
,
capable
of carrying two persons only was fastened at
the landing. You can paddle your hand I
suppose
?
said my conductor. Could I not? I
could have paddled both hands. It was one of
my favorite exercises from my earliest youth, on
my own noble river, the Alabama. I answered
him by taking my seat in the little bark, that
danced like an egg-shell upon the whirling
current
.
She's a clean critter, said my
companion
with evident satisfaction. His praise was
deserved. A better balanced canoe, of better
proportions for such a stream, I had never beheld.
It was a pleasure to send her forward, and we
found no difficulty in crossing the river;but,
having made the opposite shore, we followed it
up, until we passed into the mouth of a creek, a
broad but sluggish stream. This we ascended
for half a mile or more, when we drew up to some
tolerably steep banks, jumped ashore, and hauled
the canoe into a
crevasse
, which might have been
the work of hands. We had not gone far when
we heard a voice. The person did not appear,
and the language used was a sort of gibberish
beyond my comprehension. It seemed to be
understood
,
however, by my companion, who
turned
aside at once, and entered upon another path.
Here we met another person who regarded me
attentively, but went forward without a word.
The next moment we encountered two women,
possibly the very feminine rogues who had
robbed
the Collector, but if they were, they had taken
care to shave themselves since they shaved him,
for their chins,and I examined them
heedfully
as they pastwere quite as clean as his
pockets. They did not pass in silence, however,
but had a few words of common-place, and a nod
and a smile to me. They were young too, the
jades, but quite ugly enough to have frightened
the Collector, without rendering necessary the
show of pistols. A whistle, once, twice, thrice,
repeated, at stated periods and places, now notified
our approach to higher personages, and
emerging
from the avenue into an area, we came upon
a group of five men, who seemed to be busy
about a canoe of considerable dimensions, which
was yet in the log, though the burning and hewing
had been begun. One of them, who was stooping
over the log, seemed to be engaged in describing
the outlines. He rose from his stooping posture
as we approached, and discovered to me a person
not only of large frame, but of imposing presence.
He was over six feet in height, broad breasted,
sinewy and muscular, with limbs of admirable
symmetry, which his costume, which was all of
buckskin, made Indian fashion, showed off to great
advantage. His coat was a hunting shirt thickly
fringed; no longer fresh in its original bright
yellow
,
but subdued by exposure to the weather, to
an uniform
umberous
aspect. There was no
covering on his head, the hair of which, though
thick and long, was white as cotton. His beard,
which spread over his bosom in thick curling
folds and masses, was such that, if I had not felt
sure that he was only a great rogue, would have
led me to suppose that he was a great patriarch.
His eyes were large, deeply set, and of a clear
dark blue. His nose was Roman, his mouth
small and expressive, and the whole expression
of his face that of benignity, and a conscience
quite at rest with his fellows and the world. I
may add that, as he wore neither stock nor
neck-cloth
,
there was scarcely anything in his costume
or appearance, to remind me of civilized life, and
yet, even with his habit borrowed from the
Indian
,
there was quite as little of the savage.
The picturesque in his guise, and its noble
simplicity
,
according so happily with his features and
his frame, effectually relieved his appearance of
that which might otherwise, in my sight, have
seemed strange and unnatural. He extended his
hand at my approach, a slight change of
expression
from interest to civility, being apparent in his
countenance, then, after giving some directions to
the workmen, he drew aside with my late
companion
.
A few moments only had elapsed when
he returned, having, as it would seem, in that
time, gathered from the latter all the knowledge
which he had respecting me. He again gave me
his hand, and drew me aside from the rest.
You have been unfortunate, young man,
said he,and I am sorry for you. There can
be no greater misfortune than taking life,
particularly
at your age. But Fry tells me you had
provocation. Pray, how was it?
I had to begin anew the work of invention.
Of course, my story, in substantial particulars,
must be the same as I had told before. But
there was a difference, which I soon discovered,
between my present and former companion,
while, to the latter, I appeared reckless; to the
former, as a man evidently better acquainted
with human nature, I adopted another tone. He
had himself indicated my cue, when he spoke of
the provocation which I had received. He knew
enough of the superior nature and education
which I felt that I could not, and did not wish to,
concealto be aware that no such crime is ever
committed by such in wantonness, or from the
mere brutal instinct of passion. There must be
provocation and hot blood, in the case of the
educated manwith very few exceptions
before
he will do murder. I framed my story
accordingly
.
He heard me patiently, and I was
particularly careful to say no more than was
necessary. This is the great secret in lying
successfully
.
When I had done, he took me kindly
by the hand.
Here you are safe, said he, as long as you
choose to remain. You know what we are, and
must abide by our laws. We ask you for no
participation in our practices, unless your own
will inclines you that way,which I would not
encourage. This affair may blow overyour
friends may succeed in hushing it up, and then
you may return in safety to your family. Nay,
even we may do something towards this result,
however strange you may think it. Outlaws
ourselves, we have friends not only among those
who obey, but those who administer the laws.
What is your name, and from what part of
Tennessee do you come? Let me know these
particulars, that we may institute an inquiry, and
see what can be done for you at home.
Here was a dilemma. But there was no time
for delay. It was necessary to answer promptly.
I gave my name as Henry Colman, of Franklin
County, West Tennessee. It was fortunate for
me that I knew something, personally, of this
region, for it appeared so did my examiner, and he
subjected me to a keen scrutiny, in which I did not
dare to falter. My answers seemed satisfactory.
He pressed my hand, and bade me go along with
him, and we rejoined the persons we had left.
To these I was not introduced, and he only
remained
with them long enough to give some
directions on ordinary subjects. This done, he
bade me go with him, and we pursued our way
together through a long wood, occasionally
crossing
branch and creek, upon a rude log or fallen
tree. My companion was free of speech, and his
conversational resources, I soon found, were
equally admirable and ample. He was deeply
versed in bookshe had seen the world, and was
not insensible to its refinements. His eye was
evidently one accustomed to seek out and
discriminate
the forms of beauty in external objects,
and he frequently drew the regards of mine to
this or that point of view in the surrounding
landscape
,
which was either picturesque or fine. All
this, while it increased my respect for him,
lessened
the impressions which I had received of his
objects and associates. I found it more and
more difficult, at every moment, to believe in his
outlawry. It was all some pleasant jestsome
queer contrivance of clever people, to produce a
laugh at the expense of the credulous;and with
this notion. I was more than once provoked to
blurt out the truth in my own case, and my
convictions
in theirs, in order to show that I was a
little too sagacious to be fooled further than I
thought proper. But a lurking grain of prudence,
at the bottom of my brains, prevented me from
so precipitate a proceeding. Besides, had I not
an objectwas not this Mr. Bush Halsey, and
was not Mr. Bush the brother of Mr. Bud Halsey,
and did not Mr. Bud Halsey have in charge my
beauty of the cloudmy fair unknownthe
dark-eyed, mysterious damsel of whom I was in
search? But where was she and that grisly
personage? Except in size, there was no
resemblance
between the supposed brothers. I
confess that when I recollected the rude stare
and deportment of the latter, I was in no great
anxiety to meet with
him
but my desire to see
her
rendered me comparatively indifferent even
on this head. I was soon to be relieved on some
of my doubts. We had now got into a region
of upland swamp, which bore some of the marks
3*
of a more civilized settlement. A corn-field
opened upon right and left, and cattle were
lowing
down the lane, wigwams appeared in sight,
and a troop of barn-fowls were strutting to and
fro in all the consciousness of corn and company.
Beyond, might be seen a tolerable log-cabin, from
which the cheerful smoke was arising, in a long
spiral column, through the patriarchal branches
of a clump of oaks.
Here, sir, is our wigwam. A little rough,
but not without its comforts. If we have not the
laws among us, we are not without those things
which the laws were intended to secure. Here,
too, you will find a few books, and if you are a
musician, there is flute and violin. I keep them,
still, rather as proofs of what I have been, than
what I am nowthough the enjoyment of music
is not absolutely inconsistent with the most
desolate
of human conditions.
I had observed, prior to this, that, on mor ethan
one occasion, the remarks of the senior had run
into a melancholy tone; and I now discovered that
there was a subdued expression in his countenance
that looked like a settled sorrow. There was no
unmanly whining, however, in what he said; but
the incidental and unforced utterance of an
habitual
feeling, which, at such moments, was an
appropriate
echo to the thought which he had
occasion
to express. We entered the house together.
It was the ordinary log hovel of the country. The
room or Hall upon which we entered was a small,
snug apartment, fourteen by sixteen. Its chinks
were all neatly covered with clapboards. Its
tables were of common pine,its chairs of
domestic
fabric also, seated with skins. Several tier of
rude shelves on one side of the apartment
contained
the books of which he had spoken, which were
certainly numerous for such a region. There,
too, were flute and violin. The windowthere
was but one in the apartment,was glazed and
hung with calico, and my eye was fixed upon a
slender rocking chair, which was cushioned with
calico, and stood very near the fire-place Such
a chair could not have supported the huge frame
of my host for ten minutes. By whom could it
be occupied? I looked round and listened in
vain. The dwelling had evidently no tenants but
ourselves. Here was a disappointment. But,
the rocking chair was a promise in which I put
some faith, and there were other proofs of a
female
presence around us. There was a bandbox,
speaking volumes of itself; and on one of the
tables I discovered a little open basket full of
squares of calico for quilting, and there was an
unfinished stocking, with the bright needles
sticking
in it, peering out from a corner of the
aforesaid
basket,and these were all signs of a
feminine
presence, which would not allow me to
despair
.
But let us hurry through the day. Mr.
Bush Halsey, for I soon discovered that it was
he, indeed, treated me with the most marked
attention
.
He played the country gentleman to
perfection. A servant came at his summons, a
neatly clad old African dame, who proceeded to
set the table, and get us refreshments. At times,
Mr. Halsey disappeared, leaving me to myself.
And when he came in, it was always to renew
some interesting conversation, and display his
own proficiency in all its topics. I began to be
very much pleased with the man, and, but for a
natural anxiety which I felt, as to my situation
and the result, which gave a little dullness and
restraint
to my manner,I should have shown
myself
quite as happy and as much at home, as I had
ever done at Leaside. That I was dull, Mr.
Halsey ascribed to my feelings on the subject of
the crime I had reported myself to have
committed
;
and though he did not discourage such
feelings, he addressed himself more than once to
the task of strengthening me under them. His
kindness was such that, even on his account, I
half repented of the game I was playing. But I
had not the courage to stop where I was. Indeed,
there was no stopping. The cards, so far, were
in my handsbut whether the prize deserved or
justified the venture, is a question to be solved
hereafter. Day passed, the night waned, and my
host showed me my apartment. For an hour
after
I had retired, I heard him playing upon the
flute, and in such mournful caprices of sound as I
never could have conceived before. It seemed
to me that, if a heart could ever speak in music,
such would have been the strains poured forth by
a breaking one. This ceased, and I must have
slept a little. I was certainly in a doze, when I
was startled by an unusual noise. A door was
grating, there was a bustle, the tread of several
feet, then boxes or trunks were hauled over the
floor, and there was a murmur of tongues,
subdued
,
as if to avoid unnecessary disturbance. This
was followed by the opening of another door, and
the voice of Mr. Halsey. Ah! Helen. Is that
you. Scarcely had he spoken, when other
accents
succeeded, which thrilled through my very
soul.
Yes, dear father. May I come in?
To be sure! was the reply.
I could fancy the kiss and the embrace which
followed. I could have sworn to that voice among
a thousand. The bustle ceased, the sounds died
away. There was no further stir that night. But
my sleep was gone. Thought was too busy in
my head for sleep; and with the first peep of
dawn I was out of bed; but not sooner than my
host. I saw him from my window, moving off
towards the swamp, accompanied by the grisly
guardian of my fair one. The tripping of light
feet in the adjoining hall, drew my attention thither.
Hurrying my toilet, I entered the apartment, and
as I expected, discovered the object of my search.
She sat in that very rocking-chair which had so
much interested me the night before. Her back
was to me, and she only half looked around as I
opened the door. When she saw me she started
to her feet with an exclamation of equal
apprehension
and surprise.
Ah! you here! she exclaimed. Oh!
wherefore have you come?
Did I not tell you that I could find you out
that I would follow?
Oh! why have you done so? She spoke in
manifest alarm, clasping her hands imploringly
as she did so.
And why not?
There is so much danger.
I do not care for danger.
But why risk it?
Because I love you.
You love me?oh, no! you must not. I am
not for you to love. I am a poor girl of the
woods. Go,leave me soon. There is danger
if you stay. You know notyou cannot guess
the danger.
No! There is no danger where you are.
I!I, myself, am danger, she exclaimed,
with a pretty energy. The people will not love
you herego home to your own. Flyleave
us. You cannot go too soon.
Your people shall be my people.
It cannot be. You have your own father,
your own mother.
They shall be yours.
No! no! my father is here!
He shall be mine!
Alas! you know not what you say. You
know not meyou know not him. If you knew!
If
you only knew!
and she clasped her hands
despairingly while she spoke.
Nothing could make me love you less. I
know
you
that you are beautiful and very dear
to me.
Say not so! Leave me. Go your ways
while there is yet time. Alas! I know not if it
is not too late already.
It
is
too late! I know where I amamong
whom I am. HelenI know all!
Alas! alas!She covered her face with her
hands.
But I would sooner be here with you, loving
you as I do, than among the civillest people in
the world. Only suffer me to love yousay
that you do not hate methat, were it with
yourself
,
you would not have me leave you.
Why should you think I could hate you?
I do not think so.
Do notdo not.
Ah, Helencould you grant me more. Could
you but say that you would receivereturn my
love.
I know not what it is to love.
Let me teach you.
No! no! you must go. I am a childI
must not listen and hear you talk such things.
You do not, cannot know the truthall the truth
Hear you, stranger
Call me not strangercall me friendcall
me Henry Colman.
Henryis that your name?
How sweetly did she speak the word! With
what interest! I could almost have renounced
my real name forever after that.
Yes.
Well, Henry, hear me, and believe me.
There are bad men here, very bad menthey
will do you hurt. Go home to your people while
you can. You are not safe here.
What! not with your father? He is good.
He will protect me.
Yes,
he
is good. He will do all that he can
for you, Henry,but he can not do all. My
uncle is a fierce manvery violentand it is not
always that my father can keep him from doing
wrong. Besides, Henry, my uncle likes you not.
He saw you at Yannaker's.
True,but there's no reason why he should
dislike me because he met me there.
No!but when he frowned, you frowned
too;and he didn't like that. He spoke of you,
Oh! if he comes back and sees you here!
I shall not fear him, Helen.
Beware of himdo not make him angry.
Let him beware of me!
Hush! You know not what you say. He
is the master here. He rules in the swamp. It
is he who has brought my father here. Hark!
They come. Oh! Henry, that you were gone
gone awaya thousand miles from this.
You with me, Helen, and your prayer should
be mine.
She cast upon me but one glance,but that
was sufficient. I felt, from that moment, that I
was the master of her heart.
CHAPTER VII.
The
moment after, her father and uncle entered
the room. The latter looked at me with a keen,
stern, searching glance.
Who's this? Who have we here?
He was answered by his brother.
The young man, Colman, of whom I spoke
to you.
Colman! Colman! I have seen his face
before
.
It was the time for me to speak.
You have, sir,at all events, I have seen
you. We met a few nights ago at one
Yannaker's
.
Your memory is good, I see, was his reply,
with something of a sneer in his accents. But
what brought you here? You followed us!
Scarcely, I think, else I should not have got
here before you. My horse had very much the
selection of the route to himself. In every
respect
he may be said to have brought me here.
And who are you? What is your name?
My name is ColmanHenry Colman, sir. I
am from West Tennessee. I have related to this
gentleman all the facts in my history necessary
to be known.
The tone of my speech was intended to show a
proper degree of resentment at the abruptness of
his, and to check the sort of cross-questioning to
which he seemed disposed to subject me. His
brother interposed.
Yes, Bud, you have already heard.
True,but what of that. I have no
objection
to hear again. Truth never suffers from
twice telling. I know the young fellow has
killed
his man about a horse, and flies here for
shelter
from the Sheriff. All very well, and very
straight;but what's the upshot of it. Does he
expect to remain here foreveror does he
propose
at some convenient day to return, and blab
every thing that he has seen and heard among
those who give him protection.
As a man of honor,I began.
He interrupted me.
Hark ye, lad, were you a spy upon us, you
would still insist, if questioned, that you are a
man of honor. Perhaps, it is not men of honor
that we want,but bondsmen. We deal with
our men as the devil is said to deal with them.
We take security for their good will to us, by
requiring
of them the performance of some evil
deed to others. Will you commit another crime?
You see I do not mince the matter. Will you
join us?
I gave a single glance at Helen Halsey. I
shall never forget the appealing expression of her
dark and dewy eyes. Her hands were clasped
her form bent forward, as if waiting for my
answer
.
That was tolerably prompt.
What if I say `No'?
Ha! you dare then? and his brow grew
black; the heavy muscles corrugating in little
knots above his eyes, like so many young serpents
coiled together, while his feet advanced, and his
shoulders seemed to work convulsively, as if
preparing
for a mighty struggle. I receded a step,
and put my hand into my bosom, as I replied:
I will not be driven by any man.
Here, Bush Halsey, Helen's father, interposed,
and drew the other aside. His words, which
were those of entreaty and expostulation, only
reached my ears in part;but the reply of the
other was fierce and loud.
You are a fool, Bush, for your pains, and I
am a greater fool for submitting to you, as I do.
You should not meddle in these matters at all.
You have nothing to do with them.
Here some words escaped me. Bush Halsey
again spoke, and his reply was entirely lost. He
spoke for several minutes, interrupted now and
then only by some single expletive, uttered
sometimes
in scorn, sometimes in impatience, by the
lips of the other. The final speech of the latter,
set me at rest for the moment.
Have it as you please. But let him not leave
your own premises. If I find him prowling
where he should not be, let him beware.
This was intended for my ears, for the glance
which accompanied the words, was bestowed
wholly upon myself. This said, he took one step
towards us, then, suddenly wheeling about,
without
a farther syllable to any, he strode from the
apartment. A moment before, and Helen had
retired
to her room. Her father then approached
me.
You hear the terms of your stay among us.
It makes your retreat a prison, yet that is
favorable
to your circumstances. No reproach can be
urged against you, for remaining where you are
under a sort of duresse. For your sake, I am
glad that it is so. My brother is a violent man.
We differ, as you may see, materially in temper.
He has been rendered more violent, and perhaps
unjust, by frequent injustice. Indeed, we have
both suffered from a like cause; but it is my
fortune
still to remain somewhat humanpossibly,
because I have been left one human blessing
which was denied to him. I am still a father.
But come. Walk with me now, and I will show
you your prison limits. You must not suppose
yourself without privileges. Your bounds are
not too close for sport and moderate exercise.
The island which I occupy is free to you in every
quarter, and it is not so small as you might
imagine. Come, I will shew you my dominions.
Our ramble was a long but pleasant one. My
prison was a spacious one, well wooded and
watered, completely insulated by creeks, and
admirably
chosen for the residence of a recluse.
My companion carried me to his favorite walks
pointed out his fishing trapshis choice fishing
grounds in spring and summera delectable
bathing place, and more than one ample area, in
which could be seen the implements of exercise,
the quoit, the bar, &c., all convenient, and all
arranged
with the eye of experience and art. At
certain points of view, I could see men on the
opposite
side of the creek, engaged in various duties,
some sawing or chopping, others busy about boats
and other matters, and now and then, one might
be seen peering through a copse, as if engaged
in no better business than that of seeing what his
neighbors were after. The redoubtable Bud
Halsey was no where visible. After all, my
prison limits were not without their attractions.
Every moment with Bush Halsey, proved him to
be more and more a man of thought and
observation
.
He was full of anecdote, sometimes
indulged
in a little fit of broad humor, and was at
all times the most interesting companion. And
when I thought of Helen, I smiled at the thought
which could suppose that I could feel any
privation
,
in the same prison bonds with her.
CHAPTER VIII.
I pass
over the events of a weeka period in
which I suffered no annoyance, not even seeing
for a moment the person of Bud Halsey. No
doubt he was busy at his usual operations. His
absence gave me no concern. Never was man
happier than myself. Never did time pass so
pleasantly. I began to love my venerable host,
as well as his daughter. He certainly showed
himself a most excellent man. Thoughtful,
tasteful
,
philosophical, his nightly conversations were
a rich treat that sometimes made me forget that
Helen was by my side. Then, he had a most
exquisite
skill in music. His flute, after I retired at
night, seemed the voice of some complaining
angel
.
It was so mellow, so wild, so sweet and
spiritually sad. Sometimes, at evening, when
Ellen would be absent, he would give me glimpses
of his life, and the causes of his present situation.
So far as I could gather from him, his worst crime
was bankruptcy. He owed money which he
could not pay. His person was threatened, and,
with a morbidly keen sense of freedom, that
shrunk from the idea of a goal as from
degradation
,
he fled to the uncultivated forestsstill in
possession
of the heathenseeking safety. His child,
meanwhile, remained with an aged relative. His
brother followed him, but with less innocent
conscience
.
His hands were stained with blood. He
had incurred, without hope or excuse, the doom
of outlawryoutlawry or death! But, on this
subject, Bush Halsey said but little. That he
should remain where he was, and in contact with
a brother, whose deeds he certainly ventured to
disapprove, is only to be accounted for by
assuming
for him a certain degree of phlegmatic
irresoluteness
of character. His temperament
possessed
nothing of the energy which distinguished
that of his brother. He was mild, playful and
persuasive; the other harsh, impetuous and
commanding
.
I need not add that, save by his
presence
,
he had no participation in the doings of the
banditti in the midst of whom he dwelt. If the
father improved upon acquaintance, how much
more did the daughter. She was, indeed a
wondrous
treasure of the wildernessnot simply
beautiful, but sagacious beyond her years and
sex,disguising, under the harmlessness of the
dove, the wisdom of the serpentunder the
simplicity
of the child, the forethought and mature
mindon all subjects not conventionalof the
high souled, intellectual woman. In merely
worldly matters, she was a child. She had no
concealments. The thought spoke out in her
eloquent eye, ere her lips could utter itthe
feeling
glowed, with a speech of its own, upon her
cheeks, ere yet her mind could embody its
character
in thought. How soon did she show me
that I had won her heart, and how confidingly,
then, did she walk with me, speak with me,let her
fancy have its utterance, though every syllable
and look betrayed her soul's dependence on my
own. We rambled and we read togethershe
sang and I listenedas if we were both of the
same household. We made every foot of our
island limits our own. She knew the restraints
set upon my footsteps, and when, in the delight
of my heart, and the buoyant impulses of my
spirit, I would have launched into the canoe, or
borne her across the tree that spanned the creek,
and conducted to the opposite territory, she caught
my hand and restrained me.
Do you think I fear, Helen?
But for my sake, Henry.
For her sake, it seemed to me, as if I could
have done or forborne anything.
Thus we lived, and lovedneed I say how
happily, with how few qualifications. Yet
qualifications
there were. How was this to end? The
question forced upon me a sort of
self-examination
,
which, as it never resulted in my own
acquittal
,
I never allowed it to be a protracted one.
My conscience smote me for the game I was
playing with this dear young creature. I really
had no purposes. It seemed as if I could have
lived with her, and her only, all my life; but the
idea of living all my life in that swamp retreat
was unendurable. And to carry home with me
as my bride, the daughter of an outlaw,or, at
all events, the niece of one,was not to be
thought of. I had lived too long in the world of
convention not to have acquired certain laws and
lessons which were fatal to the philosophies of
any being so purely unsophisticated as Helen
Halsey. Her heart was mine, but not her
philosophies
.
Yet, truth to speak, I meditated no evil.
I did not meditate this matter at all. Life was
simply passing away in a delightful dream, and I
was too much the boy to be willing to disturb its
pleasant progress before the necessary time. But
there were other qualifications to my enjoyment
besides my own reflections. I discovered that my
steps were closely watched. On the occasion when
I first made this discovery, I had been standing
with Helen on the bluff of a creek, admiring the
proportions of as lovely a cockle-shell of a canoe
as ever danced over an Indian water. I had been
trying to tempt her to enter with me. She had
resisted and dissuaded me, and while we were
discussing the project, my eye had suddenly
caught the glimpse of a living object directly
before
me, on the opposite side of the creek. In
that quarter the copse was exceedingly dense.
Canes and water-grasses grew down to the very
lips of the stream, and in the rear was a thick
hedge of evergreens, shrubs and brambles,
slightly
sprinkled by heavy timber. A second look
betrayed to me a pair of eyes keenly fixed upon
our movements. In a moment they had
disappeared
.
I quickly conceived the necessity of
saying nothing on the subject of my discovery,
and showing nothing in my deportment which
could make it apparent to the spy himself. But
4
the circumstance left me less at ease than
formerly
.
Another day, within the same week, turning
suddenly a little lane, with Helen, we passed three
men, who observed us very closely. One of these
men, particularly, struck me as one whom I had
seen before, and the manner in which he eyed me,
disquieted me, as tending to show that he too was
striving in the work of recognition. But he
passed
on, and, with so many objects to divert and
interest my thoughts, it was not likely that this
should linger very long in my memory. I am very
sure it would not have done so, but for other events
of like nature, which kept the recollection fresh.
Meanwhile, where was Bud Halseythat
formidable and fierce bandit? I had seen
nothing
of him since that parting which had been
so nearly a
meeting
. I was not sorry at his
absence, and Helen shared my feelings.
I'm so glad, said she, one day, as we loitered
through as close a copse as ever favored the
wishes of two foolish hearts;I'm so glad Uncle
Bud is gone. Some how, Henry, I tremble when
I think of him, on your account. You have
defied him, and he don't like you.
Nay, he can scarce be offended with me
because
I showed a proper manliness. Besides,
what care we? So long as I do not pass the
boundaries, there can be no chance of our
quarreling
,
and I'm sure, Helen, unless you go with me,
I do not care how long I remain in them. I
could remain here for ever.
Ah! you say so, but
Truth, Helen. Have I not told youhow
oftenhow much I love you? But you, Helen,
have not spoken once. Will you not tell me,
dearest, that you love me, too?
Oh! no! I do not feel as if I could say the
word.
But you feel it, Helen?
Oh! yes,I feel as you could wish me;
and she turned and threw herself into my arms,
burying her face upon my breast, and weeping
unrestrainedly. Reader, were you a boy once?
have you a heart?did you ever love? If
yea to these,you understand what I cannot
describethat moment of happiness! Until then
I had regarded that verse in which Coleridge
speaks of a similar event, as an exaggeration. In
my silly conceits of conventionliving among
artificial men and womenI had thought it
wholly out of reason, and all natural laws, that
an innocent girl should be so audacious. But that
scene convinced meI could neither doubt the
love, the truth, or the innocence of that dear
child of the wilderness, and sweet and sacred to
me now are those nature-prompted lines of the
Bard of Genevieve:
Her bosom heavedshe stept aside,
As conscious of my look she stept,
Then suddenly, with timorous eye,
She fled to me and wept.
She half enclosed me with her arms,
She pressed me with a meek embrace,
And bending back her head, looked up,
And gazed upon my face.
'Twas partly love, and partly fear,
And partly 'twas a bashful art,
That I might
rather feel than see
The swelling of her heart.
And thus we stood, thus we clung to each other,
forgetting earth, almost forgetting heaven,if
such forgetfulness were possible, at a moment
when we were in the enjoyment of that bliss,
most like heavenly, the dearest known to earth
the full, precious acknowledgment, in the heart
that we seek, of that passion which is flaming
triumphant in our own!
CHAPTER IX.
How long we remained thus, for how many
moments she clung thus passionately to my bosom,
I cannot tell. The sense of enjoyment seemed to
blind and render obtuse all the ordinary senses.
I saw nothing, heard nothing, felt nothing, was
conscious of nothing, but her sobs, her glistening
eyes, upturned and seeming to melt in the intense
gaze of my own, and that beating heart, which
seemed bursting to yield itself to the custody of
mine. In that moment we were torn asunder.
A strong grasp was laid upon my shoulder, and
I was hurled to the ground, half stunned, with a
heavy knee upon my breast. In the same instant,
the savage tones of Bud Halsey told me but too
truly whence came the assault. It was under
him I lay, with two of his myrmidons at hand,
busy in preparing the ropes which were to bind
me. Recovering from her first terror and
surprise
,
Helen clung to his arms, imploring my
release. But he repulsed her with rude hands
and bitter accents.
Away, you are bold, wantondo you not
blushdo you not hang your head in shame?
Have not my own eyes surprised you in the
embrace of this traitor?
Traitor! was my exclamation.
Ay, traitortraitor and liar! We have
discovered
you. You are found out.
I did not speak. I struggled, but I need not
say how fruitlessly. I was in the arms of a giant,
and while he held me firmly, his two assistants
passed their lines about my wrists, securing my
arms behind my back. I was then permitted to
rise.
There, said my enemy, with a bitter
laughter
there,
Helen Halsey, behold your lover.
Oh! shameshame upon you, Helen! What
will your father say?
My father! He is here! she exclaimed,
with an accent in which delight and suffering
seemed equally expressed. Oh, father! how
glad I am that you are come. Save him! Do
not let them hurt himhe is innocent!
It was at this opportune moment that the father
made his appearance. She darted forward as
she beheld him, caught his arm and drew him
forward. His countenance was marked by doubt
and inquiry, and was grave to sternness. He
gave me but a single glance.
Bud Halsey! what is this? Why have you
bound the youth?
The serpent! You have been harboring a
serpent in your bosom.
`What mean you?
'Tis as I thought. This fellow is a traitor
a spy upon us. He shall die the death of one.
Oh, no! no! He is no spyno traitor.
Such was the exclamation of the maid. The
uncle turned upon her like a hyena.
As for you, Miss, you should he silent for
shame. Send her away, Bush Halseyshe has
no business here. I found her in the arms of this
fellowclose huggedlip to lip! Ha! did I
not?
Helen! exclaimed the father.
The girl's face was covered with her hands
her head droopedshe seemed ready to sink into
the earth.
Go home, Helen!
She looked up timidly.
Oh, father, you will save him? He is no
traitor! He is innocent!
Are
you?
he demanded in freezing accents.
Oh! my father! she cried in tones of mingled
agony and reproach, as she threw herself upon his
breast, and hid her face in his bosom. For a
moment
he seemed to press her there, then suddenly
pushing her from him, uttered sternly but the
single wordHome!
She receded from him, looked at me with a
glance of deepest apprehension, then clasping her
hands, as if in prayer, moved slowly out of sight.
CHAPTER X.
When
she had disappeared the father spoke.
Now, Bud Halsey, what is all this?
It seems to me plain enough. Have I not
told you? This fellow is a spy upon usa
traitor
.
He has liedhis whole story is a lie!
The old man looked at me with stern but
sorrowful
glance.
It is false! I am no traitor. I had uttered
this assurance beforehad spoken several times,
particularly when the rude assault was made
upon
Helen by her brutal uncle;but, in my
excitement
,
though I very well heard and
understood
what was said by everybody else, I knew
not well what I said myself. My asseveration
now seemed to have very little effect,upon Bud
Halsey at least.
Oh, my good fellow, we expect your denials.
We look for no admissions from you,no truth,
as long as a lie will serve your purposes.
A lie! I exclaimed writhing furiously in my
ropes.
Ay, a lie! Look not so indignant at the
charge, my lad,we have made the discovery,
that a lie comes easy to you. Your invention is
good. But you will pay for it. You hang, by
all that's powerful, to-morrow morning!
Hang! said Bush Halsey.
Even so!
Pshaw, Bud!you cannot mean it. You are
not serious?
As a judge! as a judgethe supreme judge,
without appeal, in all this region,I have
doomed
him. He dies by sunrise.
The affair was looking serious. The ruffian
continued,interrupting the expostulations of his
brother.
The long and short of the matter is this. I
have discovered that this lad, for his own
purposes
,
has come among us with a lie in his mouth.
Suspecting him at first, I dispatched Monks to
Tennessee, to make inquiry as to the truth of the
story which he told us. He has been all through
Franklin County, and finds that the Sheriff has no
process against any person named Henry
Coleman
,
that nobody of the name of Backus has been
murdered there, and the whole affair is a mere
invention of this chap to find his way among us.
Now what can be his object but treachery. He
is a creature of the Sheriff. He would betray
us. Well! he probably understands the
conditions
of his venture. He must abide them. You
know our laws. He too shall know them.
I cannot think the youth an enemy, Bud
Halsey
,and
you recollect he is my guest.
And you are mine. You have no right to
harbor a spy. Our safety makes this necessary.
As for his being no enemy, that is possible, but I
think him otherwise. Besides, as your guest, he
has proved himself unworthy of trust, since he
seeks the first opportunity to dishonor your
daughter.
You are a foul-mouthed liar!I exclaimed,
I love Helen Halsey. Never was mortal love
less free from taint than mine. This, indeed,
brought me here. I met her for the first time at
Yannaker'swas pleased with her, and set out to
find her. Circumstances helped me in the
pursuit
,
and prompted the story which I told. It is
true I am no murdererno outlaw. But motive
beyond what I have told you, I had none.
Nothing
but an honorable passion has prompted me
in what I have done. This alone has brought
me here.
An honorable passion prompt a lie! said the
outlaw, with a sneer. But, he resumed, if this
be true, you are ready to marry Helen Halsey?
4*
His keen eye seemed bent to search me through.
The eye of the father also seemed on a sudden
to watch me with a new interest. At that
moment
the idea struck me that the whole affair was
a piece of practicea conspiracy among them
to force me into marriage; and, with this
conjecture
,
indignant that I should be thus hampered,
and forced into an engagement of the sort, I
forgot
the claims of poor Helennay, connected
her with the schemesuppressed my own strong
yearnings for the prize thus proffered me, and
replied
doggedly:
I would not be compelled to marry an angel.
Nor shall my child be forced on any one, Bud
Halsey.
Pshaw, Bush, you are a child yourself. How
know you, man, that the measure is not necessary
for her safety. Aylook not so black and
scowling
do
you not suppose I feel like yourself?
but I say it againto save herto save her from
shame!
The frame of the old man was violently
agitated
.
His lips were blanched to perfect
whiteness
;for
an instant his eyes glared on me with
an expression akin to that tiger-look which his
brother habitually wore,and he exclaimed:
Speak not of this to me, Bud Halsey. I will
not hear it even from your lips. Could I think
it true, I should do murder myself. But it is not
trueit cannot be true. Helen is as pure as
any angel!
She is! I exclaimed, fervently.
Very well! I am glad to hear itI am
willing
to believe it. You surely cannot be unwilling
to marry an angel?
The old man interrupted the outlaw.
I tell you, Bud Halsey, that my child must
not be named again in this business.
And I tell you, Bush Halsey, that unless this
traitor weds with Helen Halsey by sunrise
tomorrow
,
he sees the last sunrise of his life. He
dies an hour after. Take him away, men, and
keep him safe in the new den!
CHAPTER XI.
I was
seized by a couple of stout ruffians, who
lifted me, head and feet, as if I had been a mere
sack of straw, and hustled off upon their shoulders
to the edge of the creek where a boat lay, into
which I was tumbled with as little remorse as
was shewn to Fallstaff when they emptied him
out of the wick-basket into the Thames. They
pulled down with me something like a mile, then
landed on a sort of island, which seemed to be
covered with an almost impervious forest. Once
more lifted upon their shoulders, I was borne
through narrow avenues of the wood a distance
of some three hundred yards or more. Our course
seemed to be a winding one. We at length
reached a very strong log-house, consisting of a
single apartment, probably twelve feet square.
The logs were hewn and fitted closely. They
were of the heaviest kind. There was no
window
,
and but a single, and that a very low door,
into which I was thrust headlong. Here I was
leftthe door fastened behind me, in a darkness
that was rather increased than relieved, by an
occasional
gleam of sunshine that stole here and
there through chink or creviceto brood over my
condition, and reconcile myself to the future
prospect
with what philosophy I could command.
That prospect was no ways encouraging, and my
philosophy was not of the most composing or
consoling nature. I confess it, boy-like, I fell into
very ridiculous and childish furies, the recollection
of which, to this day, brings the blush into my
face. I raved, and swore, and flung myself about
upon the damp earth until I was tired. A few
hours brought me to my senses. Darkness and
silence are great subduers of passiongreat
promoters
of reflection. Why will not our
legislators
discover this, and substitute imprisonment
for life in place of that code, equally barbarous
and ineffective, which violently tears away the
sacred life principle, from the temple, made after
the image of God, in which he has enshrined it?
In the darkness of the scenea gloom, thick and
seemingly solid and tangiblewhich was spread
around me,and that awful stillness which
seemed
to breathe in slumbers of the graveI began to
recover my half-banished senses. I began to
consider my situation. What was that? What
was I to do? What was my hope? It was now
clear to me that, in spite of the kindness of Bush
Halsey's nature, he was powerless to save me.
He himself lived but upon terms with his outlawed
brother, who, I was now persuaded, was as
reckless
in his ferocity as he was unscrupulous in all
moral performances. That Bush Halsey would
try, as he had already tried, to save me, I had no
question, even though he might have entertained
some of the loathsome suspicions which his
brother
had tried to thrust into his mind. But I had
marked too well the natural and enforced
expression
of defiance which the outlaw had shown
towards himself, not to feel very sure that there
was no hope from his interposition. And, as for
the sweet, suffering Helen! She would pray, I
knewshe would be sleepless in the toil in my
behalf;but what would it avail? I had already
seen, in her frequent deportment, how much fear
she entertained of her brutal uncle, and though
the might acquire greater courage in approaching
him than usual, having my danger in view, yet, I
could not deceive myself into the notion that much
good would result from any of her entreaties.
Well,the substance of my reflections led me
only to this. I was in the meshesin a den of
thieves and murderers, doomed to death, and
hoping nothing either from their mercy, or
their dread of legal vengeance. But there was
one alternative,one outletallotted me of
escape
to
wed with Helen Halsey! Well, could
I stickle to avail myself of this alternative?
Nay, was not this my own desire but five
hours before? Would I not have esteemed such
a prize, a treasure beyond all price, but a little
while agothe sole, great object of my desire?
Strange, indeed, what perverse mortals we are.
My pride revolted at the idea of being forced
into
the possession of that which I desired beyond
all other objects. I now persuaded myself that
uncle and father, were both in a scheme to force
me into these nuptialsthat it was a cunning
device
to restore to society some of her outcasts
one of those petty, dirty little tricks of a base and
cunning nature, of which I was to be the victim.
I need not say with what loathing I revolted at
this suggestionhow indignant it made me to
think, that they could fancy me so dastardly,
or so blindand I resolved rather to meet my
fate, than dishonor my father's family, by
connecting
myself with such a brood. Let me do
myself justice, however. I never for a moment
suspected Helen of any consciousness of this
design
.
NoI
felt
that she was pure and true. I
did not think it. My heart prevented my thoughts
in her case, and, every feeling within me rose in
arms against the slightest suggestion of my
reason
to this effect. Her heart had been pressed
against my ownher face, covered with mingling
tears and blushes, had been buried in my bosom,
and that sacred pressure had been enough, not
only to endear her to me forever, but to make me
confident in her truth and loyalty. Ah! that
first press of heart to heart, when both hearts are
young and ardent. What a volume does it
teach! What a life does it embody!how full
of assurances and inquiries, and promises and
hopes,sweet regrets,and pleasures, so acute,
as almost to be akin to pain! That first kiss of
lovethat first dear, stolen embrace,the
keenest
joy of life, to which none after bears likeness,
in comparison with which all other joys are
dwarfed! Still, quivering in my whole soul with
the rapture of this embrace, I could not think of
the dear girl, with whom I shared it, but as a
victim like myself. Yet, so thinking, I would not
stomach the necessity of being forced to wed
her, by the imperious will of a person I despised.
The more I brooded on this threatened necessity,
the more I revolted from it, and resolved against
it. `No!' I exclaimed bitterly, in all the heroics
of boyhood,`sooner let me perish!'
Having reached this conclusion, I found
composure
.
I stretched myself at length upon the
ground, which I had now leisure to see was
strewed pretty thickly with dried leaves, and was
surprised by sleep;and, dreaming of a fierce
and deadly struggle with the outlaw, Bud
Halsey
,
I was awakened, somewhere about midnight,
by a rough hand laid upon my shoulder,a rough
voice, which I too well remembered, in my ears
and, flashing in my eyes, a huge torch, by the
blaze of which I was half stupified and blinded.
The intruder was Bud Halsey. He stuck the
torch in a crevice of the wall, and calmly seating
himself before me, regarded me with a glance of
the keenest inquiry. I need not say that I
returned
it with one of scorn and defiance, and we
looked upon one another in this manner, in a
silence which lasted for several minutes. At
length, he said:
You do not seem to understand your true
condition, young man. Did you suppose that I
was trifling with you when I sent you here?
If you were, I answered, it is a sort of
trifling which I should be very loth to forgive,
should the moment ever arrive when resentment
would be to any purpose. I cannot suppose you
were trifling.
You are a lad of more sense than I had given
you credit for. The rest ought to be easy. You
see your condition. You have heard your fate.
You have had time for reflection. Are you
prepared
?
Will you choose? Will you hang, or
marry the foolish girl you have dishonored?
You dishonor her by your foul breath, and
foul imagination. She is pure as heaven.
Pshaw! young man! Do you suppose me
as unread as yourself in the history of human
nature? Do I not know the weakness of woman's
nature, and the recklessness of man's nature,
when occasion serves and opportunity invites?
But this as it may. I give you an alternative.
If you have not wronged Helen Halsey, and you
love her, as you profess, so much the less should
be your reluctance to marry her. If you did not
design to marry her before, as I suppose from
your unwillingness now, there is every reason
for suspecting you as I do, and taking for granted
all the worst that one evil nature can imagine of
another. On this subject we need waste no
words. The simple question is before you. Will
you marry her?
Where is her father? I would see and speak
with him.
You cannot.
Why not? He will not refuse me.
But I will! Look you, young man, Bush
Halsey is, in some respects, as great a simpleton
as yourself. If he had a voice in the matter, he
would send you home to your mother, perhaps
fill your pockets with ginger-bread, pat you on
the head, bid you go on your way rejoicing, and
shed a flood of benevolent tears at your departure.
But I am the master here! I am the outlaw! I
do and counsel the robberies, and, if you please,
I command and execute the murders. You know
enough to make the task of confession on my
part a very easy one. You know too much!
And this is the true reason of your predicament.
You came here of your own free will, knowing
among whom you came, and practising deception
and falsehood to wind yourself in among our
secrets. You are a spy, and our situation is such
as to render us rather unscrupulous with that
sort of persons. But I am willing to please my
brother, and to gratify my niece. They are
pleased with you, and I have not scrupled to say,
and I repeat, notwithstanding your denials, that I
think it necessary that you should marry her. It
is for this reason that I propose to you this
alternative
,
grant you this time for reflection, and
seek you out at midnight to enlighten you more
fully on the necessity of the thing. Had it not
been for this, I should have had you knocked on
the head without a word of parley; and, sure that
we should have no further trouble at your hands,
should be now comfortably asleep, instead of
sitting here, at midnight, endeavoring to make
you sensible of your danger. There nowyou
have the whole, and what is your answer?
The whole manner of the outlaw was so
contemptuous
,
his tones so cold and sneering, his
suggestions so unfeeling, and everything about
him so offensive to my feelings, that I forgot my
own danger, and replied promptly:
Nothing! I have no answer.
Nothing! You have no answer?
None for
you
.
Very good! I leave you! You may look
for me at sunrise, when you may probably be
better able to find an answer. Good night.
Coolly detaching the torch from the wall, he
waved it around so as to take in at a glance the
entire apartment, and without further word, left
the dungeon. The door was carefully fastened
behind him, and the sound of voices without, led
me to the conclusion that he did not omit the
precaution
of placing a guard upon the premises. In
a few moments more I was left in darkness, and
to my own reflections. These were not so gloomy.
They were of a stern and angry sort. I had been
irritated, not subdued, and, to confess a truth, I
could not bring myself to believe that the case
was so desperate as the outlaw made it appear.
I could not think that Bush Halsey was so
powerless
,
or that I should be abandoned to such a
cruel fate. It was all a contrivance to terrify
me into certain measures, and it was only a test
of manliness which was to hold out longest. I
was resolved not to show the white feather, and,
after a while, fell asleep, as if nothing threatened
in the morning.
CHAPTER XII.
No
! No! I exclaimed at waking, which I
did early,my neck was never made for a
halter
.
I tried to raise my hands to it as if to
assure
myself that there was not one already around
it, but the ropes with which I had been bound,
and which, for the moment, I had forgotten,
checked somewhat the exulting nature of my
thoughts, as they checked the movements of my
arms. I had been dreaming of the events which
had taken place, and my exclamation was
probably
due to the character of my dreaming
thoughts. I now repeated it, as if to assure
myself
,
but it called up as unpleasant and unnatural
an echo, as ever was heard in Killarney. The
voice of Bud Halsey, speaking outside, replied:
That's a matter about which no man is sure
for thirty minutes. In fifteen, a cord may be
adjusted
,
and where the woods are convenient, the
affair may be all over in twenty. In your case,
it still depends upon yourself whether you escape
the present danger. You have still a few minutes
to sunrise!
The suddenness of the response, its character,
and the character of the man by whom it was
spoken, all combined to send a chill through my
body, which it had not felt before. The next
moment the door opened, and he appeared before
me. You have already had a description of the
man, but now there was a sly grin upon his
features
which they did not usually wear, and which
seemed to betray a sort of satisfaction which he
yet labored to discourage and keep down. The
effort of a man passionate by nature, to subdue
the show of impulses which are yet grateful, will
usually result in some such conflict upon the
features
,
than which, perhaps, there is nothing more
unpleasant to behold. I had much rather seen
him furious.
Well, young man, he said, entering, the
time is at hand for your final answer. You have
till sunrise. It will not be ten minutes before you
see his red streaks on the top of that pine. Bring
him out, men, that he may see more easily.
His orders were obeyed, and I found myself,
still bound hand and foot, laid down before the
door of the dungeon which I had just occupied.
I now felt the cold, which I had not experienced
to any very unpleasant degree during the night.
But now I was chilled and uncomfortable, and
what with the rigid position in which my limbs
were fixed, and the effect of the keen morning
breeze upon me, coming out suddenly as I did
from one of the closest log houses, my teeth
almost
chattered. I fancied that the outlaw
perceived
my discomfort, and that he probably
ascribed
it to another cause, for his features put on
that same expression of a satisfaction, which he
yet labored to conceal. It was with some effort
of will, that I succeeded in keeping down my
tremors. There were some four persons, stout
ruffians, loitering about. One was busy in
building
a fire, two others stood apart at some little
distance, conversing in low tones together and
looking occasionally at me, while, directly at my
side, sat a fourth, coolly disentangling a
plough-line
,
the probable uses of which I did not venture
to conjecture. But it did not help much to lessen
my shivering tendency.
Step back a moment, Warner, said the
outlaw
to this assistant. The lad has little time
for talk.
The fellow did as he was bidden. He looked
upon me as he moved away, and I fancied that I
knew his features. I had seen him gazing at me
once before, while I walked with Helen, and it
then seemed to me that I had seen him elsewhere.
I was now sure of it,but where? At all events,
if he ever knew me before, there was every
reason
to apprehend that he also would remember
me. But I had not time to think of him. When
he had withdrawn, Bud Halsey began, as he
always
did, with sufficient abruptness.
Well, young man! the time is at hand for
your final answer. You may not know meyou
may think me jesting,anything, but serious
but look you, as I live, and as the sun shines,
by Heaven, or by Hell, there is but one escape
for you from death, and that is by marriage with
my niece. Nothing else can save you; and, but
for what I suppose to be her situation, her
feelings
,
and those of Bush Halsey, who has very
much the feelings of a girlbut for them, even
this choice should not be allowed you. Nay, to
show you how large is the concession which I
make, I tell you that I now know you to be the
son of one of my deadliest enemies, one of those
men who have made me what I am, and to whom
I owe nothing but undying hate. Your father, in
his official capacity, as Judge of the Supreme
Court of Alabama, robbed me, by an unrighteous
decision, of lands and fortune. Enough, Master
Henry Meadows, otherwise Colman, you see
where you are, what is known of you, and
expected
,
and what you have to expect. You see the
men are in waiting, the cord is ready, and you
are already under the tree from which you may
be suspended. It has borne as stout a man
before
.
He turned from me as he spoke, and joined the
two men who were conversing at a little distance,
said a few words to them, pointed towards me,
then disappeared in the wood. But a few
moments
had elapsed, when he again came in sight,
and approached me.
Your answer, Henry Meadows?
The smile had disappeared from his features.
The face was savage and stern in the extreme.
There was nothing there of encouragement, and
during his absence my own reflections were of a
confused and conflicting character. I need not
say that I could not convince myself of the
earnestness
and sincerity of the manI could not
persuade
myself, that such a destiny was really
contemplated
for me. My pride determined my
course. Was I to be made a laughing-stock, a
buttpointed at as one scared into marriage
led to the altar, through dread of the halter!
even the jingle of the words suggested itself to
me at the moment, and the thought that such a
jingle would commend the anecdote, in future
days at my expense, contributed to strengthen
me in my resolution of defiance. My answer
was ready.
I defy you, Sir. Do with me as you please,
But you shall not force me to your purpose.
He hesitatedgazed at me for a moment, as I
fancied, with an expression of chagrin, and then
replied:
Very well, young man,as
you
please! I
have done all that I couldmore than I ever
expected
to do to save any one caught in your
situation
.
Your blood upon be your own head. Ho!
fellows!
He waved his hand and the subordinates drew
nigh.
Are you ready? Secure your man!
In the twinkling of an eye, I was caught up
and placed upon my feet, while the fellow named
Warner, adjusted the defiling cord about my
neck, and, with the end in his hand, proceeded to
climb the tree under which I stood. I writhed
in my bondsI could not struggle, for hand and
feet were equally secured. But my writhing
was in vain. Indeed, so well fastened had I been,
that, but for the support of one of the outlaws, I
could not have kept my feet. The moment
was one of unmixed horror. I began to fear
that the farce was to become a tragedy. I
looked
searchingly into the face of the outlaw, but it
expressed nothing but the most dogged
determination
.
The sun, at the same instant, threw a
golden crown upon the brow of a towering pine,
some thirty yards in advance of the spot where I
stood. I shivered! Where
was
Bush Halsey?
Where Helen? My head seemed to swim. I
was growing blind. Father, mother!could this
all be true! was I thus doomed! Torn from you,
to see you never more! I felt that my senses
were insecurethat I could no longer depend
upon them,but I could hearhear every
syllable
,
every breathing. That one faculty seemed
to grow doubly acute at the expense of all the
rest. There was a whispering among the
accessories
.
Then came the deep but low words
of the principal.
Run him up! There's no use to wait. He's
pluck to the last. He'll die game!
I felt the motionmy feet were gone from
under me. I strove to cry aloud, but the words
subsided into a husky murmur, and I resigned
myselfhowwith what gracewith what hope
with what thoughts, if any,to the last terrible
change!when, sudden, I heard a crya
piercing
shriekI knew the tones of that voiceI
5
knew the nature of that cry! The voice was
Helen's,the cryoh! God! it was the lost
woman's appealfor mercy, mercy, mercy! I
too strove to echo the cry, but I was choking.
I could hear the hollow gurgling of the breath in
my own throatI could feel it!That was all!
CHAPTER XIII.
I was
conscious of a sudden but not unpleasant
concussion. I awakened, opened my eyes, and
found myself upon the ground, with Helen
clinging
to me, and plucking at the cord about my
neck,while the outlaw was contending almost
violently with her father. I understood the affair
in a few moments. Bush Halsey still held in his
grasp the knife with which he had smote the
cord by which I was suspended. I had been
rescued at the last momentrescued, it was very
evident from what I then saw, without any
participation
in the act by the outlaw. He still
appeared
resolute upon my death, and, by the
numerous gathering of ruffians by whom he was
surrounded, and who seemed only to await his
final orders, I felt very certain that the dreadful
scene must be renewed. I spare the arguments
and expostulations of Bush Halsey. I say
nothing
of the tears and entreaties of Helen.
Let him submitlet him obey!let him act
as a man of honor!was the final answer of the
outlaw.
He willhe will submit! was the cry of
Helenpoor girlnot knowing what was the
requisition.
Give him time
treat
him as a man of honor!
was the answer of her father.
The tears of Helenher beautythe
passionate
and unmeasured interest which she expressed
in my fateno longer restrained by the dread
of her uncle,the awe of her father, or the natural
apprehension and modesty of her sexdid more
to reconcile me to compliance than did all the
violence of the outlaw!
Hear me, I exclaimed, interrupting the
dispute
;hear
me, sir,addressing Bud Halsey,
had you been more reasonable, and less
violent at first, all would have been easy. I am
willing to marry Helennay, should have sought
her, in due time, at the hands of her father. It
was in pursuit of her that I sought out your
retreat
in the swamp, and it was in order to obtain
more ready admission that I framed the story of
a crime which I had never committed. My
hands are innocent of blood, and I am no spy
upon you. Under the ardent passion which
brought me here, I should have regarded the
hand of Helen as the dearest blessing which
could be bestowed upon me, and I am only sorry
that your violence, by wounding my pride, should
have prompted me, even for a moment, to reject
such a boon. I do not ask for lifeI make no
such prayer to youI can die, I trust, like a
manbut I am willing to comply with your
conditions
!
Loose him! was all that Bud Halsey
vouchsafed
to say, as he turned off.
Oh! my Henry! was the exclamation of
poor Helen, as she swooned away upon my
bosom.
CHAPTER XIV.
But
the swoon of joy occasions no
apprehensions
.
My bonds were severed, and Helen
recovered
,
so that we were enabled to return
together
to the cottage of her father. He was
kind to me, but grave. It is not improbable that
Bud Halsey had succeeded in filling him with
some of the base suspicions which were strong
in his own bosom. Helen was happy, with a
sort of uneasy happiness. Whether she seemed
to doubt the reality of the event, or that she felt
that my consent to the marriage with her had
been somewhat extorted, in spite of my avowals,
I cannot say,but, though smiling and declaring
herself blest, there was a restless, feverish
excitability
in her action and movements which did not
usually mark them. For my own part, I was
sore equally in mind and body. The latter had
not passed through the humiliating scenes just
described without undergoing some hurts and
bruises. But these were as nothing to the
mental
annoyances which the same events had
produced
.
I had been trampled upondishonored
my person degraded by the hands of ruffians,
and by the shameful and defiling rope. I
felt mean and humbled, and, it may be, that,
showing something of this feeling, in my
intercourse
with Helen, I had caused in her that
appearance
of inquietude which marred, in some
degree
,
the more grateful appearance of her
happiness
.
But I must not linger on this matter. Bud
Halsey was a man to move with all imaginable
promptness, and that very night he made his
appearance
at the cottage, accompanied by a young
man, decently clad in black, with something of
the outward appearance of a Divine. Such he
was, if we may be permitted to make certain
allowances
,
of which more hereafter. He was
introduced
to me as the Rev. Mr. Mowbraya
gentleman of the Episcopal persuasion. He was
a fine looking young man of florid complexion, a
bright blue eye with a restless roving twinkle,
which betrayed an unsettled and capricious
disposition
.
His temperament and the general
expression
of his features, showed the presence of
strong, unregulated passions. Surprised at seeing
him where he was, and procured with so much
readiness, I was still more surprised to learn that
he was a regular resident of the swampone of
the communitysharing in its spoils, and,
possibly
,
though of this I could say nothing, partaking
in all its miserable practices. The singular moral
anomaly of the criminal, influenced by superstition,
and insisting upon having a sort of religion of his
own, even while engaged in the grossest violation
of all moral and divine laws, is too well known
and of too frequent occurrence, to render
necessary
here any elaborate metaphysics. Perhaps,
the wonder is, that such contradiction should be
found among a Protestant people. In such
countries
as Italy and Spain, the anomaly, if still
difficult
of explanation, is yet, because of our
familiarity
with its occurrence, of less startling effect and
character. There, it has been usual to refer it
to the mixed influences of a bad political
government
,
and the habitual training of a priesthood,
forever indefatigable in the maintenance of its
powers. The crime is partly the result of
necessity
and circumstances,the superstition of mixed
ignorance and training. The same anomaly in
America, and with the descendants of the ancient
Puritans, must find some other explanation. Here,
it was, undeniably; and I soon found that the
Reverend Mr. Mowbray, was not only useful (?)
where he was, but that there were frequent
occasions
for his services. The sick had his prayers,
and the burial at which he did not officiate was a
subject of no little dissatisfaction among the living
friends of the deceased. On the Sabbath, when
the
business
of the community was not urgent,
his preaching was well attended. Subsequently,
I was given to understand, that, it was owing to
the expression of some discontent on the part of
one of the assistants, that I was not to be allowed
the ghostly help of this gentleman, on the
morning
of my execution, that led to the delay in
carrying
into effect the sentence of the Outlaw Chief,
and so, accordingly, to my rescue. Complying
with the suggestion of the subordinate, Bud
Halsey
sent for his chaplain, and thus my danger
became
noised abroad, so as to reach the ears of
Helen and her father, in season to bring them to
my rescue. You may take for granted, that, from
that moment, I readily recognised the importance
of a regular chaplain to a band of robbers. My
bride made her appearance in all her beauty, and
with all the usual becoming blushes. Beautiful
she was, and the simplicity of her costume, amply
set off and distinguished the peculiarity of her
charms. I forgot, as I surveyed her, the painful
circumstances which had conducted me to this
event. I thought of nothing but the passion with
which she now filled mehow lovely she was in
my eyeshow precious to my heart. I took her
hand with rapture, and, for a moment, had no
feeling but one of unalloyed happiness. But, even
as the service proceeded, while my lips uttered
the sacred responses, a dark cloud passed over
my imagination. My eyes ceased to behold the
actual, surrounding objects. I was transported to
another region. I beheld another and very
different
sight. The good old, well ordered, well
adorned Hall at Leaside, with all its images of
solemnity mixed with comfort, rose up before my
glance. My father and my motherthe one
sternly contemplativethe other sad, but smiling,
as if in spite of the numerous apprehensions that
struggled about her maternal heart. Ah! could
they conjecture where I stood and how engaged
in what ceremonyso awful, so irrevocable,
so important to their son,so interesting to
themselves
in
which they were not permitted to
partake
of
which they were not permitted to know!
I felt a growing weakness in my eyes,mastered
my resolution, spoke audibly the last responses,
and clasped my bride to my bosom. With the
kiss which I then pressed upon her lips, came a
crowd of confused thoughts and inquiries. I was
a husband at eighteen. An outlaw's daughter
was my bride. Had I left the home of my father
for this? What had I become? What was I to
become? What was to be the fruit of this affair?
What fate was before me? Was I, too, to become
an outlaw? Was I forever cut off from society
and my father's home? I could not answer these
inquiries, andwhich was worseI could not
dismiss
them. Was I happy? That was another
question, the answer to which must be confided
to the future!
CHAPTER XV.
But
youththe youth which has been
accustomed
to indulgencelives so much in the
gratification
of its passions and desires, that reflection,
which is the result of training and habit, does not
often disturb the enjoyment of the present
moment
.
As for happiness, this is, at no period, a
proper question. We have very little, in this
life, to do with happiness. We have only to live
as long as we can, endure as sturdily as we can,
and do our duty with our best strength and
manhood
.
A lad of eighteen, brought up as I had
been, to be very much his own master, is chiefly
considerate of the day, and of what it shall bring
forth. With a very different signification and
commentary
,
the scripture apothegm is his
sufficient
for the day is the evil thereofand the good
also. In boy-language, I was happy, in spite of
the momentary misgivings that disturbed me at
the altar. I was a husband. I had taken the
highest duties of manhood upon me, and this fact
was an appeal to my vanity, which thus, in turn,
became a minister to my other impulses. My
wife was beautiful and accomplished, intelligent
and gentletender, and full of love for me
giving
me hourly proofs, not only that she regarded
her happiness as complete, but that she was
womanly
solicitous of mine. Had all the
circumstances
5*
of my marriage suitedhad it taken
place with the family sanction, and had her
connections
been such as I could have wished them,
I could have found no better wife. She, by
herself
,
was all that I could have desired; and, hurt
as I had been, in my pride, stung, mortified and
harrassed, by the events which preceded my
nuptials, my honey-moon was yet without a
cloud. Bud Halsey kept out of sight, and, in our
little islet and cottage, we revelled in all the
intoxicating
delight of a first passion gratified. We
lay in the sun like two children, thoughtless of
the coming on of night, thoughtless of all things
but the dear shady solitude which love had
peopled
with its own ministering forms, all wooing
and beautiful, all sweet and musical, all
sympathetic
and devoted to the tender mood which
prevailed equally over the souls of both. Thus
we walked and roderambled through silent
groves, and, sitting on the trunks of fallen trees,
under the shade of their mightier descendants,
wove into blossoms, the pretty, petty fancies of
a youth, that might wellat that periodhave
furnished a similitude for the first garden
experience
of our luckless ancestors. That
honey-moon
was certainly an Eden, while it lasted, to
us both. But it was not to last. Helen,
however
,
was not the one in our case to pluck the
forbidden fruit. The error was mine. I have
already said, or shown, that I was of an impetuous,
impatient character, not disposed to forego my
object
,
yet soon gratified, and restless after novelty
With such a person, the thing once attained is
apt to lose its attractions, and it is sufficient to
brush away the gold and beauty from the more
delicate forms of human enjoyment, that we
grasp them rudely to our embrace. The first
enthusiastic burst of passion over, reflection
followed
,
and then recurred to me, in all their force,
those vexing and unanswerable questions which
had disturbed me at the altar. What had I
become
?
An outlaw? No! But next kin to one!
Certainly, should the government of the United
States, or of Mississippi, ever find it necessary to
send a sufficient force into our swamp retreat,
for the purpose of rooting out its profligate
possessors
,
I must share their obloquy and
punishment
;and,
even if this fate were not to be
apprehended
,
was the doom less humiliating and
painful to which I was now apparently fated. It
was forbidden me to leave the swamp! I had
not even the rogue's privilege, but, as I refused
to participate in the deeds of the outlaws, I was
regarded as one not only not to be trusted, but
one to be watched. The melancholy prospect
was before me of wasting my days in a region in
which I was a prisonerdenied even the
indulgences
of the reprobates around me, and with no
hope of a change for the better, unless by
qualifying
myself for the privileges of the ruffian, in the
commission of his crimes. There was no outlet
to society or ambition. I could neither hope for
the external resources, nor for the distinctions of
the world. My talents were denied a field of
action
.
I was to rust disused, a sword in the
scabbard
,
a shield against the wall,the blood-steed
chafing in the stable, the mountain bird beating
his wings against the bars of his cage. These
reflections naturally followed, when the delights
of my new condition had become familiar. Even
love is a food that can satisfy few men. It is
the blanc-mange, the syllabubs, the comfits, in the
great feast of life. But we must beware how we
would make a meal of it. It is to be taken
sparingly
after other meats, and by way of giving
them a relish. The only food which never cloys
the human spirit, is the prosecution of our daily
tasks, in obedience to the natural tendencies of
our intellect, and our training. These tasks
performed
,
love consoles us in the shade, binds up
our wounds, soothes us in our prostration and
defeat
,
and cheers us with song and sentiment. But
as we neither want song nor consolation always,
so we may suffer love to wait for us in the shade,
while we follow our employments in the sun.
By attending to this wholesome rule, we shall
discover, that, while the burden of labor
diminishes
,
love undergoes increase; and, from a sickly,
and somewhat affected damsel, becomes a
bright-eyed
,
cheerful matron, who rears our children
with fruitful breakfast, and sees that dinner is
ready for us, at the proper hour, when we return
from work. But I did not philosophize after this
fashion, until long afterwards. In that heyday
of my hot youth, and while that firstwould it
were the last!struggle was going on, I simply
felt and deplored the ennui, without undertaking
to ascertain what were its true sources. Had
my reflective powers been equal to this, I should
probably have been the better for it. But, as it
was, seemingly remediless as the condition of
things appeared, I was miserable, without the
hope of redress. The ardency of my love
lessened
,
and, instead of now going forth ever with
Helen, I stole forth more frequently alone. I
wandered off into the deepest woods, and
wearied
at every step, with myself and everything
around me, I still felt how much more wearisome
it was to return. Still, I strove to hide from my
wife, the discontent of which I was now myself
fully conscious. I was generous enough, and
man enough, to endeavor to conceal from her the
signs of that inquietude, which I too well knew
she would ascribe to my lessening attachment.
In her presence I strove to be cheerful, to smile,
to meet her eye with the same expression of love
in mine, which it had been so easy a task with
me to exhibit until now. Nor was it always
difficult
to simulate this appearance. She was so
really
beautiful, with eyes of such dewy brightness, so
gentle, so yielding and dependant, that, really, I
could not but curse the capricious nature which
had grown dissatisfied, so soon, with a creature
so truly excellent and charming. Still, she hung
upon my arm, yielded herself upon my bosom,
sung to me in deep embowering woods, and by
the petty chafing streams that ran through our
swamp fastnesses, and still I thought at moments,
that I ought to be, and was, satisfied and happy.
But these gleams were only transient. Love,
alone
, has no means of continuing its excitements,
after conquest. With this event life begins, with
all its solemn duties. Unless these duties
provoke
the fitting performancesunless the man
then brings into exercise all the energies of his
intellectual nature, and addresses them to the
business which seems to be most particularly
called for by the tendency of his
morale
he
cannot
well be said to live, and none of his
enjoyments
will be lasting. This must be the fate of
all persons brought up in idleness. Life, with
such, must be a sort of mill-service, a perpetual
rounding of the circle in a beaten track, which,
as it demands no mental exercise, furnishes no
mental supply, keeps up no mental life, and leaves
the intellectual nature as thoroughly blind as
horses are said to become, habituated to the same
motive service which has afforded us the
comparison
above. But a truce to these reflections,
which I did not then make. My wife began to
discern the change in me. What change is there,
however slight, in the man she loves, which the
woman will not discern? I soon saw that she
felt
the change. Perhaps, it was no small proof
of my own continued attachment, that I could so
soon discern that she had made the discovery.
Of course I did my best to lessen this impression.
I renewed my efforts to appear happywe
resumed
our walks togetherfollowed the same
streams, sat beneath the same shade,but we
both felt that it was now a task to pursue the
same life, which was once a pleasure only. The
green and the freshness seemed to me to have
gone from lifethe glory and the gladnesswe
felt the misery which the departure had
occasioned
,
but knew not, in our ignorance of heart and
life, where to look for the remedy. It was soon
very evident to me, that her father beheld the
change. He looked more gravely when we met,
more sadlybut without severity. On the
contrary, his endeavors to console and to
conciliate
me were redoubled; and when in his
society
,
I generally found myself more cheerful, and
if not more reconciled to my imprisonment, at
least more easily inclined, for the moment, to
dismiss
it from my thoughts. That he ascribed my
demeanor to any change in my regards for his
daughter, I did not imagine. He knew me better
than I did myself. My own conscience
reproached
me with such a change. He, more wisely,
ascribed it all to the natural impatience of my
mind, under the novel restraints to which it was
subjectedrestraints, which not only deprived
me all opportunity for its exercise, but denied me
to see those friends and connections, in whom I
was naturally so deeply interested. As for poor
Helen, she was still so loving, so considerate, so
desirous to win me to pleasure, to see me happy
and failing,so sad,that, when not thinking
absolutely and only of myself, my heart smote
me for its coldness to her. Coldness shall I call
it? No! it was not coldness. I had not then
any idea that any woman could be half so dear
to me as she was, even in those moments when
I felt least satisfied. But she was not to know
this. My discontent increased, and at length
settled down into positive clouds and gloom. I
no longer made any effort to conceal it, and it
was some consolation to me that my wife, with a
prudence which is seldom exercised by wives,
never once called upon me to account for it.
She was content to do her best to cheer me, to
prove that her love for me had not lessened, and
she left to the delicate unpremeditated attentions
of a fond heart, and tender solicitude, to heal
those hurts, which any attempt to probe might
only have rendered worse.
CHAPTER XVI.
Meanwhile
, I had become somewhat intimate
with Mr. Mowbray, the reverend gentleman by
whom I had been married. I had met him in
some of my rambles, and as he was a person of
invincible self-esteem, he had contrived to keep
with me, in spite of the evident coolness which I
manifested towards him. His adroitness finally
broke down my barriers of reserve, and I listened
to him, after awhile, with tolerable patience,the
unfavorable impressions of my mind gradually
giving way, the more I was brought in contact
with the offensive object. This is one of the most
fruitful dangers which beset young men. I had
reason afterwards to believe that Bud Halsey had
instructed Mowbray to throw himself in my way,
with the view to bringing me round to his
purposes
.
This young man spoke with a vivacity
which was very much akin to wit. He was
sprightly, forcible and pungent in his remarks,
frequently novel and always audacious. That he
was thoroughly unprincipled, need not be said,
when it is remembered what life he led and what
principles he professed to teach. Perhaps, there
is no hypocrisy so complete and lamentable, as
that of the professor of religion, having the care
of others, yet daily, and daringly, indulging in the
most unscrupulous practices of sin.
You are cool to me, he said one day when I
was more than usually depressed by the
circumstances
of my situation. He had joined me when
I least looked for, and least wished, any such
companionship.
Why should we not be friends? he
continued
,
without giving me time to answer. Here
we are, both of us young fellows, neither
wanting
in stuff for conversation, why should we not be
more frequently together? As we have a little
world of our own here, why should we not make
the most of it?
You mayyou should, was my answer.
But you forget, it is your world, not mine.
Make it yourswhy not?
Thank you, but I have no taste for cutting
throats or purses.
Pshaw! I do not mean that. There are
enough to do that without requiring either you or
me. My taste as little inclines to it as yours.
Why then are you here?
A truant dispositionlike your own, perhaps.
But now that we are both here, whether from
choice or necessity, I am for making the most of
the situation. Why should not you? Why, for
example, should you mope alone in these woods,
when you might have company?
Have I not? Are you not with me?
Yes; but I verily believe that you would
rather my room than my company.
You could scarcely believe this, yet continue
to give it me.
You forget my profession! he answered,
with a laugh. My religion compels me to seek
the unhappymy humility prevents me from
heeding their rebuffs. I am for saving you, my
friend, in your own spite,for consoling you
when, perhaps, you would prefer to drain the
cup of bitterness to the dregs, through sheer
obstinacy,and for giving you my good
company
,
always, when you are most oppressed with
your own.
Do you not incur some risk in this liberality?
Intrusion does not always get off with a simple
rebuff.
Ah! you must not suppose I carry my
religion
to excess. I do not tell you that I turn the
other cheek that it may be smitten also. I have
not yet reached that point of patience and
forbearance
,
when it is agreeable to set up for a
martyr. I have still a taste of the old leaven in
me, and can lay on as well as my neighbor. But
there need be no quarrel between us. Time
sometimes hangs heavily on my hands here, as it
evidently does on yours. If we were to meet
oftener, it might weigh more lightly upon both.
I have usually been considered a good fellow as
a companion, and you seem a lad of mettle. You
have sense and spirit. Let us see if we cannot
help each other through the swampno bad
figure for representing the dull days in this
quarter
.
Come, now, let me be your guide for the
next half hour, and I will show you some retreats
here which, I suspect, you have never seen
before
.
What say you?
I suffered him to lead me on. Indeed, I was
now not only indifferent to the route which I
should take, but somewhat regardless of the
character of my companion. The last few weeks
had made me tolerably reckless, and setting
aside some of my scruples as I proceeded with
him, I abruptly asked him for his history. I was
anxious to get some insight into a character which
seemed so curiously compounded.
My history! he answered. You shall have
it. It will scarcely interest you, but will do you
good. You smile?
Yes!why should you care whether it will
do me good or not?
You mistake me somewhat. I have no wish
to do you harm.
What! not to involve me in your meshes
make me an outlaw like yourself?
Pshaw, no! I care for this neither one way
nor the other. My fault, indeed, is want of
sympathy
with my race.
Why do you wish society, then
companionship
why
seek mine?
Simply because I am selfish. Selfishness
makes good companionship. I seek you for
myself
for
my own enjoyment, not yours;though
I shall have no sort of objection that you should
gain by the communion. But, you will know me
better when you have heard my story. Here,
we are secure. We have quite a pleasant shade.
The trees arch here in cathedral fashion. The
sun scarcely penetrates, except in little droplets
of light, and the effect is very much such as we
should suppose it would produce through the
stained windows of a gothic abbey. The breeze
comes up very pleasantly from that water. Your
wanderings have brought you here before.
The spot was very beautiful, with an interest
derived entirely from the foliage, and the mixed
effect of shadow and subdued sunlight. There
was no inequality in the landscape. The ground
was perfectly level, with a slight slope to the
water's edge. The creek wound semi-circularly
about us, and along the opposite edges was lined
with a thick fringe of canes, from whence shot
up the gigantic spire of cotton-wood tree or pine.
We sat down upon the shaft of a fallen tree, and,
after a few preliminaries, my companion began
his story as follows:
MR. MOWBRAY'S STORY.
You see in me an instance of the injurious
effects of endeavoring to force goodness into the
heart by a sort of hot-house process. Unless by
miracle, by the direct intervention of Deity
himself
,
you cannot make a man a saint before his
time. There must be some long preliminary
courses. There must be trials and preparations,
by which to subdue stubborn tendencies,
irregular
passions, and a dogged, inflexible will. I do
not pretend to set before you the sort of training
which should be employed for this purpose. It
is enough that I had none of it; and, with just
enough of prudencecunning, perhaps, would be
the proper wordI suffered myself to be
converted
into an apostle, before I had ever thought
to overcome the natural desire which every man
is supposed to have to be a sinner. I was born
of good family, in one of the oldest of our
northern
cities. I need scarcely tell you that the
name I bear, is not the one to which I was born.
I was tenderly nurtured and well-educated. My
father was not only distinguished in the social,
but in the intellectual world. He was a man of
profound scientific and literary acquirements,
highly and equally esteemed for his moral virtues
and mental superiority. It was, perhaps, my
misfortune in particular that he died, just at that
period when, emerging from boyhood into youth,
my training required the firm hand and the calm
thought of experienced wisdom. My boyhood
gave signs of intellectual promise. My youth
had other developments. I was wild and vicious,
full of blood and passionseager in the
attainment
of my object, and not over-scrupulous
speaking within certain limitsof the process by
which this was to be done. But the tenderness
of relatives, and the sympathies of friends, kindly
charged all these developments to the
exuberance
of youth. I was simply sowing those
wildoats
,
which, I am disposed to think, must be sown
by all men, sooner or later, at some period in
their lives. The misfortune is, that, in my case,
sufficient time was not allowed me to sow my
tares, when I was required to enter upon another
sort of harvest. It is scarcely to be wondered
at if the tares and wheat came up pretty equally
together.
Our family was reduced in fortune and
straitened
after my father's death, to such a degree, that
it became necessarypainful necessity!that
hereafter the sons should sow that they might
reap. We were all required to work for our
bread, and the question was, in what way we
should encounter a necessity so humiliating,
without
losing the rank and consideration of
gentlemen
.
This inquiry, of course, involved a farther
necessity, not only of finding a proper
employment
,
but one neither mechanical nor laborious
one that would neither soil the hands nor lessen
the leisure. Two of my brothers were already
lawyers, one was a physician, and as both these
professions were crowded, it was unanimously
concluded among my friends and relatives, that I
was to be a parson. Not that I had shewn any
of those moral qualities, which would naturally
incline a devout parent to see a future saint in
the son. I was neither humble in spirit,
forbearing
in my anger, nor gentle in my deportment.
I had nothing devotional about me. I had the
most indomitable will,I had the most fierce,
selfish and passionate desires. I had no single
requisite for the business of the pulpit, but such
as belonged to the simple intellect. As I do not
scruple to declare my moral deficiencies, so I do
not hesitate to avow my intellectual adequacy to
the work before me. I was warm, animated,
fluent,intense, in my earnestness, to the last
degree
,
and, in the employment of illustration and
figure, equally forcible and ready. I was
destined
,
so every body said,regarding nothing but
my mental endowmentsto figure as a new
Boanerges in the church.
But, at first, I was just as unwilling as I was
unprepared, to enter upon a duty for which my
mind had no sympathy. If I inclined to anything
in particular, it was to the law. To the forum
I looked as to the scene of my future triumphs
as to the field of my future eminence and fame.
But I was made to see with the eyes of others.
I was shewn the crowded state of the bar. I
was shewn the struggling and always half
distressed
situation of my brothers, neither of whom
had, as yet, earned the salt for his porridge. They
were still an incumbrance on the very little
property
which the misfortunes of the family had
spared to my mother. Nobody seemed to
regard
the moral requisites of the Churchman, as
at all necessary. Nothing, at least, was said on
this part of the subject. It was chosen for me as
a handicrafta tradeby which I was to jump
into a snug living, and have the farther privilege
of choosing, as my own peculiar property, one of
the richest ewes of my flock. These results
were continually spoken of, as a matter of course,
by all around me. They formed a familiar topic
with the community. Religion had become so
much of a profession, among laity and clergy,
that the trading results were habitually looked
to, by both parties, as a legitimate subject of
consideration
.
In old communities, which have been,
from immemorial time, distinguished for high
social
tone, the maintenance of social appearances
becomes, finally, the leading object with all
parties
;
and all that is then requisite with the
individual
is, that he should respect his own cloth.
It does not matter that he should not deserve to
wear it. The only important particular is, that
he should wear it with decency. The rule holds
with religion as with medicine or lawit is
ranked
with these as an ordinary means of
employment
,
and by many, as one of the most inferior.
Indeed, one of my objections to adopting this
profession
,
arose from hearing it so frequently spoken
of as one that required little or no ability. The
common saying among us, was, `when a fellow
is too stupid to be lawyer or doctor, you must
make him a parson.' There was room for the
sarcasm. We had many boobies in the pulpit.
There was little eloquence and less thought.
Some of our divines were able men, but they had
grown tired of warring against those feminine
tastes in the audience, which called for little more
than common-places and declamation. Women,
of whom most of our American audiences are
composed, do no little towards the degradation
of the clergy. It requires but little skill and
management among them, to win the reputation
of great piety; and still less ability, to secure
that of eloquence and talent. I have
frequently
amused myself, during my brief career in
the pulpit, in preaching nonsense-sermons, that
were simply complicate and high-sounding,
larded
at frequent intervals, with biblical phrases,
with which they were commonly acquainted. I
6
have observed that, on such occasions, my
preaching
always gave the most satisfaction. I have
always been applauded for these sermons, and
more than once called upon to print them,but
I too well knew that what would be tolerated in
the pulpit, would never pass the gauntlet of the
press,though, towards the close of my career,
when I was willing to break with my
congregation
,
I was more than half tempted to comply
with their wishes, and put forth a volume to show
how easily and admirably they had been gulled.
But I anticipate.
It was with considerable reluctance that I was
brought to regard the wishes of my friends and
family with favor. It was only when it became
evident that this was the only way in which I
could get my bread, and get it buttered too, that
I consented. Promises, assurances the most
positive
,
were held out to me, not only of a church,
but of a wife, both of them the most elegant and
eligible in every point of view. Then there was
the influence, the authority, which the cloth
exercised
;and,this
was my own thought, and
that which rendered the suggestions of my friends
more palatablethen there was the distinction,
the eminence to be attained by the pressing,
persevering
and highly endowed intellect. Won by
all these considerations, I became a student in
divinity, put on the grave suit and demeanor, and
went to my studies with the resolution not to
forego the cakes and ale, if they were to be had
at the expense only of a little hypocrisy. My
character was one of great energy, and might
have been of great power, had it been less
capricious
.
As it was, I devoted myself to study with
that earnestness which distinguished me in the
prosecution of all my plans. I was late and early
at my studies. Ambitious, to a very high degree,
the goal immediately before me was one of human
distinction. My industry and zeal became the
popular theme in our little world. Old men
looked upon me with wonderold women with
admiration
.
I was sought by the grave and the
seniors
of both sexes. I listened with reverence, and
when I spoke, dealt in sententious apothegms. I
practiced my part with a degree of skill, which,
perhaps, was only remarkable for the consistency
which my character displayed, in spite of my
passions and caprices, during the tedious period
of my noviciate. I was successful, and the time
arrived when I should take orders and be
admitted
to the priesthood. The ceremony you have
witnessed. I need not describe it. It is enough
for me to say, that, solemn as it is, terrible as is
the trust which the neophyte undertakes, and
awful as appear the responsibilities accruing
from his obligations, my mind strove in vain to
concentrate its thoughts upon the proceedings.
My heart had nothing to do with them. It was
communing apart with its own vanities
yearning
with its merely human passions, and
canvassing
,
at every interval, the hopes, and fears, and
fancies which occupy the spirit of the worlding.
But a little distance from me stood a maiden
whom my eyes had long singled out as the object
of their desires. I saw her not then, but I
felt
that
she was there. Pure and meek, she had long
before won the affections of one who was neither
pure nor meek. Unknown to herself, I had already
made a conquest of her. That I
knew
. I was no
small judge of the female heart. I had fathomed the
intricacies of hers, and resolving that she should
be my prize, I had adapted my deportment to
those tastes which, I felt assured, distinguished her
nature; and, even at that moment when devoting
myself, mind and spirit, irrevocably to God and
the Redeemer, I thought of neither, except
vaguely
,
uncertainly, and without being at all touched
by the profound depth of the obligation which my
lips had sworn. I thought only of the mortal
beauty whose spirit seemed effused about me,
whose presence I felt was near,whose eyes, I
well knew, watched every step in the progress
of the ceremony, with the intense interest of the
purest human love. I was ordainedI had
attained
one of the objects of my hypocritical
endeavor
,
and the struggle now was for the rest.
Did I attain them? Did I doubt of their
attainment
?
You shall hear!
Yet, do not misunderstand me. If you suppose
that I did not strive after religion, when I had
once undertaken the study, you will do me
injustice
.
It may be that I did not strive enough,
with all my heart, with all my mind, and with all
my strength, as we are requiredbut I certainly
did not set out to persevere in a merely cold
system
of hypocrisy. I was not unwilling to become
what I wished to profess. I strove, I studied, I
thought, I asked. It is not improbable that in
study, thought and inquiry, I sometimes forgot
prayer. I did not pray enough. I never
acquired
the first most necessary frame of mind. I
had no humility, and this want,had not my
congregation been wilfully, and beyond
redemption
,
blind,must have betrayed me long before
I wilfully betrayed myself. I was myself
deceived
.
I sometimes fancied that my condition
of mind was goodwas what it should be. This
was during my noviciate. I was never deceived
in this manner after my assumption of the duties
of the priesthood. No! no! I knew myself by
this time, and the struggle thence was simply to
keep the real nature from any and every
exhibition
inconsistent with that which I had put on.
But of this hereafter.
My friends kept their promises. They
procured
me a church, and noble congregation. I
was at once installed into a good living, and, very
soon after, chose, from among my flock, the fair
and truly good creature, upon whom, so long a
season, my eyes had been set. She did not, with
feminine subtlety, endeavor to hide from me the
joy she felt when I declared my passion for her.
`She was too, too happy.' Such were the words
muttered in my bosom, as she yielded herself to
my embrace. We were married, and with
herself
she brought me a handsome property. Was
I satisfied? Was I happy? No! I had reaped
the reward of my toils,I had gained all the
objects which had been proposed to me, when I
first commenced my career of hypocrisy.
Station
,
fortune, fame!for I had grown famous in
our little worldbut, I did not deceive myself!
I was not only not happy, but I was ill at ease.
The constraint upon my nature was a bondage
which I yearned to throw off. I was like the
captive in the toils! True, I was surrounded by
plentybeauty was in my armsfortune at my
feetcrowds of admirers followed in my steps
troops of friends gathered at my biddingmy
voice could still or rouse the multitudemy name
was honored wherever spokenbut
I lived a lie!
and every moment of breath and being was a
pang. I do not say that my moral sense revolted
at this condition. No! it was my blood, my
passions, which, restrained, in order to the
acquisition
of an object, threatened momently to
revenge themselves for the unnatural and
uncongenial
bondage into which my will had forced
them.
Meanwhile, had the theatre of my mind been
such as it could have chosen, I should have been
content. My mind was fully exercised. In the
habit of intensifying on every subject, I was
necessarily a most enthusiastic preacher. Never
was the vehemence of true zeal and genuine piety
more life-like than mine. They attributed this
vehemence to my zeal and piety, when it was
only the natural working of my blood. In a
disputation
in behalf of atheism, I should have been
equally vehement. It was the characteristic of
my temperament. But nobody inquired into this.
It was enough that I kept them from sleeping;
that, all animation myself, I enlivened them. Of
course, nobody who goes to church applies to
himself the denunciations of the preacher. The
simple fact of church-going seems sufficiently to
satisfy the ordinary mind; and people fancy they
are in a very comfortable sort of trim for heaven
when they yield audible responses to the
preacher
,
and never forget to make their genuflexions
at the appropriate moment. I saw and
understood
all this, and was by no means unsparing of
the scourge. I laid it on with heavy hand, and,
assured in my own heart of my own miserable
hypocrisy, this conviction furnished an additional
reason why I should cry aloud, and spare not, in
dealing with the sinfulness of others. In this
sort of excitement I livedI drew my breath.
My blood demanded excitements, and, dammed
up in its natural tendencies, was forced to find
outlet and utterance through other avenues. Was
there a controversy with another sect or church,
I headed it;was there a new mission to be
established, I counselled it, urged it, and
compelled
it. Furious in my struggles, I made a
battle field wherever I came, and while all were
delighted and wondering at my zeal in the cause
of the Redeemer, I brought nothing but religious
uproar, and confusion, and disputation wherever I
appeared.
Had my congregation been only half-witted,
had they but bestowed upon the subject but
half the thought which the meanest of them gave
to his ordinary worldly concernsthey must have
more than suspected my sincerity. The very
excess of my fervor, must have made them doubt
its purity and source. But a few years before
not five,I had been notoriously a very vicious
youthnoted for excesses, and recognizing, with
difficulty, any restraint. On a sudden, the change
had been effected. Now, it is not denied that
this change of heart, can be effected by the ruling
powers of Providence, at any moment,in a
moment
,in
the twinkling of an eye;but this change
of heart, must subdue the heart,must teach
patience
,
humility, and moderation. The individual
must remember, with horror, his own past
offences
,
and must, in fear and trembling, approach
those of others. If such a change produces any
external results at all, it must be in this very
particular
.
It must lead to great toleration. Mercy,
not denunciation, will be the language of the
newly reformedhumility, not arrogance,
patience
,
not imperiousness. There was no such
show in me. On the contrary, never did
self-appointed
legate, more freely use God's thunder.
The Pope was not more imperious, when, setting
his feet upon the necks of princes, he insisted
that the act was done in his two-fold character,
of man and father,than was I in dealing with
those very faults and vices in others, in which,
but a little while before, I had notoriously
indulged
myself. But I had no help. My passionate
and imperious nature was resolute to speak out,
and this was the only way in which it could
exercise
itself, consistently with the part which I
was now compelled to play, to the mockery of
God and man alike.
But there was a change at hand. In the midst
of my successeswhen I stood in the regards of
the community as little less than a Godwhen
thousands followed, and, without knowing or
suspecting
it, hundreds of poor women worshipped
mewhen my eloquence was most brilliant, my
exhortations most urgent, my severities and
rebukes
most pungent, and excoriatingmy secret
was discovered. It could not be concealed from
one who had been among the first to followto
worship me and to lovemy wife! Without
being a philosopher, her moral and religious
instincts
were true;there are religious instincts in
every nature, to be brought out by education;
to her my secret was betrayed on numerous
occasions
.
Seeing me at homein disabille
without those restraints of decorum in which I
garbed myself for the encounter with others, she
soon had sufficient proof that I was no saint.
6*
My passions, my temper,my real naturewas
not to be hid from her, and when the applauses
of others filled her earswhen her friends
eulogized
my virtues, and congratulated her on her
good fortune, in the possession of such a saint,
she only wept. She was no more to be
flattered
into happiness, than she was to be deceived
by externals. She could not conceal her
convictions
and feelings from me. Long did she strive
to do so, but her Christian spirit triumphed. She
revealed to me the extent of her discoveries, her
fears, her wretchedness,she implored me to
repent
in sincerity, or, at least, to forbear the
profession
which could only be dishonored by my
hypocrisy. She did not use this language, but
this was the substance of what she said. She
employed the gentlest forms of speech, such as
were dictated by a still devoted heart and an
ardent passion. But I flung her from me. She
had doubly offended me, as she had discovered
my secret, and, in doing so, had shewn me that
the love which she bore for me, did not amount
to the adoration which alone I sought. My
desires
were of that imperious sort, that would
admit
of nothing qualifying in the homage which I
received. The whole heart for me, or none,
and it must be a thoroughly confiding heart, a
perfect faith, never questioning, always
submitting
,
always assuredwith the old-time loyalty of
the serfthat the king could do no wrong. I
flung her from me,it was the Sabbath,and,
proceeding to my pulpit, I made the high ceilings
echo again with the intensity of my exhortations.
I was never more eloquent. I was stung,
provoked
,
exasperated,and, at such moments, my
vehemence was a torrent that defied all let or
hindrance. But my wife went not with me.
From that day forth she was never more an
auditor
of mine. She prayed at homein secret,
and, I well knew, that her prayers were for me.
But her firmness vexed me. Her superiority
wounded me. Her keenness of remark annoyed
me. She was no longer to be deceived; and,
whatever might be her external bearingand it
was exemplary,I felt that, though, perhaps,
secure
of her obedience,I was no longer secure
of her respect.
Thus passed several months, and, with my
domestic relations such as I have described
them,the constraints of my public career
became
more irksome. The redeeming
circumstances
by which I had been consoled, the
applause
and admirationthough not by any means
lessened,began to stale upon my estimation.
The field was a confined onethe audience
was the sameI had already heard their wonder
it no longer gave me pleasure. It no longer
rewarded
my eloquence or stimulated my exertions.
I felt, more and more, with the progress of every
day, the intensest cravings for my freedom.
That
denied, what was all in possession? The passion
grew to morbidness, and, but for one event, the
catastrophe which finally happened, would at once
have taken place. My wife brought me a child,
a fine, fair son, that, for the time, by appealing to
the more ordinary human feeling, reconciled me
somewhat to the restraints of my position.
Caressing
him, I felt how sweet it was to be a father.
My wife seized the moment when she saw me
most tenderly engaged in fondling him, to renew
her entreaties and exhortations,and so meekly,
so tenderly, so like an angel,that, had my
passions
been less like that of a demon, I must have
been overcome. I answered her gloomily, almost
fiercely, and left the room. It is not easy for you
to imagine my feelings from this slight survey of
my position. No man, whatever be his nature,
feels quite at ease in daily communion of the most
confiding and affectionate character, with those
whom he defrauds. Such was the relation in
which I stood with my flock. Besides, mine was
a diseased nature, and the fraud was one of the
most extreme and vital character. Every
encounter
with my congregation was productive of
a struggle, and you may suppose many more
struggles of conscience and prudence must have
grown out of a position which exposed me to some
of the most peculiar temptations. The office
which I held is one of peculiar and scarcely
limitable
privileges and powers. The trial must be a
great one, even where the professor is a really
good man, conscious only of the best purposes.
What was mine? That I yieldedthat I did not
always struggle,that I frequently abused my
trust, you may conjectureit is not for me to
relate
.
But, usually, the vicious man, if busy
without
,
in a practice which wrongs his neighbor, is
not often met at home with those rebukes and
reproaches
,
on that account, which he does not hear
abroad. If he himself does not offend against his
wife, she is very apt, readily, to forgive his
offences
against others. Not so, mine! Her love
for me, based originally on her convictions of my
piety, was not sufficient to keep her silent when
my secret was in her possession. Her love for
purity was greater. Her loyalty to God was
superior to that which she felt for me; and for
this, I was indignant. Half-formed calculations,
plans and purposes, of remedy and relief, began
to fill my brain; and, at this time, had my sermons
been scanned by a suspicious judgment, they
would have been found distinguished by a tone of
bitterness and sarcasm, if not contempt, which,
addressed
as they were to my audience, would have
tended, in no great degree, to render them
satisfied
either with their seats or my eloquence. It was
then, too, that I amused myself at their
expense
,
with those nonsense sermons, of which
I have already given you some idea. You may
imagine it did not increase my estimate of the
value of their judgments, even when shown in
my own eulogies, when I found them particularly
delighted with these specimens of rigmarole.
Having reached this stage, can you not guess the
rest? Having gained all that I could gain by the
constraints which I had put upon my nature
having found these gains unsatisfactory, if not
worthlesswhat had I to bind me to my home?
My wife pitied rather than loved me, and the
flock by which I might have been loved, was the
object of my own scorn and dislike. I left them,
and, with a sense of joy in my new found
liberty, which I should find myself at a loss for
language to describe. You cannot conceive the
satisfaction which I felt in writing a farewell
letter to the heads of the church. I revenged
myself in that for long months of bondage. I
filled it with passages of most withering scorn.
I avowed my own hypocrisy, but reminded them
of theirs, and asserted my better claims to God's
favor, by the very proceeding by which, in the
estimation of the world, I had renounced God
himselfnamely, my resignation from a station
to which, as I alleged, scarcely one of us had any
proper pretensions. That I had ceased to be a
hypocrite, was a sufficient reason to hope for my
final regeneration as an honest man. This step
was taken in connection with several others. I
renounced home, and wife, and child, at the same
moment. It was some proof, perhaps, that I was
not utterly reckless, when I felt unwilling any
longer to look them in the face. I had means,
I had money,and, passing to New Orleans, I
found an element of sufficient elasticity for my
moral nature, in its various theatres of pleasure
and dissipation. I took ample revenge for my
long abstinence. I drankI gamedand, to
make a long story short, I am here! You look
at me with horror! Hear me! I believe there
is a God, and I believe there is a devil. We are
the subjects of one or the other, and if one rejects
our services, as not worthy of him, it is scarcely
possible to suppose that the other will not have
need of them. We cannot well war with the
direction given us. Miracles may do much, but
there is little wisdom in waiting for them. I
would hope if I couldbut I despair. I toil with
the conviction that I am a doomed mandoomed
from my birth. The appalling feeling is over
me, that under this doom I will perishperish
forever! That this high spirit is utterly outcast
that this high thought, which I have betrayed,
and this glorious mind which I have defrauded
of its privileges, and degraded to evil purposes
will become extinct. I shudder with the thought
of annihilation, since it is only the hope of
immortality
that moves the moral, and satisfies the
intellectual nature. You see that I do not exult
in this depravation. You see that I relate the
story of the past without pleasure! That I
suffer
!
That I feel the folly and the sin of all that
miserable boy-career, begun in narrow schemes,
and finishing in shocking perversion. You ask
why I do not changewhy I stubbornly live in
sinwhy I do not regret, repent, retrieve? What
if I tell you of my tears, my prayers, my
repentance
?
I do weep! I do repent! But what is
repentance that does nothing but weep? This is
mine! I do nothing! My repentance is without
results! I cannot prayI cannot toilin any
work of good! There is a terrible power that
denies methat keeps me back from the very
first performances of repentance! I dare not
ask what is this power! I only feel that its
presence
is upon me, baffling my purpose, and
mocking at all my hopes! It never can be
withdrawn
!
I am not suffered to approach the
throne of GodI am doomed, utterly doomed of
heaven!
Thus ended this extraordinary narrative. The
speaker had risen, long before he came to the
close, under the exciting character of what he
said. He now sat down, but, suddenly, again
rose to his feet, as if to depart. There had been
a very decided and remarkable change in his
appearance
,
during its progress. At the beginning,
his features had been marked by a
good-humored
indifference, a sort of easy, careless,
good-natured
recklessness, which half reconciled me to
a person, against whom my prejudices were
naturally
strong at first. But, as he proceeded, he
became excited in his narrative, and very soon
illustrated, by his example, the characteristic of
intensity, which he insisted upon as so prominent
in his temperament. At the close, and when he
pronounced those scarcely coherent, but very
solemn sentences, with which he abruptly
finished
his narrative, his features grew dark. There
was a wild and troubled expression in his eyes,
which were sombre and restless, as some deep
pool which secret fires are troubling. His lips
were parted and the corners drooped, while his
breast labored with emotions, which must have
aptly corresponded with those which his words
expressed. The awful thoughts which had fallen
from him, if really entertained, were well
calculated
to awaken the most fearful agonies in his
breast. To what a dreadful approach had he
come! Upon what a precipice did he stand;
and how wretched and demoniac the sort of
philosophy from which he proposed to draw his
consolation. We may suppose that when
Lucifer
broke finally with Heaven, and had no more
hope, that he consoled himself by some such
philosophy. He was not in the mood, nor I in
the vein, for farther conversation. At such a
moment
,
any attempt at exhortation on my part,
would have been as injudicious as impertinent.
We walked together for a space in silence. I
need not say how much my respect for this
unhappy
person had increased, from hearing his
story. I say respect,because it was now
evident
to me, that his position and practices were
not such as were agreeable to him. He was
wretched, and the worm of remorse was already
busy at his vitals. In this was my hope on his
behalf, though it was evidently not his own.
There is some hope for the sinner who is
miserable
,none
for him who is insensible. As we
reached the place where he had joined me and
we were about to separate, he turned to me,
and said warningly:
I had forgotten! Be cool, be cautious, in
what you design. Do nothing hastily! Bud
Halsey already suspects you, and he is master
here. His brother can do nothing. Be warned!
I would befriend you.
What mean you? I demanded.
Nothing but what I have said. It is what
you mean
, that is the question. Bud Halsey has
noticed your discontent. He suspects its cause.
He suspects you, your wife, his brother! He has
his eye upon you all. Beware!
He disappeared in another instant, and, musing
upon what he said, I made my way homewards.
CHAPTER XVII.
What
were my designs? The last words,
the warning caution which Mowbray had
suggested
,
produced a closer degree of
self-examination
than I had ever before undertaken I had
no designs. I was aware of none; but that it
was expected of me that I should entertain some,
naturally led me to them. Was I to be fettered
in this way all my life;my youth lost;my
better days and energies swallowed up in such a
miserable sphere of imbecility as that in which I
found myselfrelease from which seemed only
obvious
on terms of still worse degradation? The
thought was inexpressibly humiliating. From
humiliation I got strengthI got resolve. My
purpose
suddenly adopted, was to fly from my prison
to devote all my energies, all my intellect, to this
one purpose. But art was necessarycunningI
was to foil the devil at his own gamewith his
own weapons. To this resolve I rushed, ere I
reached the cottage of Bush Halsey. There, I
found my wife awaiting me. I threw off the air
of despondency which had possessed me. The
simple determination to be doing something had
its effect in relieving me from the mental
prostration
under which I had suffered. I met Helen
with a degree of buoyancy which I had never
shewn before. My rude laughter, and violent
mirth, made her look at me with surprise, but it
was a surprise not unmixed with pleasure. She
congratulated me and herself upon the change,
and, in the belief that I was as happy as she
wished
me, and quite content with herselfof which
my late sullenness had made her somewhat
doubtful
,she
surrendered herself up to the feeling of
joy which, for the time, had neither doubt nor
qualification. In these feelings of satisfaction,
Bush Halsey shared. He had beheld my
despondency
with dissatisfaction, and readily divined
the cause. But he could see no remedy. He
knew his brotherthe tyrannical nature, by
which, himself governed, he governed all others;
and, believing that I had no escape from the
Swamp, he could only counsel me to the sort of
resignation by which he himself was reconciled
to it. But the change which my deportment had
undergone, if it deceived both himself and
daughter
,
did not long deceive the latter, or she began
to doubt the purity and propriety of its origin.
Women are close observers, and arrive, by the
keenest instincts, at the truth in all things which
much affect the objects whom they love.
Whatever
might be the success of my practice upon
others, its tendency was more than doubtful to
her, and, after a few weeks, she was less satisfied
with my violent good spirits than she had been at
first. These alone, perhaps, would not have
disquieted her, but, by this time, I had become
rather a frequent associate with the outlaw
parson
.
The flexibility of this man was wonderful.
He had left me, on the day when I had heard his
narrative, looking more like a maniac than a man.
Never could I suppose that the same person
would ever smile again. The next day, he met
me with a bawdy jest. It was one of the
characteristics of his temperament to be easily
moved by the passing influence, whether grave
or gaya sort of moral character to receive
its dark or bright aspects from the colors with
which he came in contact. I found him
always
thus capricious;at one moment gloomy,
even to ferocity, and sometimes touched with
a sort of religious fanaticism that would have
done honor to the ruggedest bare-bones of
the Long Parliament. The next day, he was
the courtierall gravity and smiles, and as loose
in his morals as the most reckless cavalier of
the Court of Charles the Secondas courtly
as Waller, and as licentious as Rochester,
as sentimental sometimes as the one, and again
as filthily witty as the other. He realized the
extremes of character more suddenly, in the same
person, and frequently on the same day, than any
other man I ever met. I confess that I was not
unfrequently pleased with his societyhis wit
his eloquencehis sentiment. He had all upon
occasion, and, had he been an adroit man, might,
I believe, have led me as he pleased. But he
was totally devoid of judgment. Had none of
that moral prudence which makes the great
politician
;
and, while he won at one moment, he too
frequently offended all my tastes, and disgusted
me at another. I sought him, however, and this
flattered him. I was rather superior as a
companion
to those with whom he ordinarily
associated
,
and, in the better capacity which I brought
to appreciate his merits, he showed himself very
accessible on the score of mine. In the new
pleasure which I occasionally found in his society,
in the excitement which it afforded and offered
me, and in the prosecution of the plan which I
had hit upon for extricating myself from the
meshes in which I was bound, I sought him
frequently
.
He was not the person to pry very
deeply into the sources of the pleasure which he
received, nor to analyse those motives in others,
the results of which afforded him the society
which he desired. He seemed to take for
granted
,
with that vanity which was a large feature
in his character, that I sought him because of his
intellect. I encouraged the idea, made frequent
appeals to his judgment, and, by getting him to
dilate upon various passages and portions of his
story, directed his thoughts upon himself rather
than to mine. In this way I brought not only
him, but others, to the conviction that I was fast
losing my superior moral, standard, and
reconciling
myself to such as were paramount in the
Swamp. Bud Halsey looked on me with more
complacency, and not unfrequently contrived to
join the parson and myself in the long rambles
which we now so frequently took together. He
had occasionally a word for me of more
particular
favor, and took care to confirm, by sentences
of mingled sneer and compliment, those
improssions
,
which, he fancied, had been conveyed by
my companion to my mind.
You will be a man yet! was his frequent
phrase, as he left us for his other objects. Your
eyes are opening.
But the circumstances which gave him
satisfaction
now, afforded none to his brother, Bush
Halsey, or my wife. Their attachment to me,
as I have intimated rather than said, arose in
part from the tenacious firmness with which I
had held to my virtues. I have endeavored to
show that Bush Halsey was the victim of his own
imbecility, as well as of circumstances. A good
man, meaning well, and with an excellent mind,
he was yet controlled entirely by the superior
will of his brothera man of inferior intellect
of bad habits and characterbut of indomitable
energies, and unrelaxing determination. It was
his own misery that, unwilling to face bankruptcy
and its consequences, in the civilized community
in which he had lived like a nobleman, he was
yet compelled to rear up his only childa girl
in contact with the wretched profligates
among whom I found him. But, once a slave,
such a man always remains a slave. From the
moment that he yielded to the suggestions of
his brother, and fled from his creditors to the
wilderness, from that moment, he yielded himself
up to a bondage, from which he did not now hope
to set himself free. But that his child should
grow up in such a situation, with no escape from
such a life, was to him a source of perpetual
suffering
.
Elegant himself in his tastes, he had
tutored
hers, with a degree of watchfulness and skill
which can better be conjectured than detailed,
and it was with a feeling of exultation therefore,
that he hailed the circumstances, already
narrated
,
by which I had become her husband. Still,
I do not mean to say that he counselled,
encouraged
,
or in any wise contributed to those
arrangements
of his brother, by which that event was
precipitated. Let me do him the justice to say,
that I verily believe the event, as it did happen,
was distasteful to him. His simple wish, as he
frankly avowed to me afterwards, was that we
should grow together, by the natural tendencies
of a sympathetic passion, and he did not believe
that his brother would seriously oppose my
departure
from their retreat, when my connection
with Helen should become indissoluble. He did
not know the despotical nature of that man. He
did not conceive it possible that such a
connection
,
as that which Bud Halsey acknowledged
with the outlaws, could so completely subdue
and set at nought, the natural ties of kindred flesh
and blood. He was yet to learn, how terribly
and entirely this was to be done hereafter.
It will be easy to understand how, even to
him, not less than my wife, the idea that I was
about to be beguiled from my virtue, by the
subtleties of Mowbray, was of intolerable
annoyance
.
He had indulged himself in the hope, that
I was to restore his daughter to society. For
himself he had no serious cares on this subject.
He, too, would like to return to society. He
lived among the outlaws in a sort of Coventry,
distrusting them, and half distrusted by them;
but he was no longer so youthful as to feel
deeply
the privation, except on account of one, whose
happiness was truly so much dearer than his own.
He did not doubt that the time would come, when
I should be suffered to go free, and he shrunk
with horror from the thought that, meanwhile, I
should be guilty of any course of conduct, which
should lessen my desire to return, or affect my
peace of mind and security when I did so. The
changes in my deportment surprised him, and,
as in the case of his daughter, at the first blush,
gave him pleasure. They had both been
disposed
to ascribe my previous gloom to a
lessening
of my regard for the latterto the staling
of a boyish passion in possession of its object; and
a change in this respect, in my conduct, was too
grateful at first sight, to render them at all
desirous
of seeking farther into its causes. But when
my intimacy with Mowbray was remarked
when, too, it was seen that I betrayed more
curiosity
more
sympathywith the proceedings
of the outlaws,and when Bud Halsey began to
regard me with favor,every apprehension of
poor Helen was aroused. The favor of her
uncle, seemed to her, one of the most doubtful
and dangerous of signs. The danger seemed
conclusive, when, one morning, Bud Halsey sent
me my horse. The brave animal had been taken
from me, at my first comingI had not been
permitted
7
to see him since, and when, with a
sentiment
of pride and pleasure which I could not
conceal
,
I went forth, laid my hand upon his neck,
and heard him whinny his recognition as he
heard my voice,then all her suspicions seemed
confirmed. I was about to leap upon him, with
all that gush of unmeasured exultation, which
youth feels, confident of strength, buoyant with
prospects of assured success, and in the
possession
of one of those agents of power and speed,
in the employment of which the impetuous nature
feels all that enthusiasm and delight which grows
out of the intimate union and joint action of blood
and brain;my hand was on his neck, my foot in
the stirrupwhen Helen called me to her side.
Go not yet, dear Henrycome with me first
but a moment. I would speak with you.
I confess to a little reluctance at quitting the
animal, even at the solicitation of one so dear.
But I followed her. There was nobody besides
in the cottage. Her father had gone out on a
ramble. When I joined her in the chamber to
which she had returned, she at once, and
passionately
,
putting her hand upon my arm, thus
addressed
me:
Oh, Henry, forgive me, but I fear you, I
suspect
you!
Suspect me?of what, dear Helen?
This horse, this new favor of my uncle, your
intimacy with that Mr. Mowbray, all make me
tremble lest they seduce you to their evil prac
ticeslest you should be tempted,lest you
should fall! Oh, Henry, be not tempted, be firm,
go not with them to do evil. Go not,for my
sake, Henry, for your own sake;go not, go
not!
I kissed her, oh! how fondlypressed her to
my bosomand while the tears gathered in her
eyes,while she clung to me with continued
pleading,I begged her to be quietto believe
me still. It was necessary, however, that I should
maintain appearances, and, breaking from her, I
hurried to horse, and proceeded to join Mowbray
in a canter which he proposed. How I felt
myself
,
once more on horseback! What a feeling
of pride it inspires, mounted on a noble steed
who knows his own strength, and rejoices in the
free play of his majestic limbs. My horse knew
his rider, and I him, and as I rode forth to meet
Mowbray, I found myself calculating the chances
of a long chase, through swamp and through
briar, against any, the best mettled, in the camp
of the outlaws.
CHAPTER XVIII.
It
will be unnecessary that I should enter into
the details of the game which I had taken it in
hand to play. Of the numerous daily interviews
I had with Mowbray, and others of the outlaws,
I shall say little. Let it suffice that I flattered
myself with having fooled them all to the top of
their bent. Even Bud Halsey, I at length grew
satisfied, had became convinced that I was ready
to thrust out my cold iron, and cry `stand!' to a
true man, whenever he should give the signal.
In this, the probabilities favored me. It was
natural enough that a youth of my age and
temper
,
situated as I was at the moment, should soon
overcome the scruples of my education, in an
anxiety to feel my freedom once morenay, that
my principles should very soon become corrupted,
breathing such a rogues' atmosphere, and in daily
contact with some of the choicest specimens of
scoundrelism. I had striven, in playing my part,
not to suffer it to appear that I made the
transition
too easily from a rugged honesty to a loose
indifference to all its exactions. On the contrary,
at first, I allowed it to appear that my chief
pleasure
was in being once more on horseback. I
next suffered Mowbray to perceive that his
conversation
interested me. I laughed heartily at
his jests;he had no small powers of humor, and
could hit off a ludicrous picture in low life with
the extravagance and felicity of Lover. By little
and little I let myself be led to association with
others, and, finally, to partake in their
amusements
.
The outlaws were generally great
card-players
,
and Mowbray himself was an adept.
They had other amusements, some of which
were even of less intellectual character. Quoits,
hurling the bar, and the Indian ball-play, were in
common use, at moments of leisure;and, for
the indulgence of these amusements, they had
more than one fine amphitheatre, formed by
natural but small prairie spots in the Swamp.
Pistol and rifle shooting, I readily joined in, for
reasons that will be understood. It gave me
practice in the weapons upon which, could I
secure them, it might be that I should have to
depend;though, when I saw how expert were
the outlaws generally with them, I shuddered at
the idea of encountering them. I have seen them
frequently trim their dog's ears and tails by
rifled-pistols
,
at ten or twelve paces; and there was
one of them, an Alabamian, by the name of
Brewton
,
that could, at every shot, hit a half dollar
piece while falling, which he himself had thrown
into the air. I could do nothing like this, but I
could lay my bullet at twelve paces within the
circle of a man's breast, and I did not care, for
such purposes as I had in view, to do better than
that.
In these sports, Bud Halsey now frequently
joined us, and, if you can suppose such a thing as
civility in a bear, then was he civil to me. He
had a sort of rough, condescending pleasantry
about him, when in a good humor, which greatly
increased his popularity with the men, but which,
as it was a seeming condescension, was more
offensive to my pride than had been his insolence
and harshness. But I contrived to keep down
my gorge, and to stomach, in some way, what I
could not easily digest. It was a severe task,
but I toiled faithfully to maintain appearances
suited to the new character I had assumed. I
pleased myself with the hope that I had deceived
him. He evidently looked with satisfaction at
my increasing familiarity with his men, and at
my engaging in practices which, if not in
themselves
immoral, are at least very often associated,
among men, with those which are so. I gamed,
and drank, and sworegrowing worse, every
day, by little and little, and reconciling myself to
these excesses by a frequent secret reference to
the object which I desired to attain. It was a
gratifying thing to me, as it convinced me of my
successful acting, that Bush Halsey and his
daughter both appeared to take my change of
character seriously to heart. At length, her
frequent sighs changed to expostulations, and it
became a task of greater difficulty than ever to
keep my secret. I could only evade and baffle
scrutiny by putting on an air of levity and
recklessness
,
which usually had the effect of silencing
the entreaties which I felt that it might be
imprudent
to satisfy.
But my change of demeanor and profession,
involved me in one difficulty, extrication from
which was not so easy. Having given a loose on
one occasion, to my new principles, and very
deliberately
declared my scorn of the social contract
as it existed in legalized society, in the hearing
of Mowbray, I was confounded by his clapping
me on the shoulder and telling me that a fine
chance was now before me for making a
beginning
that
Bud Halsey had received intelligence
of a large sum of government money being on its
way from one of the land-offices, which it was his
design to make sure of, and, for this purpose, meant
to scatter his whole force, in every direction
along the possible route of travel. Bud Halsey
made his appearance suddenly, a moment after,
and confirmed the statement. I fancied I could
detect a keenness of glance, an intense and
searching
expression in his eye, as he listened for what
I should say. I did not hesitate. I professed
myself pleased with an occasion to try my skill,
concluding with the hope that the affair might be
a spirited onethat the guardian of the money
would find an occasion of fight.
If you have the stomach for it, said Bud
Halsey, you shall be the first at the gripe. But
you are scarcely the man, said he, with
something
of a sneer, for such a business. You have
not been long enough from your mother.
You shall see! I replied, though I did not
exactly
see the purpose of his sneer, unless it was to
goad my vanity.
The movement promised to be an important
one with me? What did I propose to do? What
did I promise myself by it? It was not until
after
I was committed to the enterprise that I asked
myself this question. Then, the whole results
opened before my eyes. What should I aim at
but escape? I should be provided with horse and
weaponsand a sudden dash to right or left
would be only a natural movement such as was
to be expected from the events of such an
expedition
.
On the other hand, there was the danger
of being suspected, and sped by an expeditious
bullet; or of not being able to carry through my
design of escape from the lack of opportunity, and
of being compelled to countenance, if not assist
in the contemplated robbery. The affair was no
child's play, and it behoved me to consider it with
equal calmness and resolution. I had gone too
far to recede. Besides, the confinement to which
I was subjected had become so irksome that I was
willing to encounter any risk rather than continue
in it. As it promised to be unending otherwise,
I felt that the earliest movement was necessarily
the best. I said nothing of my design, however,
to my wife. I preferred that she should neither
hear nor suspect it, till I was off. Is it asked
whether I proposed to abandon her? Far from
it. I truly loved her,but I could not bear the
torment of my situation, and my purpose was to
leave a letter for her, declaring my feelings, the
necessity by which I was impelled, and my wish
that she should rejoin me at an early moment in
Alabama. I designated a spot where I would
meet her, and pacified my own doubts with the
conviction that once I had fairly escaped from his
clutches, there could be no motive on the part of
Bud Halsey, to keep his niece from a situation in
life, in which, while he could fear no risk, she
would hold an agreeable and honorable station.
But I did not know the man.
CHAPTER XIX.
My
determination was not suffered to remain a
secret. The day previous to our contemplated
foray, Bush Halsey, my wife's father, returned to
the cottage in no little excitement. His daughter
and myself were sitting beside the fire. His
countenance was filled with an agitation which
he did not endeavor to conceal; and, after a
hurried glance about the premises to see that
there were no eaves-droppers, he addressed me,
in my wife's hearing, after the following manner:
Henry, what's this that Bud Halsey tells me?
He says that you go forth with him, to-morrow
nightI need not say on what sort of business.
7*
It is even so, Sir.
Henry, dear Henry! exclaimed Helen,
approaching
me, confounded, incapable of saying
more, yet saying, how much, in that brief, broken
exclamation.
You cannot mean it! said the father.
What am I to do, Sir? I askedremain
here all my lifedoomeda vegetable forever?
Do not this, at least! Better remain the
vegetable. Incur not that terrible destiny of my
brother, in which, though free from his crimes, I
must still partake. For God's sake, young man,
think of your parents, friends, rank in society
reputation! Think! think!
I need not detail the conversation. The
reader
will perceive its tone. The agonized entreaties
of my wife,the earnest, pleading exhortations
of her fatherhis tears no less than hers
assuring
me of their joint sincerityleft me without
any good reason why I should not relieve them
from their sufferings, by letting them know the
whole truth. I told my storyshowed how I
had been practising upon Mowbray and his
fellows
and
what was the particular motive of my
present determination.
It is perilous, but I cannot disapprove of your
plan. Go when you will, it will, perhaps, be
inevitable
that you should incur some risk. I too,
have been thinking of this flight,not for myself
for there is nothing to be gained by me, in
going once more into a gentler world,but for
you and Helen. Why not work together now?
We shall, perhaps, never have a better chance if
we wait a thousand years.
My wife eagerly caught at the idea. I was
not less pleased with it myself, but was less
sanguine
of success in an attempt at escape,
burdened
with a woman, under circumstances that would
require great promptness, and possibly involve
the necessity of fighting. But Bush Halsey met
all my objections.
I have been somewhat prepared for such a
movement, for some weeks past. I saw your
unhappiness
for a time, and readily understood it.
It was then that I planned a mode of operations,
of which I should have spoken to you before, but
for the sudden change in your behaviora change
only to be accounted for, by supposing that you
had become completely reconciled to your bonds,
and, which was worse, not less reconciled to the
loose morals by which they were governed.
Now that we understand one another, we can
act together, and with a better prospect of
success
.
Let me tell you my plan.
Bush Halsey had indeed taken up the affair
with a degree of energy, quite unusual with him.
He surprised me, not less by his activity and
progress
,
than by the plausibleness of his scheme.
After giving me the details, he proceeded thus:
The two plans can be made to harmonize
admirably
.
The boat lies on Cedar Islandthe
creek broadens at that point with a swift current,
and carries us, without effort, into the main stream.
Once let us pass Buffalo Bend, and we are pretty
safe. That is the last point of land on which
Bud keeps a watch. The difficulty will be in
getting to the boat on Cedar Island. Cedar
Island is two miles off. The route is circuitous
and well watched. But the watch will be
diminished
when Bud Halsey takes the road, and you
have, to a certain extent, disarmed suspicion.
Now, this is what I propose. Bud sets off at
sundownyou are to follow with Mowbray,
Hard-Riding Ross, and a couple more, who are,
in reality, but spies upon you. They will call
for you at dark. Your horse shall be in waiting
for you at the front door, and everything shall
look as if you were getting yourself in readiness
within. Meanwhile, you shall garb yourself in
my old grey overcoat. My slouch-cap will
pretty
well cover your brows and hair. Your height
is very nearly that of mine, your bulk is
something
less, but we have no moon, and, even with a
bright starlight down upon you, the difference
between
our persons is not so great, as to startle
the suspicions of any of our fellows. You shall
take my staff, imitate my walk, and find your
way down through the pine avenue, along the
main trace, which you can keep with tolerable
ease, if there be any light at all. There will be
three sentries at most, whom you will meet
possibly but one,and as I have been pursuing
this very walk for three weeks past, now giving
the word, but most frequently not even accosted,
the probability is that you will pass securely in
like manner. You will find Helen already at the
boat. She must contrive to get there by another
route, a full hour before you. As soon as you
join her, let the canoe drop with the stream,
until
you get to Fawn's Pointshe knows the place
there you will run into a cove, and at that
place, I must join you. You could scarcely get
along into, and down the river, unless with a
pilot. It is fortunate that I am a good one.
Meanwhile, I will keep Mowbray and his dogs
in play, until I think you safe on the water, and
then get to you as I can. He will probably send
or ride after Bud Halsey, to advise him of your
flight. He will scarcely think to impede mine.
Much more was said, which it is not
necessary
to repeat. But we perfected our
arrangements
quite as satisfactorily as it was in the
nature
of circumstances to allow. Meanwhile, the
task of dissimulation was doubly difficult. That
night I took supper with Mowbray, had a famous
rouse
of it, and listened, for the tenth time, to one
of his most licentious stories.
CHAPTER XX.
The
next day dawned upon us fair and light.
The better to disarm suspicion, I spent the
morning
in company with Mowbray, and in exercise
on horseback. I dined at the cottage,Bud
Halsey looking in just before my arrival, and
asking where I was. I met him when leaving
Mowbray, after our morning's ride. He gave
me a smile of peculiar significance, but said
nothing
.
I remembered this smile afterwards, when
it became a question with me whether I had ever,
for a single moment, succeeded in deceiving this
keen-sighted and suspicious outlaw. Our dinner
passed in silence. I had no appetite. Helen's
eyes were tearful. Bush Halsey was in better
spirits, though his mood seldom rose above that
evening serene which had always marked his
calm, benevolent disposition. Dinner was
scarcely
over before Helen prepared to take her
departure
.
She was to seek the island by a route at
once unpleasant and circuitous. It was necessary
that we should not all be seen on the same route.
That which I was to take, was assigned me, as
the easiest to be found by one so much a stranger
as myself to the intricacies of the Swamp. We
parted with many tears, as if we were never to
meet again;but she was firm, though she wept.
When she was gone, the old man and myself
went once more through our calculations. Every
step we were to take was to be precisely
understood
by both. This done, I rode to Mowbray's.
I had two objects in this visit. I wished, in the
first place, to be seen up to the latest moment
preceding my flight; and I was also desirous of
securing the pistols with which I had been
practising
.
It seemed to be reasonable enough that,
on the eve of starting on a perilous expedition, I
should demand the weapons which a stubborn
cashier might render necessary. Nothing of
moment transpired during this visit. The Swamp
was everywhere astir. Steeds stood here and
there, saddled beneath the tree, waiting the rider
and the word; and there was an air of general
preparation over the encampment, which was
equally picturesque and pleasing. I got the pistols
without difficulty, and, hallooing to me on
leaving
him, Mowbray reminded me to be in
readiness
at dark. I did not need his warning. I was
very soon ready for the worst. Evening seemed
very slow of approach, and when twilight had
fallen, which it did at that season, and in that
situation, in an instant, I still felt that there was
quite too much light. But I dismissed my
nervous
doubts and made ready. The old grey cloak,
the slouch cap, the white cotton neck
handkerchief
,
were soon huddled on, and, with my pistols
in my bosom, and a good, stout, silver-headed
hickory in my grasp, I went forth, as a hale, heavy
man of fifty, with just a slight stiffness in my
lower limbs. Fortune favored me. I reached
the canoe in safety, and found poor Helen half
dead with apprehension. My coming filled her
equally with tears and strength. She grasped
the paddle with as much dexterity as an Indian
maiden would have done, and as much grace as
a princess. Slight and beautiful, she was yet a
creature of great resolve, when the moment came
of great necessity. This is a striking
characteristic
of our Southern women, as known from the
earliest pages of our history. Delicate and
feeble
as it would seem in make, languid and
luxurious
in disposition, they will yet, when aroused by
the pressure of extreme events, sudden danger,
and painful necessities, meet the crisis with the
souls of menwith souls, in some respects, very
far superior, indeed, to those of the most heroic
men. Men struggle with the consciousness of
strength, but the struggles of women are
undertaken
with an opposite conviction. It is with a
full knowledge of their weakness that they come
to the encounter with those evils, to meet which
seems to demand the utmost exercise of strength.
On we went! Our paddles were scarcely
needed. We swept down with the current as
fast as we desired, probably at the rate of four
miles an hour. The stars gave us abundant light.
The silence of night was upon ushow solemnly.
Not a whisper broke from our lips, but, shifting
with the stream, and only plying the paddle to
keep us from the banks, our little boat went
onward
like a spiritual thing, hardly making a
ripple on the bosom of the water. Thus we
wound, to and fro, in and out, in a progress that,
however rapid, did not, in half an hour, carry us
far from our starting place. Such was the
circuitousness of the creek. At length, Helen
broke the silence with a whisper. Bending
forward
,
she said:
Here, Henry,this is Fawn's Point, where
father said we must stop. The cove is on the
other side, where we are to wait for him.
Our paddles dipped simultaneously, and,
slightly
changing her direction, the canoe rounded into
as beautiful a little cove, as ever harbored the
shallop of a Choctaw princess. We run her up
beneath some clustering bays, and, without making
fast, we waited in silence for the signal of Bush
Halsey. I never passed a more tedious two
hours in my life. More than once I proposed to
Helen to proceed.
Your father is safe, I said,he has nothing
to fear. It is probable he finds it impossible to
reach us. We can get on without him.
She objected, insisting that, as I knew nothing
of the route, I must lose my way, and probably
fall again into the meshes of the confederacy.
There was reason in the objection. To fall
again into their hands, after an effort to escape,
would have been certain death. But delay was
dreadfully oppressive. We were not able to
converse
for fear of alarming some unfriendly ears.
We could not move about for fear of disturbing
some unfriendly watch, but, crouching in the dark,
we lay cramped up in our little dug-out, in a
situation of constraint and impatience that would
have been utterly intolerable, except that Helen
was lying in my arms. More than once, while
in this situation, we heard noises, or fancied them.
The bushes would stir, possibly as some wild
beast pushed through them, some bear or deer
the dried leaves would crackle as beneath the
crushing tread of some slow, heavy person or
animal; and my keen, and, just now, suspicious
ears, caught up sounds that I could scarcely
satisfy
myself, or Helen, did not fall from the lips of
some whispering watcher.
At length we heard a distinct alarm
throughout
the Swamp. It must be remembered, though
we had taken so long a time in reaching it, that
we were then only about half a mile, by an air
line, from our little cottage settlement. A bugle
was thrice heard to sound,followed by the cry
of a dozen beagles, faintly swelling upon the
breeze, or struggling into echoes from every
quarter
.
The alarm! said Helen, starting from my
embrace. They are on the chase. The beagles
are in cry.
Shall I not put off now? I demanded.
No! O no! We are in the dark here. Let
us wait.
The sounds died away, and half an hour more
elapsed, without any other alarm, except in a
single instance, when, it seemed to us, as if a
beagle gave tongue not two hundred yards from
us, seemingly just on the other side of the creek.
At length a faint rustle was heard,not more
distinct than had reached us before; and,
when we least expected him, Bush Halsey stole
through the copse under the shadow of which we
lay. Pushing off as he stepped into our little
vessel, he whispered:
We are pursued, closely I fear, and possibly
watched. I expected to have been overtaken.
Why I have not been, I know not. They were
ahead of me at one time, and Bud Halsey
himself
upon the trail.
The words struck me with instant
apprehension
.
His own approach had been made with so
little noise, and I had heard quite as much before
his coming, that I began to be filled with
surmises
and misgivings. But not a word was said.
In another moment we were out of the cove, and
began to feel the full power of the current.
Suddenly
a voice hailed us from the point of land to
which we were nearing.
Boat!
A thunderbolt would not have more astounded
us, falling at our feet in the calm of a winter day.
Boat! the cry was repeated from the very
island we had left. Pull in or we fire! We now
understood the whole. The pursuers had
scattered
themselves along the head lands. Having an
intimate knowledge of the route, they had
reached
the several points before Bush Halsey, who
had been greatly delayed in his progress to join
us by the active interference of his brother;and
that brother was on our heels! We had every
thing to fear. Again the summons, and the
distinct
clicking of the gun-lock was significant of
the coolest determination. Bush Halsey reached
forward and pulled Helen down in the boat
towards
him. I was on the forward seat. Not a
word was spoken, and our paddles dipped the
water simultaneously and with the strength of
sinews branced to their utmost tension by the
necessity
and danger. A voice, stern, keen,
superior
struck our earsa voice that we too well
knew.
Bush Halsey, be not a fool! You cannot
pass, and by God! if you try it we shoot. I
mean it. You know me! The treachery of my
own brother is his death.
We were visible enough, not as individuals, but
as a whole. The boat, like some dark animal,
was gliding through the water. We were
rapidly
passing our enemies. Bush Halsey whispered
me;
But a few yards will save us. That point,
if we round it, will give us shelter. A stout pull,
now!
A shot whistled before meperhaps, meant as
a warning,an exhortation to provoke no farther
the wrath of him by whom we were threatened.
At the sound, Helen started up in terror, and
stretched her hands towards me, and,
simultaneously
with this movement, we received a
volley
.
I felt a slight pricking sensation in my left
arm, but forgot it all, as a half-suppressed scream
from Helen betrayed either her apprehensions or
her hurt. We rounded the point at the same
instant
,
and were thus safe for the moment from
our enemies. I turned to Helen, who lay, as
before
,
backward, in the arms of her father.
Helen! I said, with a tear, which I could
not subdue. Helen!
She answered with a moan.
Helen! said the father, huskily, as he
listened
.
Helen, my child, you are not hurt.
I am,fatherHenry.
God!it is notcannot be true.
She sank the next instant, with limbs relaxed
and nerveless, down into the bottom of the boat.
Bush Halsey and myself turned to her at the
same moment. She had swoonedwe sprinkled
her with water, but we could do nothing for her
where we were. While we busied ourselves
about her, the boat grounded. We lay on a
muddy ledge, which skirted an island thickly set
with fresh trees.
It is well, Henry. We can take her ashore
here. I know the place. I think we are safe.
We landed in silence, the old man persisting
in bearing Helen on his own shoulder to the shore.
She had come out of her swoon, and now and
then she moaned, and strove to speak.
CHAPTER XXI.
We
were very soon able to read her destiny.
We carried her on shore to die! Her career of
youth and happiness was short indeed. The
shot was in her breast and fatal. We spread a
couch for her of leaves and bushes, beneath the
shelter of a close copse of evergreens, and
covered
her with the grey overcoat which had
disguised
me in my flight. We did not need to tell
her that we had no hope. She felt by certain
instincts that we should have none.
Henry, I am dying, she said to me, as her
father wandered off. I know not what I said in
reply;something, perhaps, which I meant to be
consolatory,some one of those idle
common-places
,
in which the bystander would deceive
others, when he cannot deceive himself.
No! she continued; I have no hope but
that we shall meet again. That is my hope and
my prayer. Oh! my Henry, pray for it,pray
for me! It is not so hard to die with such a
hope,but I fear, Henry, I tremble. I am not,
I have not been good enough to dieI loved the
world too muchI loved you too much, my
Henry. God forgive me,but was not this the
punishment? It was a short-lived rapture, my
Henry,Oh! how very short!
I buried my face in the leaves. I could not
speaknay, I could not weep. The fountain of
tears seemed utterly dry. The old man returned
and kneeled beside her with me. She was
sinking
into stupor, with occasional awakenings
awakenings of a higher and more spiritual life.
She spoke of things, to us, as it seemed, wildly,
but no doubt they had meaning for finer senses.
How slowly, how sadly went that night away.
It was a pure and gentle nightblessed with
many stars, that kept trooping overhead in
noiseless
march, and looking down stealthily above us
with their strange sad eyes. There was a slight
breeze, that swayed the trees around us with a
not unpleasant and spiritual murmur; and the
chafing of the creek upon the little dark beach,
along whose slippery edges we had struggled with
our precious burthen, mingled a most unseemly
but faint music with the strain. I remained close
beside her all the night, but she ceased after
awhile to be conscious of my presence. She had
sunk into a condition something like sleep.
Towards
daylight she roused herself.
Where are you, Henry? I see you not. I
feel much better,but I do not see you. Come
to me.
I am here, dear Helen.
Why do I not see you, then?
Your hands are in mineit is my lip that is
pressing on your cheek.
Something is over my eyesfather,Henry
take the cloak from my face that I may see
you. I am better now!
And so speaking she died! I do think she was
better thenbetter then, and blessed! She was
certainly with God!
CHAPTER XXII.
Coldly
the day dawned upon us, and with an
aspect of peculiar desolation. The inanimate
form of Helen was still clasped in my close
embrace
.
The old man spoke.
We are alone, my son! We are alone.
Oh! how true, how touching were his words.
What a change had the morning brought us
what a change from day to night. But a few
hours ago, and I was all buoyancynay, in the
impetuosity of my mood,in my eagerness to
escape
from the duresse in which I was detained,
had I not calmly contemplated flight, leaving it
to a doubtful chance whether I should ever meet
with her again. Now that it was very certain
that we were separatedseparated forever in
life, and O! how completely,I could not well
comprehend how life was to be sustained! She
had become a part of my life; torn from me, I
began to realize the vague sensations of a heart
from which certain vital sources of pulsation are
suddenly withdrawn. Such a chill as remains
such a tremulous uncertainty of sensation. But
one seldom dreams long over the dead. Death
is among the most certain of the things of life. It
is no illusion. It is a terrible reality. Its touch
palsies,its aspect chillsits stony glare rebukes,
and mocks, and warns. Icy lips!I pressed them
but it was with the feeling of one who sought
for pain and mortification. Stony eyes! I gazed
in them, as one would gaze within his own
allotted
sepulchre. The future as well as the past,
lay before me in the present. The unforgotten
past, the undeveloped future. Awful volume!
my heart was too full to read it. I shrunk from
its dreary, dreamy lessons in dismay. I shrunk
into myselfinto my own littleness; and, assured
of the great loss which I had just sustained,
remembered
with a glow of shame, upon what
small game my previous thoughts had been set.
How mean and petty were the objects of my
eager thirst. How contracted, limited and
worthless
the poor things of the finite upon which I
had set my heart. What a precious thing is the
love of a pure heart, when it is lost to us forever!
But what were my woes to his, that desolate
old father? What are the sorrows of youth, at
the worst, to those of age? Youth has so many
resources in youth itself. The soul is still active
and impetuousthe blood still ready for new
encounters, nay, desiring them; and every pulse
8
and emotion vibrates with a vitality which soon
provides recompense for every failure and
mortification
.
The heart still sends forth new tendrils
in place of those which have been lopt away, or
are withered, and it is seldom indeed that they
do not attach themselves to other objects, in the
absence of the lost, which partly, or perhaps
wholly, supply their deficiencies. But the heart
of the old man, like the aged plant, has no such
resourcesputs forth no new tendrils. Rend the
branchessunder the close clinging stems, and
the hurt penetrates to the core, and fixes there.
The worm follows and decay. The heart is
eaten out and gone, though a few fresh leaves, a
little coronal of green, may yet be seen upon its
mossy top, in sign rather of the immortal
principle
of life than of the tree that lived. The
saddest
sight in nature is that of age tottering to the
grave, unsupported by the dutiful arms of youth.
How sterile is such a lifelingering on after the
loss of the beloved oneslooking on their tombs,
and until it forgets its own. I thought, even at
that moment, of these things, as I thought of
Helen's father. And yet, he looked upon the
inanimate
form with a strange and most unnatural
calmness. He had loved her with a love
surpassing
the love of woman. He had lost her, at the
moment when such a loss was least to be feared;
and, by what a sudden stroke! It may be he
was stunnedthat, like myself, he did not realise
our privation so completely as I, at least, was yet
destined to do. But no! his eye was filled with
as much intelligence as calm. Whence did he
derive a consolation, of which I had nothing? I
have not said before that he was a religious man
prayerful, truly devout. Such an assurance
may amuse the thoughtless. Piety in the abode
of outlaws! Prayer, religion, where the hourly
practice is crime! But, it was nevertheless true.
Bush Halsey was a weak manit was an error
in him to continue in the Swamp, witnessing what
he had not power to prevent,but his instincts
were justhis heart was in the right place, and
he kept his hands clean from the sins in which all
around him, but his dear child, wallowed freely.
At this hour, struggling, as he did, against his
loss, the calm upon his face was no bad sign of
that within his soul. It was the calm derived
from resignationa calm which nothing else can
give; and, sitting beside the body of the beloved,
he at the foot, and I supporting the precious head,
with all its weight of drooping ringletshe
conversed
of deathits mysteryits sublimityits
repose. Philosophy, in its cold and questioning
mood, would have mocked at such discourse as
that in which we dwelt. It was either beyond
or below philosophy,for, in our belief of the
spiritual world, we were both children. But the
philosophy of the worlding will never bring to
any definite knowledge on the subject either of
death or life. Its beginning and ending
recognizes
these conditions, but nothing more. The
teaching which can influence us any farther, must
be addressed to the heartto that faith which
seems to me equally born of our instincts and
some blessed sympathetic influence which favors
our aspiration and wishes from without. I
believe
,
if we are earnest in the call, we may evoke
spirits now, as in those days when angels walked
among men. They walk among us now, as they
did in the days of the patriarch:
Good spirits are beside us night and day!
Good spirits
are
beside us. Helen, Oh! Helen,
wert thou not beside us, on that day, when thy
freed spiritviolently freedregained its first
life, but hung, hovering, on suspended wing, and
sanctified to our souls the precious hour that
followed
!
Else, how was it that, lonely as we
were, there was such a flood of serenity around
us! Thou wert with us, my Helenthy spirit
was upon the scene, and in our hearts,and the
skies smiled though we were sad,and we both
felt, that in love we were not unremembered, and
that if God had ravished the blessed spirit from
the frail tabernacle in which it had first found its
dwelling, it had not been entirely taken from the
world of which we were a part. We still
breathed
an atmosphere in which floated ever the pure
soul of the creature whom we loved.
My son, said the old man,Henry!you
must leave this place. It is not for you a place
of safety. It is for her. It will be for me. But
you will be pursued. You must contrive your
flight this very day.
What mean you, Sir? Am I to go alone? Do
you not go with me,and these precious
remains
shall
they not go with us until we can
find consecrated ground?
All earth is consecrated ground. God has
made it all. The uses to which we put the earth
consecrates it. What place of city sepulchre is
more pure than this? The islet is very lovely to
the eye. Trees and shrubs keep it ever green.
The waters which bathe it on every side, keep it
ever pure. Birds live here and sing throughout
the year. Man does not vex the spot with his
strifes and follies. Can there be a fitter place
for the grave of my child, who was so pure and
so lovely? No, Henryit is here that we must
make her grave.
We searched out a spot for the purpose. The
island was generally a flat, but in the centre there
was a slight elevation, crowned by a clump of
gigantic cotton-wood trees. The shade was
equally sweet and sepulchral. There was a
copse of thick vines and shrubs which partially
enclosed it, and which we knew would be
covered
in the spring with the honeysuckle, the
jessamine
,
and other sweet-scented flowers. Here
then we brought her. Here, with the paddles of
our canoe, we scooped out a narrow grave, and
making a bed of leaves, we wrapped her in the
thick grey close-bodied coat of her father, and
laid her down to her eternal rest. Sweet form,
so dear to me, shut in forever from my sight!
Sweet spirit, so blessing, still hovering around
my own!my only prayers were my pangs. I
could not shovel in the earth upon herI did not
the old man did it all. How could I cast the
earth upon the white unprotected limbs, which,
but a few hours ago, had embraced me with a
passion so tender and so true.
We sat beside the grave for hours after, but
with little speech from either. What was spoken
related to the solemn subjects upon which the
old man had already spokenlife and death!
These are the great engrossing subjects. Strange!
how people strive to evade them. How the
shudder which follows the first thought of death,
makes them recoil from the second, as if it
were a subject which we might put by at will
as if it were not, in fact, the only thing in life
which is inevitable. The first shudder over, the
thought of death is morally wholesome. We
should think of it daily, not only of its
inevitableness
,
but as of a thing, the character of which is
to be mainly influenced by our daily actions.
Could we think thus, religion were easyit were
the next step in the simple process of bringing
back the stray sheep to the Good Shepherd.
CHAPTER XXIII.
It
was sunset. To this hour we had lingered
by the little hillock, which had shut in from our
eyes forever, the thing that was so precious in
our sight. I had given myself up to the feeling
of desolation which took possession of me. I lay
beside the grave, my fingers penetrated the soft
mould, which was soon to become enriched by
hers. My brow lay upon the damp earth. A
sort of stupor seemed to overcome me. But the
voice of the old man aroused me to my duties.
Henry, my son! It is time to depart.
Farther
delay may endanger your safety. Come!
It needs not that we should remain above the
grave to mourn. The sorrow of the living
attends
him and cannot be shut out. Happy,
indeed
,
are we,did we but know itthat this is
the case. How soon would the feeling of our
griefs, did we not strive so recklessly to get rid
of them, bring us that perfect peace of the
regenerated
soul, brought home to God, which we all
so much require. We must go, my son
you
will not forget!
Forget, my father,no! She was too
precious
for that. Never! Never!
Yet the memory of the perished dear one
should be a sweet, not a distressing memory. It
should strengthen our hearts, while it subdues
our passions. Suffering is meant for this. We
should grow strong in the prosecution of those
duties which are set for us as tasksduties
whether of endurance or of performance,the
reward of which, when done, is life eternal in
communion with the beloved ones! Fortunately
for me, my son, the duties before me are not of
long duration. I shall soon meet with my
innocent
child. I shall see her first!
We took our way to the boat in silence. There
we found a basket which Helen had brought with
her, and which I had not seen before. The
provident
girl had filled it with cakes, which she had
prepared against our journey. We had not eaten
all the day,for that matter, I had scarcely eaten
anything the day before. I had no appetite. I
could not partake of the cakes of Helennay,
the basket in my eyes gave me a painful feeling.
I thought of her thoughts, her hopes and feelings,
as she prepared these little necessaries!how
sweet would have been our feast together,
gliding
down, night and noon-day, along that lonely
river. Now! Oh! that now!I pushed the
basket from my sight.
The old man knew the river well. We glided
by
raft
and
snag
and
sawyer
in perfect safety.
Night came on, and we were once more silent
voyagers by the dim light of the stars,those
ever-twiring ministers of night, those numerous
herds of eyes, that spread themselves out or shrink
and cover themselves within her cloudy fold, at
the slightest symptoms of her anger. I leaned
back and watched them, and wept silently
beneath
their glance. How much is the love of the
young heart associated with, and awakened by,
those uncertain periods of time, when twilight,
the moon or the stars, are in the ascendant. The
affections do not seem to flourish in the noon-day.
There is something in the intense passionateness
of the sun's glare, that seems to offend the
delicacy
of youthful sentiment. But the fainter light,
the subdued beauties of evening and night, the
pale, insinuating charms of moon and stars,win
their way to the young affections, without
startling
,
and link themselves to all their dearest
emotions
.
Looking up to those bright, pale watchers,
I could not well believe that I was alone. I
sometimes fancied that two of them, looking more
like eyes than stars, drew nigher to me; and, at
such moments, the breeze, which came from the
woods along the waters, seemed to whisper in the
very accents of a beloved one. I was young,I
could still dreambut that poor old manwho
still plied his paddle, now right and now left, with
a vigor of stroke that was really wonderfulhe
had long since ceased to dream!
I offered to relieve him of his labor, but he
would not. Indeed, as I knew nothing of the
river, and as our dug-out depended for its
direction
upon the paddle, not upon the tillerfor it
had noneany attempt of mine would, in all
8*
probability, during the night, have ended in
mischief
.
Thus we wentboth silentboth
absorbed
in thoughts, which, as we mutually understood
them, called for no utterance. Sometimes the
silence was broken by the bowl of the wolf, the
scream of the eagle, or the melancholy hooting
of the owl, from one or other of the shores
between
which we stole, like some fairy vessel.
At other times we could catch a moaning sound
from the woods, like the far cry of one in distress,
which was yet only the effect of the wind,
rushing
in currents through unlooked-for openings of
cane, by which, in some places, the banks were
linedregions of the bear, presenting at times,
along the shore, a dense barrier, fully a mile in
depth. How melancholy sweet are thy numerous
voices, oh, solemn and mysterious night!
I slept! How long I know not, but I was
wakened by the boat striking against the shore.
I started and looked up. The old man was
standing
on the land, upon which he had already drawn
one half of the canoe.
Where are we, sir? I asked. What time
is it?
It is nearly daylight.
I have slept, then?
Yes,very soundly! You needed it, my
son.
But you, sir?
Ah! I need very little,old people need less
than young. The work of renovation is not so
necessary in them.
Do you know where we are, sir?
I think I do; but I may have erred in my
calculations, as I was anxious not to go too far.
We are, I think, about a mile above Baker's
Landing. There is a saw-mill somewhere about,
which we shall probably see by daylight. I wait
for that, to be certain. Here begin the
settlements
,
and here I propose to leave you.
How, sir, leave me? Will you not go with
me, and live with memy father, mother, all,
will be glad to have you?
No! Henry, I return to the Swamp.
Return! Return to the Swamp?
Yes! I have nothing now to take me into
the worldmuch to keep me out of itand
here!
I strove vainly to shake his determination, and
finally ceased to attempt it. I could not but
think he was right. What had he to do in the
worldwhat was the world to himor he to
it? His world was in the forest, there, with his
child. At that moment, I half believed that my
world was there also. Certainly, the more I
thought of leaving it forever, the more difficult it
became to subdue my emotions.
Day at length dawned upon us. The saw-mill
was in sight, and a cluster of cabins running
down to the very brink of the stream. The old
man pointed them out, and, taking from his breast
a purse of half-eagles, forced it into my hand. I
did not scruple at receiving it. I had no money.
What I had when I came into the Swamp, had
been taken from me, and never returned, when
the myrmidons of Bud Halsey took me into
custody
.
With this, Henry, you can easily procure a
good horse at any of the settlements along the
rivermost probably at this. There, God bless
you, my songogo, and be happy!
We partedgood old manbut not without a
hope,and not forever!
CHAPTER XXIV.
I soon found my way to the saw-mill
settlement
,
where I accounted for my appearance by
representing myself as left by a raft, having
wandered off from one of the landings into the
Swamp. The story was plausible enough, and
occasioned no remark. I had rather more
difficulty
in getting a horse than Bush Halsey had
imagined, and was content to take an old hack
at forty dollars, being, indeed, the only tolerable
animal to be had. I was enough of a jockey to
see that the creature had been once badly
foundered
,
nor was this denied by the owner. His
hoofs were scaled, and worn low, and he walked
tenderly, as if the quick was ailing. But it was
Hobson's choice with me, and I did not look
closely to his infirmities. I took for granted that
he was good for six days travel, and after that he
might be crow's meat for what I cared. Paying
for him, I found myself with eight half-eagles,
and some small changemore than enough to
meet my wayside exigencies; and, with a last
look upon the river whose contiguous streams
had been of such fatal interest to me, I dashed up
the narrow Indian trail which, as I was instructed,
would conduct me into the main track leading
homeward. That day I rode forty miles, and
slept at the wigwam of a mulatto, who gave his
wifean Indian womana sound drubbing in
my very sight, and in spite of all my
expostulations
.
I believe the only offence on her part
was that she had suffered the fish to burn, which
his imperial highness had caught for his own,
and which furnished a very sorry portion of
my supper. She probably deserved all that
she gotwas a sulky hag, of fierce, black,
revengeful aspect, who, in all probability will
have a day of recknoing with him on this very
account. My interposition saved her from a part
of the floggingat all events, such was his
assurance
to me while it was in progress; and with
this I had to be satisfied.
The next day I started with the dawn, paying
five dollars for my night's lodging, my own, and
my horse's supper. I soon discovered, from the
lank sides of my horse, that I had paid for him
unnecessarily. Yet had I gone into the stable
myself, and seen counted out to him thirty good
ears of corn;this too, after he had been nibbling
for half an hour on the blades. But the corn had
been withdrawn from the trough after I had
retired
.
The poor animal was evidently suffering
from starvation. He bore me feebly, and with
tottering footsteps. At noon I stopped on the
edge of a
field
prairie, where the grass was
tolerably
good, and continued for an hour to `chew
the cud of sweet and bitter fancy,' while he
digested
more stable material. This freshened him
a little, and at close of day, I reached the hovel
of a Choctaw, who, in answer to my first enquiry,
replied:
Yaow!hab 'nough co'n'nough fodder.
Plenty co'nplenty fodder! Man eathoss eat
plenty co'n, 'nough co'ntoo much co'ntoo
much fodder!
The assurances were thick and substantial, and
my Choctaw Boniface promised to be a landlord
after the most liberal fashion. He did not
misrepresent
his corn crib: it was ample. He took
me to see it, and then conducted me to his
bear-pen
,
where he had a two-year-old Bruin of the
brownest complexion, taming for a pet, which he
was very anxious to sell me at seven dollars, to
carry home to my squaw. The quizzical chuckle
and wink of the good-natured fellow, as he named
the squaw, brought the tears into my eyes. He
evidently regarded me as a boy who had as yet
no thought of a wife.
He
had no wife, but he
fondled his bear quite as much as if it were one,
probably much more than he would have
fondled the loveliest squaw that he could have
found in the whole bosom of his tribe. This
fellow did not spare his corn in my case, but
gave me an ample supply of bread stuffs for
supper,together with some well broiled slices
of smoked venison, of which his cabin had a
tolerable supply. He was no doubt an active
hunter, when sober. But the signs of
whiskey-worship
were sufficiently apparent in his face,
if not in his cabin. His nose had the sign manual
of strong drink, in the largest carbuncles that
human nose ever maintaineda congeries of little
red hillocks that half reminded me of a settlement
of marmozets, or prairie dogs. Unfortunately
for me, his liberality in the matter of corn, unlike
that of my mulatto host of the night before, was
as much shown to my horse as to myself. In
looking at the corn crib and the bear, I allowed
myself to be diverted from the condition of the
animal, and the Indian improvidently gave him
his corn and fodder together. The half-starved
animal naturally fastened upon the corn and
surfeited
himself, and when, at dawn, the following
morning, I prepared to mount him, I found him
dead-foundered, and barely able to walk. Grieved
at the event, vexed with myself for my own
neglect
,
I was yet compelled to push forward; and,
paying my Choctaw his fare, which called for
another of my gold pieces, I set forward
thinking
it probable that, as the animal warmed with
walking, the stiffness would diminish or disappear.
And so it did; but not sufficiently to satisfy me,
or relieve my anxiety and impatience; and, after
dragging along at the slow pace of three miles
an hour, for seven hours, I concluded to abandon
the miserable animal, and pursue the rest of my
journey, or until I could procure another beast,
on foot. There was a slight rising of the country
on my left hand, which appeared covered with a
pretty thick growth of grass,and into this I
rode him. The woods gave him a very good
shelter, and the grass would sustain life until he
might be picked up by some traveller or
neighbor
.
At all events, I was resolved not to burden
myself any longer with the care of a beast whose
limbs could scarcely support his own frame, to
say nothing of mine. Ascending the hill, I found
a beautiful hollow, where the grass, protected
from the sharper winds of winter, was still
luxuriant
and tender. Here I stripped him, and, after
some search, having found a hollow gum of
considerable
size, I hid away the saddle and bridle,
for future use, if necessary. I had scarcely done
this, and set the poor creature free, before I heard
the tramping of horses from above. Here, then,
was a prospect of succor and assistance, much
sooner than I could have hoped for it. I hurried
immediately towards the road-side, from which I
had been removed about an hundred yards, and
when I reached the edge of the hill which looked
down upon the road,from which I was
effectually
screened by a thick undergrowth by which
it was edged,I was about to halloo and spring
forward, when a sudden suggestion of prudence
persuaded me to stop and first reconnoitre.
Accordingly
,
stooping down, I crawled forward on
hands and knees until I reached the edge of the
hill, at the foot of which the road ran, and, at this
very moment, the travellers whom I had heard
drew up below. It was well that I adopted these
precautions. The very next moment, my ears
were struck by the sounds of a voice which
grated harshly upon my ears, as that of my
worst enemy. I felt a shuddering horror through
my whole frame. Cautiously, I divided the
bushes with my hand, and looked below; and
there, sure enough, stood Bud Halsey, beside his
horse, from which he was about to lift the
saddlebags
.
His back was to me, but a glance sufficed
to show me that he was the man. I involuntarily
felt in my breast for my pistols. They were safe.
They were well loaded, and my nerves,
disquieted
for an instant, were again firm. I felt that it
would be easy to fell the outlaw in his tracks,
and I half resolvedbut it was for an instant
onlythat I would do the deed. But I grew
wiser in another moment. In the intenseness of
my feelings in regard to this man, I had failed,
for the first few minutes, to see that he was not
alone. Beside him, dismounting while I gazed,
were the
soi disant
parson, Mowbray, and another
man, the fellow Warner, of whom I have already
spoken, as one whom I remembered to have met
before entering the Swamp.
Here was a concatenation accordingly. What
was I to do? I could not doubt the intention of
these fellows. I could not but believe that their
journey was undertaken because of my flight.
They were in pursuit of me. That they had no
idea of my proximity, I soon felt certain, as they
prepared to water the horses and to take
refreshments
at the spring, which I now perceived to
issue
from the hill upon which I stood, the water
foaming below in a basin several yards in breadth.
I was not more than fifteen feet above them, and,
at one time, as they were about to seat
themselves
,
I might have so tumbled a rock upon
themhad any been convenientas to have
covered and crushed the three. I looked about
me, as the thought occurred to me, to see if there
was no such friendly fragment at hand.
But, if I had any doubt at first of the object of
this journey, it was soon dissipated by the
dialogue
that ensued between Bud Halsey and
Mowbray
.
There had evidently been a good many
previous words between them, for they were both
very much irritated. The manner of Mowbray
was marked by sullenness, and that of Halsey
was fully characteristic of his extremest mood
of asperity. The first speaker whose words
were distinguishable, was Mowbray,though the
tones of Halsey's voice had reached me as he
drew nigh.
I really never fancied myself a fool, Mr.
Halsey
,
and until it can be shown that I am one,to
blame me for my course in this business is, in
fact, in other words, to accuse me of treachery.
I see no other alternative.
And do you suppose, Mr. Mowbray, that, if
such a suspicion entered into my head, I should
tamely sit here palavering with you? No! no!
Sir. By Gd! the stroke would have followed
the suspicion, as certainly and soon as the
thunder
follows the flash. I give few words to
traitors
,
I assure you.
Mowbray muttered something which I could
not make out, but the harsh accents of Halsey
seemed to drown his utterance.
I am not in any complimentary mood, and
therefore do not call you fool either, as you seem
to insist that I do or should. I know that you
are no fool, and it is therefore that I blame you.
But I will tell you what is the matter with you,
Mr. Mowbrayyou are a vain man, with all your
wisdom, and this boy has flattered your vanity,
until
he has bedevilled you. You have ceased to
watch him in listening to him. He has seen your
weak points, and contriving to make you look
inwards
,
you have been able to see nothing that he
has been contriving without. Your vanity, sir,
it is your vanity, sir, that is your weaknessthat
makes a fool of you, if anythingblinds you at
all events to the duties that you take in hand.
You speak plainly, sir, at all events.
Ay, ay, it's a trick I have, and as it's plain
truth that I generally speak on such occasions,
it's not a bad trick. I tell you, Mr. Mowbray,
that I have a trick of acting plainly too, upon
occasion
,and
let me say in your ear, that, when
I found how completely you had suffered this
chap to slip through your fingers, in a trap of
your own makingI found it almost as easy to
put a bullet through your ears as to speak to
them!
I should not have been more a sufferer than
by the course you have taken. It is not too late,
sir.
Come, come, Mr. Mowbray,this will not
do. I must have no sulks! You have
blundered
,
shockingly blundered, and I must be
permitted
my own way of reproaching you for it. The
matter is a serious one. It endangers our whole
business, our lives and the safety of our men.
Let us see that there be no more blundering.
This fellow cannot long escape us. He will not,
if you do not again suffer that dd petty
weakness
of yours, to blind your eyes and baffle your
judgment.
Mowbray was silent,with a silence that
betrayed
dissatisfaction. The other did not seem
to heed it, as he went on:
By this time every avenue is guarded
every outlet from the Swamp. We must be
ahead of him; and, if not, travelling night and
day for the next twenty-four hours, will make us
so. What sort of a horse was it that he got from
that old fool, Houser? Did you think to inquire,
Warner?
A regular break-downa poor, foundered,
spavined critter, not worth skinning. I know the
nag well enough. I reckon he's hardly got
through the Swamp with him yet.
And why didn't you follow him when you
found out that he was so poorly mounted?
demanded
the outlaw.
You forget, sir, I went down to the mill in the
boat. I had no horse, and he had a matter of
eight hours start of me.
Then, be sure the fellow's ahead of us still.
He's the chap to push a horse from the jump,
without
asking how he's to hold out. He's ahead of
us, but can't keep so long. At all events we'll
push for the `Raccoon crossing,' and scatter there.
We should have him by another sun-rise. Dn
him! But for that foolish brother of mine, and the
poor girlI would that her blood were not upon
my handspoor Helenany blood but hers!
but for them, all this would have been prevented.
We should have had no such trouble. I should
never have been so weakso sillybut it can be
mendedat least, it's not too late for that! There
shall be no relentings now!
This was spoken rather in soliloquy. The
slight touch of a human nature which the outlaw
displayed, when speaking of his niece, brought
the tears into my eyes. But his expressions with
regard to myself in the next moment dried them,
and I could have pistolled him on the spot with a
coolness and recklessness not unlike his own.
Their meal was finished in silence. At the
abrupt
command of their leader, Warner gathered
up the fragments, and I saw them mount their
steeds, and set off upon the journey, without
moving
from my position. I caught a glimpse, as they
were mounting, of the face of Mowbray, who was
the slowest in his movements of the three. I
observed
that it was almost purple with suppressed
choler. He rode after the others in silence, with
lips closely compressed, and with the air of a man
who could speak daggers, and use them too, if he
dared!
CHAPTER XXV.
I felt
my heart grow very chill as I reviewed
my situation. My path was every where beset, and
Bud Halsey, knowing the country as he did, and
being the person that he was, was not likely to
leave his work unfinished. The conversation of
my pursuers was of a kind to leave me hopeless
of any escape, except through the merest good
fortune, and the most unyielding firmness. On
the very path that I was pursuing, my arch
enemy
,
with his two subtle satellites, was
himself
upon the watch, and yet, I could not choose
any other route. I knew of no other, and the
very fact that I knew my enemies upon this, who
they were and where they were, determined me
still to go forward as I had begun. I must take
my chance and meet events with whatever
courage
and conduct I could command. It was
evident
from what they had said, and from the free
rein with which they dashed forward, that there
was some certain point ahead, at which they
aimed, and where they intended to await me.
What was that point? Where was `Raccoon
crossing
?'
I was ignorant of every step of the route.
I had nothing to do but to go forward with as
much prudence as possibleto prepare against
all sudden surprisesto keep in the cover of
the woods, where they were of a nature to
suffer me to do so, and to feel my ground at
every change of position before betraying
myself
.
In no other way could I hope to avoid the
encounter,for which, should it be unavoidable,
I must only man myself with the most desperate
resolution. The determination to sell my life as
dearly as possible, seemed to nerve me with
strength to proceed, and, cutting myself a stout
hickory for the wayside, I started forward, with
spirits much lighter than seemed to be altogether
justified by my situation. A moment's reflection
now served to convince me that, what I had
lately regarded as a crowning evilthe loss of
my horsewas, in reality, somewhat favorable
to my hope of escape. It enabled me to keep
the cover of the woods, to advance noiselessly,
and to conceal myself with more facility on the
approach of danger. Encouraged by thoughts
like these, and by that sort of audacity which
comes from one's desperation, I dashed into
motion
with a sort of defiance, and, keeping along
the margin of the road, ready to seek the shelter
of the woods at the smallest alarm, I commenced
my pedestrian expedition with all the philosophy
of which I was master.
I had always been counted a good
amateur
walker,but walking as a duty, and in a new,
unopened country, following Indian foot-paths,
and fording streams, wading swamps, and
cooning
logs, is a very different business. The road
was a terribly broken one, crossed by frequent
ravine and rivulet,for I was not yet entirely
out of the Swamp country,and full of
obstructions
from fallen trees, vines, briars, stumps, and
broken branches. But I was sustained by the
very difficulties of my situation. I was
stimulated
by the trial of my strength, and able to get
forward at the rate of three miles an hour, which
was probably quite as much as could have been
done, in his best days, by the miserable beast I
had abandoned. But, five hours at this pace
soon lessened pretty equally my strength and
elasticity. Towards evening, I began to feel the
approaching gravity of the scene. The trees
began
to cast a longer, denser shadow across my
path, and the sun glimmered faintly, sprinkling
the open space with a cluster of beaded
gold-drops
,
which, while they caught my glance, and
while I looked for them from side to side, did not
very much tend to enliven me. The wilderness
seldom has its singing birds, and I failed to hear
the chirp of one the whole afternoon. Once, a
couple of deer glided over the road from one
thicket to another, but sign of living thing beside,
I saw not; and, as the sun disappeared, a couple
of screech owls commenced a most gloomy
death-duett
,
from opposite sides of the path over which
I was to make my way, and seemed to accompany
my progress for a good half hour after. The moon
rose, however, almost with the disappearance
of the sun, and I gave her, from the bottom of my
heart, a traveller's benison. She poured a steady
blaze of light across the path, and thus enabled
me to avoid its pitfalls and obstructions. Having
no place of retreat, and with my spirits
somewhat
revived by her countenance, I still pursued
my way, resolving to continue on until absolutely
worn out with fatigue. For three hours more I
did so, but weariness began to wrap me as with a
cloud. I staggered rather than walked along the
path, and, to keep my eyes open, though I felt no
hunger, I took from my pockets one of the corn
biscuits with which I had provided myself at the
9
hovel of the Choctaw, and commenced eating
against time. While thus engaged, I happened
upon a trail which struck into the woods upon
my right, and seemed to lead to an opening,
which was partially discernable from the road
the moonlight falling down upon the space, in a
body, giving it the appearance of a placid lake.
My exhaustion furnished me with sufficient
reasons
why I should turn into this path, which I
did without a moment's hesitation. I followed it
for some hundred and fifty yards, when it forked.
I took one of the branches at hazard, followed it
some fifty yards farther, and found myself
suddenly
in front of a rude shanty of logs, more like
the den of a wild animal than the dwelling of a
human
being. Prudence would have counselled me
rather to find my night's rest in the thicket than
in such a hovel;but the sight of anything in
the shape of human habitation, seemed to me to
convey the idea of security. Besides, this place
was evidently abandoned, and had been long
without a tenant. I did not plunge into it
head-long
,
but exercising all the circumspection that I
could command, in that general dulling of the
faculties that had been produced by weariness
and cold, I examined the hut cautiously from the
outside,taking care to peer into it from each
corner,and without seeing anything to alarm
me. The roof, which had been originally a thin
thatch of pine boughs and leaves, was half broken
in and lay upon the ground belowthe ends of
the remaining branches still hanging half way
down and threatening a further fall. The door
which was made of plank, was thrown down
within;and such, in short, was the generally
desolate air of the place, that I took possession at
once, taking for granted that my pursuers were
considerably ahead of me,and of other persons
I had nothing to fear. I was, perhaps, more
readily persuaded to give this preference to the
hovel over the woods, as, by this time, I could
hear, rising at intervals from the deep recesses
of the swamp-thickets, confused sounds, not
unlike
the hoarse voices of beasts of prey preparing
to emerge for their nightly orgies. I could not
doubt that, among these, the sharp bay of the
wolf was a frequent sound;and, as it would not
be prudent for me to raise a fire, lest, in driving
the brute from my slumbers, I should only furnish
a conducting signal to a foe equally if not more
deadlyI concluded to take my rest in the cabin.
The door I raised to its former position so as to
close entirely the opening, fastening it in its place
by the wythes of grape-vine, which I found in
long coils conveniently within the cabin. This
done, I looked at my inner accommodations. The
moon, shining down through one half of the
dismantled
roof, enabled me to see and to dispose
of the massed pine trash, which had once
furnished
the thatch above. Of this, I made a very
comfortable couch in the covered part of my den,
which was still in shadow; and, having put my
pistols within convenient grasp of my hand, I
yielded my farther cares of the night, to the
gracious providence, which had hitherto had me
in its keeping, a brief prayer for protection, and
a few sad thoughts to the memory of poor Helen,
and I was soon lost to the farther troubles of
consciousness
.
I slept very soundly and satisfactorily. My
previous excitements and fatigues had given to
my slumbers a rare and delightful relish, to
confirm
the sweetness and efficacy of which, my
dreams were of the most soothing and grateful
tendency. The past experience of pang was
forgotten
in their ministerings. Poor Helen was
once more a living and loving spirit in my arms.
Once more I found myself roving over the wild
recesses of Conelachita in her companymy
arm about her waist, and both of us as happy, and
as little moved by care, as if there had been no
other human beings in the world around us.
From this happy state, I was suddenly awakened,
I know not how! The moon was shining
directly down upon my face. I looked round as
if seeking Helen,becoming aware very slowly
of the solemn truth of my loneliness. But I soon
became aware of other facts in my condition.
The door which I had so carefully put up, as a
defence during my slumbers, was removed, and
now partly rested against the passage. I could
see one of its angles protruding through the space.
In the opening, and upon the sill, crouched a
form, which, at my first consciousness, seemed to
me to be that of a wild animal. I fancied it a
bear. Under the momentary impulse, I stretched
out my hands to the spot just by my head where
I had placed my pistols. They were gone!
and the half scornful chuckle of the intruder, as
he beheld my movement, at once informed me by
what agency. I started up into a sitting posture
and confronted the stranger.
Be quiet, said he, and I then recognized the
voice of Mowbray. Be quietkeep your
temper
and your breath, and all may go well with
you.
Where is Bud Halsey? I demanded, under
I know not what impulse.
Fortunately for you, not within hearing
distance
.
You are lucky in one thing, that he sent
me on this route, instead of taking it himself.
But for this your sleep had not been so gently
broken!
But how did you find me out?
Ha! ha! ha! you are a rare person at
hide-and-seek
.
You remind me of that sagacious
birdthe ostrich I think it isthat, when
pursued
by the hunter, buries its head in a hollow,
leaving the rest of its carcass to take care of
itself
.
He's a bad scout who thinks, because he
can no longer see his enemy, that he himself must
needs remain unseen. Why did you hide in the
hovel at allwhy not in the woods?
I was afraid of wolves, and did not dare to
light a fire.
But why not take a tree?
I never thought of that! I was, indeed, too
much tired, and too sleepy to think at all!
Well, that is frank enough,but, when you
determined to take the cabin, you should not
have raised the door. That was enough to tell
me that somebody was within,and then you
slept in the moonlight! I saw your features
distinctly
saw
where your pistols lay, and found
no difficulty in cutting through grape-vines,
letting
the door down quiently, and removing your
pistols.
This simple statement showed how obtusely I
had gone to work, in the stupor caused by fatigue
and drowsiness, in rendering myself secure.
I guarded only against wild beastsI thought
you were far ahead!I muttered, as if to excuse
my stupidity.
You thought we were far ahead? Why,
what did you know about it? said Mowbray
with some surprise. I hesitated before replying.
Why should I answer you? Do I not know
you to be my enemy? What need of parley
between
us?
I spoke this very fiercely. I was now
desperate
.
His coolness,as I conjectured, what was
the feeling of confidence in my capture which
filled his mind,incensed me, and I felt the
momentary
impulse to spring upon him where he
stood.
Be not wrothy! he saidkeep cool! You
forget, my good fellow, that you are
defenceless
!
Are you sure of that? I demanded.
He held up my own pistols as I spoke.
What are these?
True,but I have this!and I drew the
dirk from my bosom with which Bush Halsey
had provided me.
He cocked both of the pistols as I answered.
And of what avail would your dirk be, Henry
Meadows, against these? I have but to draw the
trigger of either. I know the pistols and you
know my aim. But a truce to this,you do not
yet know me. I do not seek your life. I will
save it if you will suffer me As I said before, it
is fortunate that Bush Halsey sent me on this
route instead of taking it himself.
I interrupted him.
Speak to me as an honest manas
a man
,
Mowbray. Do I understand you? Can I
believe you? Do you not mean to betray me
once more, as you did when you devised the
scheme for robbing the supposed agent?
How know you that? he demanded.
In brief, I told him of the position I had kept
when Bud Halsey, Warner, and himself stopped
for dinner at the spring. How, hanging over
their heads, I had heard all their conversation.
You heard, then, the insolence of this bearded
tyrant? You saw what I had to endureI, a
gentleman born and bred, at the hands of that
ruffian. You heard,you say? you heard!
Every syllable.
And you cannot understand why I would
thwart the scoundrelwhy I would save you?
nay, why I should show you how to put a bullet
through his brains? All this will I do! Are
you ready to second me? Will you play a
desperate
game for your life?
Try me! If you speak me fairly, the thing
may be done. They are but two, and we are
Wrongedand of equal number. Be it so!
To prove to you that I am in earnest, here are
your pistols. Sound themsee that they are
charged. Take nothing on trust. All right?
Yes!
Now hear me! You chose for your place
of rest, the very region where we proposed to
lie in wait for you. `Raccoon Crossings' has three
tracks, each leading to an old Indian encampment.
You happened to choose the one least likely to
have been chosen by one seeking concealment.
It lies almost within sight of the road, and was
probably the only track you happened to see. It
was for this reason that Bud Halsey sent me on
this route. He took for granted that you would
be more likely to be encountered on either of the
others. To one of these he sent Warner, the
other he pursued himself. The third, and least
likely, under ordinary calculations, to have
brought you up, he assigned to me, for no better
reason than I can conjecture, but that he suspects
me. He suspects me of being privy to your
flight, and some singular circumstances, which I
need not tell you now, contributed to make his
suspicions natural and strong. It will probably
increase your confidence in my present plan,
when I tell you that, being under his suspicion, I
am probably marked out as his next victim, and
he only brought me with him, from the Swamp,
that I might be under his own eye till the proper
moment of dealing with me. A common cause
unites us. Are you ready?
For what?
For what?Why, blood!Death!what
else? Do you fear? Will you not fight?
Fear! no! Be not so violent! I like harsh
language as little as yourself. All I wish to know
is what you designyour plan. I have no notion
of striking like a blind man in the dark.
Very good! I understand you. I am a little
irritablehalf mad, indeed! I feel that I am just
sane enough to do mischief, as I certainly am to
design it. Here, then, you wait. Keep your
denkeep in the dark corner,while I go and
bring Halsey.
Would it not be better to go to him?
No! no! it is better as I tell you. I will
bring him here. You will keep stillkeep dark.
I will lead the way into your den, and when he
comes, be sure and make your mark upon him.
I will be ready to follow up the blow. Only be
sure to hit the right man. I am not quite
prepared
to be laid by the heelsfar from itfar
from ityet I have an ugly notion that my time
is not far off. Be you sure of your man, that's
all. Look to your pistolshave them cocked,
and in readiness,and, above all things, be cool
be firmdo nothing in a hurry!
Having thus counselled me, he warned me
where to dispose myself, and proceeded to
replace
my door, which he made me fasten on the
inside precisely as I had fastened it before.
9*
He will probably insist upon the removal of
the door himself, for he fancies nobody can do
such things half so skilfully. Should this be the
case, he may, and probably will, enter the cabin
first. In this event, you will act without waiting
for me, only taking care that I am not
immediately
behind him. You will easily know him by
his superior bulk. You cannot well confound
us, unless you are alarmed beyond measure,
which I hardly think will be the case. Be of
good heartyou will need all of its strength in
half an hour.With these words, he disappeared.
CHAPTER XXVI.
As
all the particulars in my situation were
known to himself, I was content that he should
have the management of the affair. It is true,
some doubts of his good faith occasionally
disturbed
me, but they were soon dissipated with
the reflection that, had he meant me mischief,
nothing would have been more easy than to have
carried out his purpose while I slept. He had
disarmed me of my most effective weapons,had
afterwards restored them to me,and, besides,
the manner of the man amply denoted the
sincerity
of those denunciations of his principal, in
which he so violently dealt. Still, though
resolved
to confide in him, I felt very reluctant to await
the outlaw in the close den in which I was
cabined. Could I have been sure of his route in
approaching, I should have certainly gone forth
and waylaid him. But the more I reflected, the
more I felt the prudence of leaving the matter
to Mowbray. At all events, I
was
weaponed!
I could do mischief! I could make my enemy
pay dearly for his conquest, if he succeeded in
obtaining
it. I was resolved,
not alone
, to perish,
and, above all things, not to suffer myself to be
taken alive! I had too vivid a recollection of
that humiliating half-death, by the rope, which I
had already undergone at the hands of this
butcher.
A more tedious hour than that which followed,
I never passed in all my life. My head,
meanwhile
,
was filled with a thousand doubts,
suspicions
and apprehensionsbut, as the more manly
course, after all, is to give no half confidence to
your ally, I yielded myself up to patience with all
my philosophy. To keep quiet, in the one
position
,
in the guise of sleep, was the most difficult
of all efforts, and required the utmost inflexibility
of nerve. This was the last and most urgent
necessity
,
since I was not to know at what moment
the enemy would peer into my premises. A
thousand
times I fancied whispers and approaches
from without. The lifting of a dried leaf by the
wind,the straining or the sighing of a bough
under the same pressurethese would make my
heart beat and jump with the liveliest anxiety.
But I may say, confidently, that I succeeded in
quelling my impatience, so as to maintain a
position
of the utmost physical inflexibility. I do not
think, after the first three minutes succeeding the
departure of Mowbray, that I stirred a muscle.
I very well know that I did not move a limb.
Those three minutes I devoted to stirring the
priming in my pistols and putting them on cock
shrouding myself as closely as possible in the
darkest corner of my den, and putting myself just
in that position which would enable me to
command
the entrance, with the best possible
prospect
of doing my work efficiently.
Thus prepared, I endured the hourfor it was
fully thatof interval, which followed the
departure
of Mowbray, before I became conscious of
his return. The ears of him who watches for his
foe are singularly keen and apprehensive. Miss
Baillie, in one of her plays, has a happy
illustration
of this exquisite nicety of sense, under such
circumstances. I cannot say that I heard the
approach
of Bud Halsey, at the very moment when
I yet
knew
that he was nigh. The instinct of
hate or love, is a nicer sense than any which we
have in ordinary. It
is
an instincta sort of
spiritual
sense, which, leaping the ordinary outworks
of nature, takes in the coming events long before
they have cast a shadow over the citadel. I knew
that my enemy was nigh, though I did not hear a
footstepnot a whisper reached my earsnot a
sound disturbed the familiar silence,yet I felt
that he was breathing in the same atmosphere
with myself. I felt my heart boundI felt my
pulses quickenbut I was prepared for the worst!
Fully ten minutes followed of the most nervous
anxiety. Still, not a soundnot a movement!
Cautious, indeed, were the approaches of the
outlaw
,
and though, every moment, more and more
impatient for action, yet the very caution of mine
enemy tended to the increase of my strength. At
length I was made conscious of a sound, and, an
instant after, the light of the moon glinted from the
blade of a knife, which I now perceived to be
working upon the wythes which fastened the door.
A few moments sufficed to sever them on each
side, and I then saw that the door, which was a
massive one, was gently, and with ease, lifted
from without, and lodged on the inside, resting
against one of the posts. The figure of the
person
by whom this was done, was now partially
apparent to me, but, as the front of the house was
in shadow, I could not sufficiently distinguish the
individual. Could I have been sure of my man,
nothing would have been more easy than to have
shot him where he stood. But I suffered him to
enter, which he did, so cautiously, that, though I
saw him approach, I never heard a footfall. One
more step brought him into the light of the moon,
and then, thrusting one of my pistols forward, I
pulled trigger upon him. To my utter
consternation
the weapon gave no report. The flint gave
no fire. Before I could present the second pistol,
I heard an exclamation from the lips of Mowbray,
at the entrancea single Ha! in tones of
mortification
,
and I then beheld him dart upon the
outlaw
,
while he was advancing upon me, and strike
him twice in the back. A terrible yell burst from
the lips of Bud Halsey, as he turned upon his
assailant
.
Traitor! he exclaimed, it is you!
As he turned, with this exclamation, I sprang
forward, clapped my remaining pistol to his head
and firedthis time with effect. My bullet went
through his brain at the very moment when,
grasping
Mowbray by the throat with one hand, with
the other he drove the bowie knife, which had
been destined for my bosom, through that of my
confederate. Halsey sunk down lifeless, in a
heap at my feet; while Mowbray, with
outstretched
arms, staggered backward, and leaned for a
moment against the unhung door, which shook
beneath his frame. He spoke but a few words,
but they belonged not to the present scene or
circumstances
.
Raise my voice, my brethrencry aloud,
the time is at hand.
Mowbray! said I, grasping his body and
endeavoring
to support him, as I saw that he was
about to fall.
Ah! said he, with momentary consciousness,
I see how it is! There's no use now! But tell
hertell her all. His lips parted in hurried and
frequent murmurs. I let him down gently upon
the pine straw.
Tell her what?tell
who?
name her, that I
may know.
What! he exclaimed, with a momentary
recovery
of strength, have you not heard?have
you not understood me?
Not a wordnot a syllable!
Great God!then it's too late! and the tears
gushed from his eyes. Still he muttered, seemed
anxious to make me hear, grasped my arm, and,
with a final effort to lift himself, sunk away, and
expired in a faint shriek, the appalling sound of
which I sometimes hear in my dreams, even to
this hour.
CHAPTER XXVII.
I need
not say, that for the moment, I was
completely stunned by the rapid occurrence of
these events, so equally terrible and unexpected.
There was my enemy at my foot insensiblemy
powerful enemy, slain, and without striking a
stroke in his defence, by my inexperienced hand
the hand which he either did or affected to
despise. True, I had my justification, for I slew
him while he was hot in pursuit of my own life.
There, too, beside him, lay my confederate,the
unhappy Mowbray, whose own wild and
ungovernable
passions had defrauded of all the high
human hopes, which good family, good education,
and rare intellectual endowments, might, under
better auspices of morality, have ensured to his
endeavors. The first feeling of stupor over, and
I sat looking upon his stiffening frame, and vague
staring eyes, glistening ghastly in the moonlight,
with thick-coming fancies. I remembered his
presentiment of evil but a little hour beforethe
bewildered and only half coherent hope which he
expressed for life in the same momentI
remembered
his temporary alliance with meto me it
mattered not the motiveby which my life had
been savedand I felt the tears, hot and large,
come crowding into my eyes. What would I
not have given, could I have heard those last
words which he could not articulate, and which
seemed to be charged with such weighty interest
to his feelings, in the last struggles of his living
consciousness! Could he have lived only for
repentance
!
Could I have only been able to
convey
to the bereaved and mourning wife, the
wostricken
mother, the relatives and friends, the
assurance
that he died in prayer, and not without a
hope! But all was a blank in that last terrible
moment, over which let the mortal curtain fall
forever.
I was roused from my musings by the
necessity
for self-preservation. There was still an
enemy upon my track. With the thought, I drew
myself out of the moonlight. I stole forth in the
shadows of the house, and from tree to tree
around it, listening for the footfalls of danger. I
heard none but my own. Still, there was
danger
,
and it behoved me to prepare for it. I
hurried
back to the hovelre-possessed myself of
the pistol which had failed me, and which I had
cast to the ground when it became necessary to
use the otherpicked the edges of the flint with
the handle of my dagger,and thus, partially
sure of this weapon, I proceeded to make a
hurried
examination of the dead bodies, in order to
possess myself of theirs. I found an armory.
Bud Halsey carried three pistols himself, and a
bowie knife; while, from the belt of Mowbray, I
plucked two more. I secured them all, not so
much with the thought that I should need them,
but simply to prevent other hands from using
them against me. Thus armed, I stole from the
hovel, and made my way in the direction of the
main
trace
from which I had departed.
I had two objects before meto find a horse,
and to elude or frighten Warner. In all
probability
,
I should be compelled to effect the latter,
in order to secure the former object. Where the
horses were haltered, was to be ascertained.
Probably, they were in this man's keeping. He
and they were to be searched for, and at some
hazard. But I gave myself up confidingly to the
gracious providence that had carried me so far
through, and went forward with a free but
cautious
footstep. If he had heard the shot, which
within three miles, in the deep recesses of night,
he was likely to have done,in all probability
he would make his way towards the spot whence
it issued. I might then look to meet him. At all
events, I was to seek out the other two pathways
or `Crossings,'whether I looked for him or the
horses. In the midst of my doubts and musings,
I heard the faint hootings of an owl. It was
barely
possible that this was a signal. Certainly,
owls enough, of the feathered tribe, might be
expected
in such a region. But I knew how much
the outlaws were in the habit of relying upon
their powers of imitation, in communicating to
one another, under circumstances of danger or
difficulty. One thing struck me as suspicious.
I did not hear the almost immediate answer to
this summons, with which the mate of the owl
usually acknowledges the signal. I paused a
sufficient time to admit of this, and then
determined
to remain where I was, under the close
cover of a tree, at least for a little space of time.
Five minutes had not elapsed, when a second
hooting, now more distinct, was echoed through
the forest. I determined to try my powers of
imitation also, and I sent forth a most vigorous,
if not equally dulcet response of
Hoo!Hoo!Hoo! hoo! hoo! There came
a ready answer! With the answer I retreated,
once more, towards the place of conflict
pausing
,
after I had gone a certain distance, and
waiting
for a farther signal. I did not wait for it
long, and I was delighted to find that the fellow
seemed following the sound. I gave it him again
from where I stood, then retreated another space,
and waited his approach. Again the cry, and
again the answer. I now discovered that he
was fairly in the `
crossing
' which led to my
den. Here then, I took my stand, within five
steps of the path upon which he came, with my
person fully concealed in the thicket, yet with the
muzzle of my pistols commanding the track and
every thing that might come upon it. And now
the question occurred to me, shall Ican I
shoot the fellow down from my ambush, or shall
I suffer him to go forward, then, hurrying down
the road which he had left, leave him to find the
bodies, while I sought for the horses. But I had
little time for determining my course. There
was no choice. The fellow came on horseback!
Even while I meditated the question, his horse
thundered down the avenue. I resolved on the
most merciful expedient, and as the steed
appeared
in sight, I gave him my bullet. The beast
dashed aside against a huge tree that stood some
fifteen steps upon the path, then fell forwards,
with a tremendous concussion, to the ground. I
had no time to lose. I rushed forward, and as I
broke through the bushes, Warner cried out to
me:
Captain,Mr. Mowbrayit's me,Warner
what have you done? Help me! I'm half
crushed under the horse. I reckon he's done
for. He don't move!
Villain! I cried, bestraddling him, as he lay
with one leg and thigh completely under the
animal
.
Villain!this moment is your last!
How! Who's this? he screamedmaking,
at the same time, a vain effort at resistance;
one of his hands striving hard to find its way
into his bosom, against which my knee was
strenuously pressed.
Do not movedo not struggleI have no
wish to kill you,but unless you are quiet I will
do so.
Is it you, Mr. Meadows?
Ay! you came too late.
Who fired before?
I did.
At whom?
Your masterBud Halseyand he lies as
stiff and silent as your horse.
Grim!you don't say so.
It is true as gospel.
And Mr. Mowbray?
He was killed by Bud Halsey.
I looked for that! said the fellow, very
coolly
.
Well, Squire, if it's true what you say, I
reckon I must give in! But help me out of this fix,
for mercy's sakeI'm afeard the leg's smashed.
Not till I've emptied your bosom of what it's
got in it, my good fellow. Let us see.
He offered no objections to my search, and I
drew from his bosom and waist, with some
difficulty
,
a pair of pistols, a bowie knife, and an
ordinary
couteau de chasse
,for Warner was a
master of the pleasant sports of Venerie.
Though I searched narrowly, I found nothing
more, likely to endanger my safety,and, these
secured, I proceeded to give him all the help I
could in extricating him from the body of the
horse. This was no easy task, for the animal
was one of considerable size, and the roots and
vines where he had fallen offered many
obstructions
.
Besides, it appeared, from the way in
which he lay, that Warner could do little for
himself
.
When at length relieved, he did not rise.
He strove, but could not. A moment's
examination
sufficed to show that his right leg was
shattered.
What am I to do? was the mournful
exclamation
of the ruffian.
I'll tell you, was my answer. Where
have you left the horses of Bud Halsey and
Mowbray?
He gave me directions where I should find them,
and leaving him where he lay, I at once went
after
them. They were soon found, and choosing
the best, which was a noble black of Bud Halsey,
I mounted him, and led the other to Warner.
Now, said I, there is but one way for you.
I will help you to mount the horse of Mowbray,
which is a short animal, and as you are a good
rider
,
you can keep on with me to the first
settlement
,
where you can get surgical assistance, or
at all events, the best assistance that the
neighborhood
affords. What say you to that?
Thank you, sir,but I know a better way
Only help me to get on the horse, sir, and then,
with your leave, we'll part company. It's not
every day that I can visit the settlements, and it
may be as much as my neck's worth to go in
your company.
Do you think I would betray you? I said,
with loathing.
No! sir, oh! no! I reckon I know you
better
,but
you'd find it difficult to answer for me,
seeing as how I'd find it impossible to answer for
myself; and then, again, there's no need for me
to go that way for help, when I can get quite as
good or better in the Swamp.
Can you? Are you sure that you can reach
the Swamp?
Oh! very sure; for that matter I shall find
help long before I get there.
Be it so, I answered. You know best.
You have your choice. You are your own
master
.
He signified his readiness to make the effort,
and fastening the horse of Mowbray to a sapling
close beside him, I threw my whole strength
into
the effort, and raised him erecthe resting, for
an instant, upon his sound leg, while I lifted him
to my shoulder, and finally to the saddle, in the
stirrup of which, planting the foot of his unbroken
limb, he contrived, with my assistance, to fling the
shattered member across. The effort was one
of great suffering, and at one moment I thought
the fellow would have fainted. But he was a
tough villain, and had been in such scrapes
before
.
It's not the first time, said he, with a groan;
I've had the same leg smashed before, and I
reckon it wont be the last.
Take care, said I, the next time, it isn't
your neck!
Ah! Squire, said the scoundrel, with a
chuckle, it's not
my
neck only that's in danger!
The reminiscence might have been fatal to him
an hour before; but I suffered the insolence to
pass unpunished. Certainly, the fellow deserved
to go scot-free who could be content to joke
under
such circumstances. I saw him fairly
started
,
in very tolerable strength and spirits, and
became
satisfied that he should thus depart, from the
coolness and confidence which he manifested.
He uttered his thanks and acknowledgments very
civilly, and, seeing him fairly under way, I also
took the saddle. In a few moments he was off in
a smart canter, while, taking the opposite
direction
,
I proceeded also at a similar pace.
Whether
he lived or died, recovered his limb, or went
lame through life, I cannot say. He has no
farther
interest in my story. For this, almost as
brief a paragraph will suffice. I reached
Leaside
without further adventure or interruption of
any moment. I stopped a night with `plain
Yannaker,' who eyed my black with the wistful
eyes of one who had his doubts and curiosities.
But he asked no questions. Some day, Yannaker
shall make a story of his own.How my
mother
blessed me and kissed me, and welcomed me
homehow she looked into my face and
wondered
at its sedatenesshow my father pressed me
for a narration, which, until this moment. I have
shared with none,these call for no farther
development
.
But there was a cloud upon my brow
which neither had ever beheld there beforeand
there was an abstraction in my glance, which was
strangely at variance with the imperious and
direct
gaze with which, before that season, I had
met every other eye. In the brief space of two
months, I had counted years by moments. I had
crowded the events of a long life, into the limits
of a single moon.
CONCLUSION.
Seven
years after these events, there was a
general clearing out of the outlaws, from the
swamp retreats of Conelachita. The
circumstances
distinguishing the movement of that
popular
phrenzy, by which this great result was
effected
,
have already been chronicled in history
and illustrated by romance. Under less
circumspect
leaders, the outlaws had lost much of their
prudence and adroitness; and, indeed, the
condition
of the country had become less favorable to
their operations. Population of a more
permanent
and industrious, and, consequently, more
honest description, had been steadily pouring in,
and the ultimate extinction of the Indian title to
the lands, was an event, of itself, to strike a fatal
blow at the security of the `
government-against-law'
in Conelachita. How the people, furious
in consequence of the most frequent and
audacious
murders, to say nothing of robberies, rushed
en masse
into the swamp-fastnesses, and, with
shot, and sabre-stroke, and halter, put an end to
the dynasty of the outlaw, in that quarter, needs
only to be glimpsed at here. The affair was one
of immense interest to the country at large, and
of a peculiarly delicate interest to me. I read
the accounts of the progress of the
regulators
, as
they appeared from time to time in the papers of
the Southwest, with an exciting and painful
anxiety
.
The fate of the poor fatherof the really
good Bush Halseyunfortunately cursed with
so bad a brotherwas, in particular, a matter
upon which I brooded with an almost
unremitting
thought. I could not forget how dear he
was to me, not only as the father of my wife, but
on his own account. From him I had met with
nothing but what was considerate in kindness,
and affectionate in consideration. I resolved
finally, in order to quiet my own thoughts, to seek
out his fateto see whether he had perished with
the restin the indiscriminate massacre which
had befallen the miserable wretches, with whom
he was, but
of
whom he was not! Circumstances
were now not so unfavorable to such a search.
The country along the route was tolerably
settled
.
The rogues had generally given way to a
better race of men. Even `Plain Yannaker'
had made tracks, and removed with his teraphim
into the wilderness. Travelling was secure.
Broad roads were opened through regions once
traversed only by the Indian foot-trail; and, with
bitter-sweet recollections rising at every step, I
once more penetrated the well-known and once
mysterious recesses of Conelachita. How, as I
went along, the present dilated in homily upon
the past. I flattered myself that I had grown
wiser, and this notion reconciled me to many a
gloomy recollection. But in these I will not
indulge
.
Once more I found the cottage in the Swamp,
in which I had wedded my poor Helen. It was
in the possession of a squatter, whom I bought
out, taking care that my titles in the land-office
should supply any deficiencies in his. But, ere
this was done, taking a boat, with a single servant
I made my way down the stream upon which I
had sped that fatal night with Helen and her
father. I recognized, with a thrill of the keenest
emotion, the little bayou, in the scoop of which
our bark had lain, hidden by the overhanging
shrubs and willows, in waiting for Bush Halsey.
It was there that she had rested in my arms
silent, tearful, with the love within her heart,
and O! how little dreaming of the sudden and
terrible fate which stood in waiting for her, but a
little mile below. I turned from the spot with a
heart too tremulous to be trusted to
contemplation
.
Then, as the fatal point rose in view, on
which, crouching with his myrmidons, Bud
Halsey
issued the stern order, and sped the
murderous
shot, I shuddered with horrors such as did
not thrill me then. Little then did I foresee the
brutal haste, the reckless resolution, with which
that fierce uncle would carry out his threat. I
groaned from the bottom of my heart,and the
paddle escaped my grasp. This incident
awakened
me, and I recovered myself. It was not a
long while before we reached the island. There,
we drew the boat ashore, and I hurried, without
delay, toward the secluded spot where the woman
of my heart lay buried. I was met by a bowed
forma diminutive, withered, white-headed old
manalmost bent double. His hair, of the most
silvery whiteness, covered his back. His beard
was similarly white and long. It was he! It
was the father! He knew me at a glance; and,
as if I could have but a single object, he took me
by the hand gently, and said:
Comein the sweetest accents, and led me
at once to the grave of Helen!
THE END.